title,selftext,subreddit
"LGBT is not now, or ever will be, accepting peadophiles.","Hello all people. There has been recently a lot of posts, caused by some rather questionable images claiming that LGBT is adding a P for peadophiles, or the MAP stuff. This could not be further from the truth, This is a hoax being spread by 4chan, as you can see on the snopes page [here](https://www.snopes.com/fact-check/lgbtp-adding-letter/).  However, due to this hoax, we have been receiving multiple posts a day, either claiming we are, asking are we, or simply repeating our denial. To this effect we are putting up this sticky, and asking people do not keep posting such, further posts will be removed and referred to this sticky, thankyou.",lgbt
Don't PM individual mods about issues on /r/lgbt - ModMail is there for you!,"Hi everyone!

The eagle-eyed of you may have noticed a new rule on our sidebar this morning!

&gt; Rule 4: Do not Private Message individual moderators about issues on /r/lgbt, use the **[modmail](https://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2Flgbt&amp;subject=&amp;message=)** instead. This will help you get a better response faster.

This is because of all the different time zones our moderator team cover, you're more likely to get a response from us quickly if you message the entire team using modmail, than if you message one or more of us individually.

We will be holding people to this rule after a number of recent incidents where mods have faced harassment and even abuse in PMs. 

To send us a Modmail, go to compose a message as you normally would, but just send it to ""/r/lgbt"" rather than an individual user.

Or click this easy button;

# **[Send /r/lgbt a modmail](https://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2Flgbt&amp;subject=&amp;message=)**

Have a lovely day!",lgbt
I'm pissed,,lgbt
"Follow up to ""I'm Pissed""",,lgbt
"I am now officially scheduled to come out June 31st, 2019 🏳️‍🌈 [Coming out]",,lgbt
It’s been a long road but here we are. Out and proud!,,lgbt
I started estrogen two days ago and I’m kinda super jazzed about it. I’m setting my androgyny goals low though because male puberty smacked the shit out of me (I’m on the left and my bf’s on the right),,lgbt
Trump’s attack on trans people should be a wake-up call for the mainstream gay rights movement. The LGBTQ community needs to grapple with its history of excluding its most vulnerable members.,,lgbt
halloweekend with my lady,,lgbt
There is a very insufficient amount of outrage from our cis-LGB brothers and sisters today.,"[In case you haven’t heard, the US government just erased transgender people from all of their official pages online.](https://medium.com/@Phaylen/all-references-to-transgender-americans-scrubbed-from-government-websites-45a455259e4c?fbclid=IwAR3FYodeNItQCcC0f3LamUv9U1_F0GnsVhz_HQQbp81bErxeVBmVhCumkyc)This is a very frightening move that can and will trigger a house of cards effect on ALL LGBT rights. 

Currently the top post for today at around 15-16k upvotes is showing outrage that r/relationships removed a post from their subreddit because the people involved were in a same-sex relationship. Although that is worthy of rage, it should not be eclipsing the shocking news coming out of the White House today.

To log onto this subreddit as a trans person today is colossally upsetting. We’re terrified today, and our cis-LGB friends are not here for us in our time of need. And it feels really shitty, everybody. Really shitty. ",lgbt
#NeverForget,,lgbt
If being LGBT was a choice I wouldn’t take it,"Before you come at me, I am saying this because I’m tired of people calling my sexuality a choice and having no where to vent out. 

If being lesbian was a choice, I would rather remain straight even though I would still support the lgbtq movement. 

Being lesbian means that I cannot fall in love and have the joy of introducing my loved one to my country and to my family. 

It also means that I have to make a choice of staying close to my family or starting up a new life where I’m open about my sexuality. So if my love interest screws me over, then my family is not there to help me. 

It also means having an interest in someone, but acknowledging that they might be straight or they might just want to “experiment”. 

My country is one of the worst place to be lgbt. Lesbians are raped, gay and trans people are murdered. Some are sentenced to life in prison if they are caught, and until recently most were being executed. 

I constantly hear my family belittle the LGBT movement, and even though I try to show my support, I’m afraid that one slip of the tongue and I’m done for.  It’s not just paranoia. Last year, they started questioning my friendship with my best friend. It was hell, the ridicules, the cries and the prayers. The derogatory WhatsApp messages from my friends. It was so horrible that I ended up in a heterosexual relationship, because I wasn’t strong and brave enough to come out. 

I love my family, I really do. However, not all of them will accept me if I do come out. I don’t want to seem weird or out of place. I just want to be like them. I don’t want to censor my social media and plan my Love life is secrecy, because I’m not strong enough to face the consequences. I want to share my frustrations with them, my heart break and joys with them. I have an extended family and they’re the only people I’m really close to, but I feel like an imposter...Like a disappointment irdk how to describe it. 





",lgbt
the news will probably not report it and forget about us but i thought i’d post here. trans people (me on the mic) in berlin went and protested for our rights in front of the us embassy 🌈,,lgbt
All References to Transgender Americans Scrubbed From Government Websites,,lgbt
Experience working with refugees as a trans woman,"Hey all, 

just a little story I wanted to share with all of you, especially with all the BS that’s going on in the UK, the US, Brazil and all over the world. 

I work for an organization that works with refugees in Berlin, Germany. We run shelters, community centers, registration centers etc. and most of our guests and visitors come from predominantly muslim countries, most speak arabic, farsi or russian. They have all kinds of backgrounds, levels of education, age etc. 

I am a visible trans woman, only sometimes pass on first glance from a distance as long as I don’t speak. I have been full time for the last 8 months and on HRT for 6 weeks. I am open about being trans and open about being a lesbian.

Even though from my work experience as well as my academic background, I knew it shouldn’t be too big of an issue, in the beginning I was a scared of presenting as my authentic self, of asking people to call me by my name etc. Even though I knew it was BS, subconsciously the stereotypes and fear mongering still had an effect on me. 

Here is my list of actually bad experiences I have had over the past 8 months, working full time with refugees every day all day:

 

That’s it. I know I have been lucky, I know I am in situations where there is a very clear power imbalance that protects me, I know this is not representative of all similar situations. But this is my lived experience. 

In over 8 Months and thousands of people I worked with, there have not been any actually bad experiences. Some people don’t quite understand right away, some are confused what to call me. A lot of people need a quick explanation because they feel insecure and don’t pick up on what’s going on right away. 

On the other hand, I have been met with an incredible amount of kindness, understanding, support and acceptance. Both from men* and women* and anything in between, from younger and older folks, religious and secular people, the amount of positivity and understanding delights me again and again. 

Women* wearing a hijab take it off in front of me, talk to me like any other women*, mothers let me play with their children, men* are friendly and respectful but treat me in a clearly gendered way, children call my Laura and ask me to braid their hair or play with them. 

All of this is normal. All of this should not be surprising at all. People who have arrived as refugees in the past few years treat me just like people who have been living here longer, who were born here etc. People calling themselves Christian, Muslim or Atheist treat me the same (actually I had to argue with several more people who felt like their (christian) faith gave them the right to question my identity than anything else).

I didn’t write this post because any of the above is special or surprising. But soooooo many people have asked me about my experience, soooooo many people assume I would face discrimination and harassment, homophobia and transmisogyny at a higher level or frequency than with people who aren’t recent refugees, who aren’t of muslim faith, who aren’t people of color. 

Anyways, I just felt like sharing my experience with you, especially in a time like this. 

Be kind to each other and have a lovely day,

Laura",lgbt
Gay jokes done right :),,lgbt
"Woohoo double follow up time! I'm hyped. (My responses are satire, I'm not actually a self-hating bi)",,lgbt
It’s allies week at my school and I got to get one of these. Taped it to my ukulele case since I put my gay pride ribbon on it too.,,lgbt
Two Trans Girls: Travelled Across the Country Broke n Scared,"I just crossed the country from Florida to Utah in an old beat up Corolla with my girlfriend and $30 to my name.

   The trip took about a week in total of non-stop driving, only stopping to sleep in our car and eat. We ended up sleeping in 100°F+ temperatures in Jacksonville with no AC and stayed in Wyoming where it got down to the teens with no heating.

  The past few months have been literal hell on earth. My dad, who before I came out was already very hot-headed and abusive, took a 180° and in March when I told him I was transgender he lost all patience with me. We fought and argued nearly every single day and when my girlfriend came to Florida to stay with me all shit hit the giant, proverbial fan. It started out with lots of yelling and name calling. He always refused to call me Nicole and would purposely call my girlfriend, who is full time trans, ‘boy’ and ‘freak’ and ‘it’ all the fucking time. Stuff started getting out of hand when physical violence started breaking out against me and my girlfriend.

  At first my reaction to him getting in her face was violent and I ended up getting the shit kicked out of me on my birthday this last August. My uncle, who was staying at the house for free while we payed rent, and my father shoved me over the corner of a table which injured my back very severely and made it hard to walk for a couple weeks. I was covered in blood from him punching my face and I was basically bruised everywhere.

   After that I was just angry all the time. I was working 2 jobs when this happened, totalling about 70 hours a week. It was so much stress and anger built up inside me that it still irritates me to this day. About a month later, in September, 2018, we got in another fight. I was paying him to keep me on his insurance since it was cheaper and I was always flat broke due to how much rent he wanted from me and my girlfriend.

   Well, on the 4th he cancelled that insurance and my car was the only way to get to my work since there was no public transportation to it (kinda lived in Nowhere Land, Florida-- not a lot of buses) and it was 20 miles away. I confronted him about it and basically told him he was entrapping me in that house by taking all my money.

   Well, he didn't like that all too much and he ended up pushing and grabbing me again and it started a fight, except this time I won. He ended up calling the cops and they took his side, of course, him being a combat veteran and all. In their eyes I was a 21 year old adult male who was a danger to him. Even though he's the one that's laidlayed his hand on me since I was 9 years old. 

   After I went to jail... my life had basically fallen apart. My girlfriend ended up having to work full time to help support us since the 2 days I spent in jail lost me both of my jobs. A little while after that my car broke down and I was really, really depressed. I ended up trying to swallow a bottle of pills and a bottle of Jack Daniel's after the court dropped the charges on me and my probation ended. Luckily I survived.


 I didn't end up doing it obviously. I thought of a better plan. I ended up filming my dad abusing us and sending it to my girlfriend's mom and brother who live in Utah. Well, nevertheless, they were appalled by what they saw going on to their sister/daughter and me. Her mom told us to pack our things and gtfo of there that night that I sent the videos, so we did. We left that house with the clothes on our backs in a crappy corolla we got in at midnight and never looked back once. We ended up traveling from Florida all the way to Utah with $30 to our names and somehow made it. 

   Well, now that we're here, we still need some help. We came here to make a better life for ourselves but we are flat broke. Like 10 bucks and a pack of skittles broke. I need 32 dollars to get a new ID here in Utah to make it easier to get a decent job out here. Also our car has no gas left and we haven't eaten in about 4 days. I'm starting to feel sick from hunger pains and my girlfriend felt nauseous and dizzy this morning due to the lack of food and being trapped here. We only have till December to move out of here and I'm not sure how we're going to pull that off.

   I've never struggled this hard in my life, it feels like I've started over in a new place without any head start. Literally starting again from nothing. I even had to leave my wig and hormones in Florida and I've felt super dysphoric everyday I've been here. We're looking to get enough money to be able to comfortably get our lives back together and be able to have enough time and energy to look for jobs

   Please repost and share if you can, and thank you for taking the time to read this, Nicole 

We have GoFundMe too set up to help us, if you would like to donate, however posting it in subreddits usually results in a ban.",lgbt
Trump’s attack on trans people should be a wake-up call for the mainstream gay rights movement. The LGBTQ community needs to grapple with its history of excluding its most vulnerable members.,,lgbt
I saw this booth and a healthcare convention last weekend. This makes me sick to my stomach. How about you take some cultural context to scripture and realize that we are not a sin that needs to be eradicated. #WeareNotaSin,,lgbt
Me and my Ash❤️,,lgbt
You guys made our kickstarter a success: most upvoted in a day gets a free game,,lgbt
I thought this picture of my friend’s dog might be something cool for you guys to try and draw! Show me what you got!,,lgbt
Reddit is depressing,"Was scrolling through the world news thread on the new president in Brazil and it's one of the most depressing things to read, I was expecting a crowd of people in controversial in support but such a large portion of people giddy and estatic about the election of such an extreme homophobe (there are other reasons why he's a bad candidate but this is an lgbt sub) I know reddit isn't great with lgbt stuff sometimes but fuck.

Did anyone else feel this way? idk Maybe I'm overreacting or just misinformed or something.",lgbt
Dense as a black hole,,lgbt
Got some lgbtq+ laces for my shoes,,lgbt
Minnesota GOP candidate accused of telling gay high school classmate he should ‘be shot,,lgbt
Protesters unveil pro-trans banner at World Series,,lgbt
My girlfriend and I for Halloween #justfriends?,,lgbt
Gf and I went as Kelly and Yorkie from Black Mirror this year,,lgbt
My bf (23M) is more scared that I (24F) will run off with a girl,"For context: I am the B from lgbt.

My boyfriend from 9 months sometimes 'casually' mentions that I will pull a 'Carol' (for those unfamiliar with Friends, she married a guy but discoveres she is gay in that marriage). He jokingly says it, but he has said it multiple times that I'm starting to think he feels challenged by my bisexuality. Not sure if he feels challenged overall or just by my sexuality, even though I am not even looking at other people. 

Is it me or do guys feel challenged by bi girls?",lgbt
Finally started coming out to my core group of friends! I'm finally out!,"It's been a whirlwind of a weekend. I'm in a college mens fraternity and have found myself to be in a safe enough place to finally start speaking about being queer, but I've hesitantly kept my secret for years from anyone that sees me on a regular basis. 

I took my first international trip this summer and after a few really important growing experiences, I've been realizing that I'm the only one who's keeping me in the closet. So I have challenged myself to start to come out and live authentically with my friends around me. I don't really like the whole ""Hey, I have something I want to tell you"" conversation, so I have had a hard time actually coming out unless I'm asked about it. But given my environment, a room full of frat boys aren't gonna know how to just ask if I was gay. 

But Saturday night comes along and I ended up drinking quite a bit more vodka than I typically allow myself, and I really became acquainted with why they call it liquid courage. Mid black out, I catch myself thinking a little more clearly and I catch what I'm talking about, and I've just clearly outed myself in a room full of my closest friends. I don't really remember exactly how it was received, but I can't help but feel a deep relief and happiness that I'M FINALLY OUT! 

It got better. I never thought it would, but it did. I can't believe I'm out. 

Keep safe, strong, and hopeful.",lgbt
What do I do now?,"I am posting this from a new account cause I don't want my friends to see it. I am 52. My husband , with whom I have been for 23 years left me two years ago over some young guy he fell for. I was devastated and crashed on the inside. I was so hurt and I still am. Driven by insane rage I went to their home after they got married, 10 months ago and I did a huge scene which ended up with them calling the police. I was taken to a cell.  When I went out I was told they hadn't pressed charges against me. Then I went home and tried to hang myself. I was saged by a huge coincidence when a friend of mine that lives in the flat over me heard me come home and stopped by to see me( I don't lock the door during the day and I didn't think to do it then). I was then forced to do therapy and some stupid anti depressants that have 0 effect. I have changed 4 therapists but things still seem as desperate as they were when I first started. They keep telling me some lame clichès or turning every statement I make into a question about ""how did that make you feel"" or some other shit. I feel so broken and alone. How could he just leave me like that, like everything we had meant nothing. And I still love him so fuckin much. And he is out there happy with this new guy and I am thrown away like rubbish. I am so sad honestly.",lgbt
Happiness is only a hair flip away,,lgbt
Coming out,"I don’t know if I should post this here but I feel very conflicted so... Sorry if this ain’t in the right place.

I’m 17M and I’ve accepted that I am gay for the past while now, and I love it! The thing is, I’m not out and I want to.

I’ve told a few close friends and I can be myself around them but others I feel so sheltered. I want to be able to be free but the thought of telling my parents brings a sense of disgust over me for some reason. My family finding out seems so daunting to me and I don’t like it. I feel like I’d be fine with the world knowing.

I feel as though I’ve missed so many oppurtunitys straight people have had because I haven’t been able to experience so many things. Life is so short and I’m scared that once I hit like 30 or something I’ll be undesirable in the community if I don’t have a permanent partner by then. 

I just don’t know how to go about coming out and how to deal with those other thoughts of mot finding someone or being forgotten about. Thank you!",lgbt
How do I come out to my gf,"So for a bit of background, I am 16, 17 in a few weeks, and I think I’m gay, or at least bi. I’ve been in a dedicated relationship for a few months with the best person I have ever known in my entire life. I love her more than anything but I can’t shake this feeling I’m getting. To test the waters a little, I secretly installed Grindr, and spent a few hours on there, chatting with guys and such. Of course this is probably illegal, especially considering I lied about my age to actually get on the app, but I really had to know.

I was turned on, actively. 

So now I face this dilemma, do I come out to my girlfriend, or is this just a hormones thing? In the past we’ve joked about threesomes with other guys and girls and she’s made it very clear that she would not really be into polygamy, especially with a guy.

I don’t know what the fuck to do. ",lgbt
How can I approach girls?,"I'm a Junior is high school and I recently started going to a new school. I'm interested in girls but I don't know how to approach them; I feel like I'll end up hitting on straight girls and come off as creepy. I like to dress very feminine, so when I do flirt with girls, I think they assume that I'm just extra nice. How can I better approach girls that I'm interested in? What are some ways to know if a girl is open to dating other girls?",lgbt
"A$AP ROCKY X TYLER THE CREATOR - POTATO SALAD- how gay can a rap video get, and how oblivious can an audience be?",,lgbt
I just got votekicked off a BF4 server for being gay.,"I know it's a minor thing, and I usually don't let those kinds of things get to me but this really bothered me.

Six individuals voted me off a server after I jokingly replied ""I'm gay, so let me know who does."" When someone said ""If you use grenades you're gay"" in all chat. 
One person voted no, six voted yes. The others didn't vote. 
Just wanted to vent for a bit.",lgbt
My Best Friend is Transphobic and I Don't Know What to Do,"So, first things first, I'm not transgender, but I am bi (she knows this) and a supporter for transgender rights. Also, this may be triggering for some so if you're not comfortable reading this I totally understand and you don't have to help me. And this is going to be really long, so sorry. Excuse any typos. 

I've (F/17) known my friend (F/17), let's call her Cas, doesn't agree with transgenders and the people who fall under that umbrella for some time now, but due to my reluctance and fear of losing Cas as a friend I haven't really brought it up again. It has always bothered me though, to the point where I'm literally thinking about it all the time and getting angry at myself for not doing anything about it. 

Well, recently, I've gotten this crush on a person, let's call them Lee, who is nonbinary and uses they/them pronouns. I really wanted to tell someone about them, but my family is obviously not an option since I don't talk to them about this stuff, so I turned to Cas. I texted her and told her about Lee and that they're nonbinary (they're out) and showed her a picture of them. 

Everything was fine, but as we continued texting, I realized that Cas kept using she/her for Lee even though I told her they use gender neutral pronouns. At first I didn't I say anything; whenever she texted ""she/her"" I just corrected her by sending ""*they/them” back. (This probably isn't important, but we live like an hour away from each other so all of our communication is from text). Over the course of like a week this kept happening without Cas even attempting to correct herself and I got fed up and said ""Girl if you don't start using their correct pronouns I'm gonna shove my foot up your ass."" Yeah yeah I know it's aggressive, but I was really angry and it's not like I was actually gonna shove my foot up her ass. Maybe. 

This is what she texted back, y'all ready? 
""I don’t believe in pronouns and I don’t know her. If I met her I’m not gonna go and call her her I’d just call her by her name but it’s extremely unlikely so I’m not gonna call her something I don’t believe in. She’s clearly a girl""

I just- 

""I dont believe in pronouns""

??? 

Not only is this completely a dick thing to say, but it's also incredibly single minded. I'm gonna bullet point her thoughts below (prepared to be enraged and maybe also a little confused cause you bet your sweet asses I am). 

• She doesn't believe in gender neutral pronouns
• She only believes in he or she
• She doesn't think she needs to use their correct pronouns or take the time to remember 
• If she offends anyone, she won't apologize because she's not sorry
• Just because using their incorrect pronouns makes them uncomfortable doesn't make it wrong 
• She thinks that the fact that people feel the need to feel like a boy or girl based on behavior is pushing a gender inequality agenda and that it's a real problem
• She sees transgenders and nonbinaries are conforming to the stereotypes of how a man or woman are supposed to act
• She thinks people see gender dysphoria and transgender/nonbinary as a trend
• She thinks people shouldn't make changes to their bodies for life; that it's a bad decision, saying people should prioritize long term over short term effects (little background on this one: she's seen videos where people have transitioned and regretted it)

Okay now heres some other stuff she said that is hard for me to understand cause its really long and I have a hard time reading and understanding long texts (which is hypocritical cause this is long, I know). I'm going to just quote here for you. And when I say long, I mean LONG. 

• ""It’s so hard to find good evidence for this bc there has been so little research done for the other side other than the ancient cruel ways that are equivalent to the pray the gay away bs but I’ll explain what I know. So, their brains have an imbalance of estrogen v testosterone that usually fall in line with the 2 genders (why females act more feminine usually and males act more masculine usually). This imbalance is so significant that the male mind is average of female (types of intelligence, instinct, behavior etc) and vice versa. But this shouldn’t be an issue if we take away male and female gender roles. When we put them in, the gender dysphoria is introduced and back then was punished so severely just like sexuality diff. Today in many places in the world and some parts of the US it is still not accepted. If you are more girly/boyish than the gender standards allow you might be stereotyped and ridiculed. Also it’s with going with the crowd. People try to fit in. When you’re not like the other boys and girls that’s another push of “why do I think this? I must be in the wrong body.” There is no wrong body. Now we clearly agree on this. And when they said “my mind is not my body” it is true in a sense but not literally. The right body = what is ideal for their culture and values not actual male and female body which should not matter in line with personality and behavior. Now hormone treatment is something I’ve been trying to look up but in the oppo way. It’s common to treat trans by giving them more of the hormone of their ideal mindset and the oppo gender. What if they put more testosterone in men wanting to be female or estrogen in females that want to be men? And there are other hormones than just those 2 but I’m just gonna use E and T to generalize that group of + female hormones and + male under E and T. I’ve been researching this tactic to see if it’s possible, which it should be since it’s already in your body and you can do the opposite very well and it has great effects even slowing puberty in men and physically changing the body of men by stopping penis, hair, and even causing them to form female nipples. The same goes for more T in women. They get more hair, voice change for both,  boob growth, and both have crucial mood and behavioral changes. Can having more T types of hormones in men with GD and more E types of hormones with GD help? Has it been tried? If you find this info pls let me know bc I think it can be a much better alternative. And ofc therapy has been a large effort for ages, but what about an effective de-GDing that doesn’t help transition to another gender or just complete discrimination and mistreatment of the person for what they think, but getting to the root of why they feel the need to change just bc they have the mind of a “woman”/“man” (it’s in “” bc when I say this I mean the standard of these genders that’s been set for centuries all around the world). Our bodies should not = us as in be ourselves even if it’s not the norm. This type of mindset is promoted for other mental disorders as well. Also having a simplicity of genders is so important. The promotion of “If you feel not you, you need to change” and I mean drastic change of body and/or actions is causing more issues and more mental disorders to diffuse and grow. Kids are literally having identity crises who weren’t confused before or suffering from GD. Like I said. Transitioning etc are short term effects. It’s like a hydra. You cut off one head, then more will pop up. We need to target long term, and this goes for most situations and issues in the world tbh. Too much emphasis and credit is being placed on short term. If I offend anyone so be it. I’m worried about the overall than just certain groups and individuals. I still am looking into everything. What I believe will likely change and be added onto overtime with more info and research being done, but what’s going on rn is not as effective as they say it is. Gender and gender identity are 2 separate things. Gender is simple. Biological. But gender identity is complex and is becoming more complex by avoiding things and creating even more hypotheticals that don’t solve much. Yes peoples feelings and emotions will be hurt, but they already are. You must feel pain to gain. Success rarely comes instantly, if ever, without failures.""

• ""Back to confusion and gender identity crisis: people are being told to be themselves and ignore all biological gender behavior. Not all gender discrimination is bad. Here’s the definition of discrimination cuz discrimination has been thought to be a synonym of oppression (prolonged cruel mistreatment) always. It can be a synonym relating to oppressive prejudice, but it is also the recognition of distinguishing something from another. Men and women are biologically different from our brains to our bodies that relate to capabilities. There’s a large range and some outliers, but again it’s outliers (ex: people with gender dysphoria are outliers biologically bc of the hormones in their brain). This is the minority (also has negative connotation now bc it’s associated with racism and oppression, but it’s not always bad; a minority is simply the smaller portion of a group). Anyways back to the point. Oppressive gender standards are recognized as a problem. But they are generalized to be all gender standards and gender discrimination actually is a better term for what I’m trying to say. So, recognition of our physical and mental capacities in relation to common gender traits or uncommon gender traits is okay. But the oppression of being different is not. But they are being treated as one and the same. We should accept ourselves and our differences, similarities, strengths, and weaknesses. By ignoring gender all together, the intent is again to ignore the standards and oppression, but it’s also pushing back a part of your identity. You may be ok but it’s not going to last forever. Plus you influence others around you and which is what is most worrisome. Young people are ignoring their bodily needs. They need to recognize their gender to treat their bodies right. It’s why women have periods and men don’t. Why men and women grow at different rates etc. Pronouns should not be offensive. That means that if you’re so offended by a simple pronoun, how will you handle recognizing it for what you need to have a healthy body (physically and mentally). There are different requirements for what we should eat, drink, do etc bc of gender biologically. It’s good to be separating oppressive  standards from gender, but you must be able to recognize it as well. Pronouns are so insignificant. Who you are is not a pronoun. Who you are is you.""

I'm not asking you guys to explain what she meant, but I added them cause you guys probably will be able to read all of that without your brain immediately shutting off and that bitch takes forever to reboot.  

And I know this may be weird, but I'm offended in a way. I'm, of course, offended for transgender/nonbinary people, but I'm also kind of taking this personally. I tell her I have a crush on Lee and if I actually do anything about it they could end up my significant other, and she can't even respect me or Lee enough to use their pronouns. And she knows I'm part of the LGBT+ community, but she doesn't even try to look at this from the other person's perspective. I don't know, I feel like I'm being kind of selfish there. 

Anyway, what do you guys think I should do? I've already discussed each bullet point with her, but she's still adament about her opinions. To be honest, as part of the LGBT+ community and just being an ally in general, I don't know if I'm comfortable with still being her friend. The problem is that we've been best friends for seven years and she's literally my only friend (that is not an exaggeration; the only people I talk to are her and my family. Yes I'm aware that's sad, don't @ me). I don't know if I'm ready to let that go, but I'm starting to think it's the only thing left to do, because she's incredibly stubborn in general and I know I can't change her mind about this.  

Also, she's kind of weird about LGBT+ in general, like she says she's fine with LGB, but just the things she says sometimes and I get this vibe from her. Not going to go into depth with that as this is already too long. 

I just think that if a person is happy and they're not hurting anyone, including themselves, then good for them. ",lgbt
Sooooo lgbtqia+ people could get excluded from the 2020 census,"The federal government is attempting to make it so that when the 2020 census comes around, lgbtqia+ people are excluded. We should do something about that.
https://www.google.co.uk/url?sa=t&amp;source=web&amp;rct=j&amp;url=https://www.them.us/story/census-will-not-count-lgbtq-americans/amp&amp;ved=2ahUKEwjpnZqW2qveAhWrLsAKHaK8C_8QFjABegQICRAB&amp;usg=AOvVaw3Uwc0w9GkwJz1BlYPUe71w&amp;ampcf=1",lgbt
Family privacy issues regarding the internet [Rant],"So hello, r/LGBT, I'm Amber. I have an issue that I partially want whatever input I can get on and also just wanting to lowkey whine about it, and since r/LGBTeens kept removing my post, so I’m here. So here goes.

Ever since I got a iPod in middle school, pretty much my parents and brother have been, to say the least, monitoring me. They've been doing so beforehand too of course, listening in to verbal conversations when my friends were over, even real late at night. Now, of course, I understand that it's important for there to be limits and trust and stuff and it's okay for them to check in to make sure I'm not being harassed or catfished or something by some weird stranger or having/sending nudes, but this evolved into a very, very different category.

Since I was younger I knew that they did this and got a bit paranoid. I never did much wrong, like I didn't do anything of the above, but they still lectured and punished me for things that maybe weren't totally wrong, like dark jokes or me cursing in texts every now and then, but of course this was relatively reasonable as I was younger. But it's continued a lot now.

I know my parents still check my phone every now and then because every few days I check my open apps and see just about all of them. They check my images, deleted and otherwise, all of my apps (even the games) and search history. Luckily I'm asexual so they haven't seen any porn yet, but at the same time, I'm (probably) trans and that's mostly what this is about.

A little but ago I started using Discord to communicate with a few online friends, people that I'm relatively emotionally close to but still remain cautious with (I don't share last name, the state I live in, age, anything like that). I tended to emotionally rely on these people a lot, as well as bringing my real life friends into the group, and my parents started to realize that I wasn't having conversations on iMessage anymore. After a while I came out to my friends as trans over there with the help of one of my trans friends and THIS is where things get messy.

I had to start deleting discord every now and then because I knew my parents wouldn't approve of me being trans. They got more and more in-depth with their checking, literally randomly grabbing my phone out of my hands sometimes, instantly getting suspicious when I type for more than two minutes and checking, forcing me to hand it over whenever I laugh at anything (usually stupid memes). Finally, once they figured out what I was using to communicate, in the middle of the school day I found my discord pretty much hacked by them. Now keep in mind due to just general paranoia and how they acted towards LGBT people, etc, this was my nightmare, literally, I had actually had nightmares about this.

I got my friends to kick me from sensitive channels but they still found out. Later that week my mom forcibly outed me to my family, told me to never talk to any people online, which is the biggest fuck-you I've ever received because my brother is underage just like me and he MET his damn girlfriend online and went to her in person, which is a big-ass no-go for me. And not just that, but they (mostly my mom) read things that she had no business in, regarding people I cared about. Relationship issues, personal secrets, insecurities, all of those things my friends TRUSTED me to keep private and secret were instantly known by my whole family. Hell, my mother still brings up those things in conversation. And whenever I try to ask her to be a little less invasive, just a little less, mind you, and I have tried, she always hits me with the same thing: ""Why, do you have something to hide?"" And the answer is three things: yes, but I don't say that, and also that even if I didn't I'd still be pissed as hell and offended at what is basically an insult to my intelligence, and lastly, I guarantee she wouldn't like it if i did the same thing. What's even worse is that just about any time I bring it up she instantly gets suspicious as hell and usually takes my phone minutes after and is on full hawk mode for the rest of the week.

And worst part is, I haven't even gotten any progression. My parents don't want me to transition and will make my life hell for attempting to do so. My brother's an absolute ass about it saying that he's disgusted I'm trans, or, in his definition, a ""mentally ill faggot"".

So now whenever I text or type or reference something about communication my mother instantly perks up and goes all ""you haven't been going to \*\*Discord\*\* have you, \*\*Nathan\*\*?"" And of course, even though it's true and I have been, I have to say no, because I can't take everyone's secrets being public in my family life again, and I can't handle my parents being so disgusted or disappointed even though they pretend to be okay and willing to give me a choice even though I've HEARD their conversations late at night about how I'm not, I'm faking, it's just a phase.

And lastly? My brother, holy hell. He follows all my social media accounts, regularly checks my post and comment and like history and BRINGS UP to me things he disagrees with, while constantly being nitpicky about everything ever. I've tried blocking him but he makes more alts, and this is why this alternate account of mine EXISTS (even though I'm not sure if he sees this one or not). He also saw me use Discord once while peeking over my shoulder that he does every five seconds and LOVES to ""offhand"" mention me using it as loudly as possible so my parents find out but so he can also pass it as an accident.  And now I have to walk on eggshells around his (easily angered) ass and can't call him out on being an absolute sadistic douchebag without him ""accidentally"" leaking that I still use it or my post history, which he STATED he will do if I ""piss him off"". Luckily he hasn't done shit yet, but FUCK, I'm just getting salty talking about it right here.

&amp;#x200B;

Anyway, rant over, Amber out. If y'all have any advice or ways how to get my family as a whole to get the hell off my back I'd gladly take it, but thanks for reading even if you don't.",lgbt
Activists Unfurl Huge Pro-Transgender Banner @ World Series,,lgbt
"Artist Doug TenNapel, creator of cult classic PC game The Neverhood, has a long history of being anti-LGBT, so let’s work together to make his character Klayman into a gay icon just to spite him",,lgbt
An adorable story of penguins proving how same sex couples are natural and can be great parents.,,lgbt
Coming out fail,I recently changed my credit card background picture to a rainbow and my parents were questioning me on why and I said because I like rainbows and I also support the lgbtq community and then they asked if I’m apart of the community and nerves got the best of me and I stupidly said no :/ It sucks because I’ve been wanting to tell them for a while and this was like the perfect opportunity ,lgbt
I did something...,"I was on the bus and it stopped at this stop and the guy was walking past and he was wearing a shirt that said “Vote No” which is in reference to the Australian Marriage equality vote that happened a little while back... as soon as I saw it I stuck up my middle finger at him, he saw it and did the same back. Idk if that was right or wrong but like seeing that asshole in that shirt sort of put me in a shitty mood. What do you guys think? ",lgbt
Made a video on LGBT acceptance in Japan,,lgbt
The Haven: Mental Health Support on Discord,"**The Haven Support Network** consists of two servers: The Haven and Haven Retreat. Both offer first-person general mental health support. We are also a nonprofit organization 501(c)3. The Haven has about 4600 members and Retreat has about 1800. We also have an Instagram (@thehavenmh) with 11k followers.

**The Haven** is 18+ and you must be living with or suspect you are living with mental illness.
**Haven Retreat** is 13+ and everyone is welcome to seek emotional support. 

We are heavily modded and aim to maintain a safe space. We have an active community with diverse interests and diagnoses. We do not allow mental health professionals to “treat” folks in our servers.

Our focus is on support, so we have many support channels in which you can talk 1:1 with a support volunteer. We have topic channels for creativity, physical health, meme-spam, group support, and a daily-prompt for writing exercises. 

We are now **partnered with PsychCentral**. You can find us at: &lt;https://forums.psychcentral.com/the-haven/&gt; 

**The Haven**: Care when you need it, care for others when you can.

https://www.thehaven.support/

https://discord.gg/r2zA8UU &lt;== Retreat, 13+

https://discord.gg/qQVZAKJ &lt;== 18+ with mental illness

",lgbt
Anti-LGBT Far-Right candidate Jair Bolsonaro to become next president of Brazil,,lgbt
"Casually mentioned my female crush to my parents, it went better than expected","I have a crush on a girl who's not ready for a relationship yet, but we're still friends. We're cool as friends, and I'm not hurt that I was kindly rejected.

My cousin recently got a boyfriend and she's been gushing over him. I'm happy for her, but my mom is just reminding me that since she has a boyfriend, ""when are you getting yours?"" She's acting like this because my cousin is 3 weeks older than me, so we're practically the same age

I've come out as lesbian to her before, but she shut me down and said to ""be more open minded"" and not limit myself to girls. (Mom how about you be more open minded instead of limiting yourself to guys? Yeah that's what I thought)

So when my mom brought my cousin's relationship up again, I tell her ""I got rejected from my crush, okay? I'm trying."" When my mom asked why, I said ""SHE said SHE wasn't ready for a relationship."" 

My mom hasn't bothered me since, and whenever I mention guys around my (very protective) dad, he seems a bit calmer knowing that I'm not into them.

Sorry for this long post, I just wanted to vent and maybe hear thoughts and advice from other Redditors. Thanks xx",lgbt
Bad Halloween idea.,"How do I convince my straight friend that dressing up as a gay guy, isn’t an acceptable Halloween costume? ",lgbt
I just wanted to show you guys this progresive song :),,lgbt
BBC Twink,Subscribe/ follow/share,lgbt
Sad moment for Brazil but now it's time to fight,,lgbt
Rant: Family violating internet and general privacy,"So hello, r/LGBT, I'm Amber. I have an issue that I partially want whatever input I can get on and also just wanting to lowkey whine about it, plus I tried to post this on r/LGBTeens and they blocked it, sooo...here goes.

Ever since I got a iPod in middle school, pretty much my parents and brother have been, to say the least, monitoring me. They've been doing so beforehand too of course, listening in to verbal conversations when my friends were over, even real late at night. Now, of course, I understand that it's important for there to be limits and trust and stuff and it's okay for them to check in to make sure I'm not being harassed or catfished or something by some weird stranger or having/sending nudes, but this evolved into a very, very different category.

Since I was younger I knew that they did this and got a bit paranoid. I never did much wrong, like I didn't do anything of the above, but they still lectured and punished me for things that maybe weren't totally wrong, like dark jokes or me cursing in texts every now and then, but of course this was relatively reasonable as I was younger. But it's continued a lot now.

I know my parents still check my phone every now and then because every few days I check my open apps and see just about all of them. They check my images, deleted and otherwise, all of my apps (even the games) and search history. Luckily I'm asexual so they haven't seen any porn yet, but at the same time, I'm (probably) trans and that's mostly what this is about.

A little but ago I started using Discord to communicate with a few online friends, people that I'm relatively emotionally close to but still remain cautious with (I don't share last name, the state I live in, age, anything like that). I tended to emotionally rely on these people a lot, as well as bringing my real life friends into the group, and my parents started to realize that I wasn't having conversations on iMessage anymore. After a while I came out to my friends as trans over there with the help of one of my trans friends and THIS is where things get messy.

I had to start deleting discord every now and then because I knew my parents wouldn't approve of me being trans. They got more and more in-depth with their checking, literally randomly grabbing my phone out of my hands sometimes, instantly getting suspicious when I type for more than two minutes and checking, forcing me to hand it over whenever I laugh at anything (usually stupid memes). Finally, once they figured out what I was using to communicate, in the middle of the school day I found my discord pretty much hacked by them. Now keep in mind due to just general paranoia and how they acted towards LGBT people, etc, this was my nightmare, literally, I had actually had nightmares about this.

I got my friends to kick me from sensitive channels but they still found out. Later that week my mom forcibly outed me to my family, told me to never talk to any people online, which is the biggest fuck-you I've ever received because my brother is underage just like me and he MET his damn girlfriend online and went to her in person, which is a big-ass no-go for me. And not just that, but they (mostly my mom) read things that she had no business in, regarding people I cared about. Relationship issues, personal secrets, insecurities, all of those things my friends TRUSTED me to keep private and secret were instantly known by my whole family. Hell, my mother still brings up those things in conversation. And whenever I try to ask her to be a little less invasive, just a little less, mind you, and I have tried, she always hits me with the same thing: ""Why, do you have something to hide?"" And the answer is three things: yes, but I don't say that, and also that even if I didn't I'd still be pissed as hell and offended at what is basically an insult to my intelligence, and lastly, I guarantee she wouldn't like it if i did the same thing. What's even worse is that just about any time I bring it up she instantly gets suspicious as hell and usually takes my phone minutes after and is on full hawk mode for the rest of the week.

And worst part is, I haven't even gotten any progression. My parents don't want me to transition and will make my life hell for attempting to do so. My brother's an absolute ass about it saying that he's disgusted I'm trans, or, in his definition, a ""mentally ill faggot"".

So now whenever I text or type or reference something about communication my mother instantly perks up and goes all ""you haven't been going to \*\*Discord\*\* have you, \*\*Nathan\*\*?"" And of course, even though it's true and I have been, I have to say no, because I can't take everyone's secrets being public in my family life again, and I can't handle my parents being so disgusted or disappointed even though they pretend to be okay and willing to give me a choice even though I've HEARD their conversations late at night about how I'm not, I'm faking, it's just a phase.

And lastly? My brother, holy hell. He follows all my social media accounts, regularly checks my post and comment and like history and BRINGS UP to me things he disagrees with, while constantly being nitpicky about everything ever. I've tried blocking him but he makes more alts, and this is why this alternate account of mine EXISTS (even though I'm not sure if he sees this one or not). He also saw me use Discord once while peeking over my shoulder that he does every five seconds and LOVES to ""offhand"" mention me using it as loudly as possible so my parents find out but so he can also pass it as an accident.  And now I have to walk on eggshells around his (easily angered) ass and can't call him out on being an absolute sadistic douchebag without him ""accidentally"" leaking that I still use it or my post history, which he STATED he will do if I ""piss him off"". Luckily he hasn't done shit yet, but FUCK, I'm just getting salty talking about it right here.

&amp;#x200B;

Anyway, rant over, Amber out. If y'all have any advice or ways how to get my family as a whole to get the hell off my back I'd gladly take it, but thanks for reading even if you don't.",lgbt
I just need to hear that it’s ok to be gay.,"A lifetime of religious indoctrinated homophobia has me hating myself even though I’ve been in a happy, committed same-sex relationship for several years.  My soul is craving love and affirmation and I wish I could hear a hundred people say my sexuality is beautiful. ",lgbt
My first time dressing up for halloween ^_^,"So Ill try to keep it short and sweet but my name’s emma and Im mtf pre op/hormones and I guess technically this is the first time id actually went all out with a wig and everything. Id gotten assaulted late last month and have been consistently yelled at with my mom and brother and relationships with them a whole nother post. But after all of this had been laid down on me I’d just let the tears dry on their own and keep my head up and instead of what I was planning for my b-day next month (which was just gonna be a wig) but just said fuck the anxiety and just bought this corset/skirt outfit and couple hundred dollars later this is the result and my night last night didn’t go as planned, But I had an amazing time with a couple new friends I came out to. So felt Id write this long and sour summary of where I am. And always an avid lurker on this subreddit. So I have been Emma and Ill answer whatever questions or whatever but just wanted to finally [share myself with ya’ll. #ForThemyscira](https://imgur.com/a/w0k6IZw)Also planning on some nice greaves from etsy eventually if they can custom make them or might pick up leather work to make shoes for my gross hobbit feetses xD)

P.S. please forgive any sloppiness on my makeup. I don’t normally do nude looks. And was in a very big rush. ",lgbt
I'm confused,"This is my first post here and I'm kind of upset it has to be a big vent. I'll give you some background information before diving into the problem.

I'm not exactly as old as some of the people on here. I'm only 13, I'm biologically female and as long as I can remember I've been saying I'm male. I live with my grandparents and they've always rejected the idea of me being trans. They were completely against it so I gave up and just let the feeling sit with me as I became more and more uncomfortable.

When I was 9, I went to Comic Con and was sat at the bar with my auntie, uncle and cousin and the conversation stuck up about gender identity, since my uncle is a mental health worker. I took the opportunity to come out as trans to them and they were very accepting and caring. They asked me what I wanted to change my name to and I chose Timothy because of the name of my favourite character from a game I like. They told me to bring it up with my grandparents, so I did as soon as I got home a few days later. They told me to stop lying and to stop hiding behind all the characters I like and just be me.

(This is dragging and I'm sorry) When I turned 11, I was so uncomfortable with my gender and my looks that I started to wear masks. I wore them 24/7 - even when I went to school I refused to take it off. It became clear to everyone that I had a problem with myself that needed a solution. I had very few close friends and I'd lost family members, making it even worse trying to show my face in public. I decided that my grandparents would never accept me and decided to come out as lesbian, which helped for a little while, but the feeling of being uncomfortable never left me.

I got with a girl when I came into secondary school, year 7 in May and I was confident to start with. She was the light of my life and she helped me get over my mask phase, but she became abusive later on and my confidence was, again, completely shattered. I left her and was broken. I had come out to her as trans and she had told me that I was just looked for attention from her. I finally came home sobbing to my grandparents that I wanted to die. I told them I've attempted to off myself more than once, I'd been self-harming and was done with life. They finally realised that they were wrong and I got my hair cut and my name changes within school to Leon, which I'm currently known as.

I'm sorry that dragged on, and you probably haven't read to here, but I have a problem. I'm getting confused again and uncomfortable with who I am.

I have a new girlfriend and she is 100% supportive of my transition. She helps me put on my binder, she shaves the side of my head when it needs doing, she helps me look more manly - everything I could ever want. But the one thing she can't stop is the constant bullying at school and in the streets. I get thrown slurs the second I leave the house, like ""trannie"" and ""freak"". I could cope with it but I got messaged over Instagram by another trans boy, saying I was confused and needed to stop myself.

I don't know whether he was right or not... I don't know what to think anymore. I'm scared, I'm crying, and I don't know whether if I turn back now, I'd even be accepted as a woman again. Can I please have some advice? I'm sorry this dragged on, I just needed to vent before I hurt myself again.",lgbt
Horror Queer posts for LGBTQ horror fans,"Hi Reddit,

&amp;#x200B;

I wanted to highlight a biweekly series of LGBTQ horror articles that my buddy Trace and I write for Bloody Disgusting called Horror Queers. We alternate between serious queer criticism and ""off-cycle"" selections that are more campy, silly or have a strong queer following. If you're interested, please join the conversation!  

Here's the latest piece on a weird Fleming Troma film, Rabid Grannie: [https://bloody-disgusting.com/editorials/3529209/horror-queers-talking-troma-bad-movies-juvenile-humor-rabid-grannies/](https://bloody-disgusting.com/editorials/3529209/horror-queers-talking-troma-bad-movies-juvenile-humor-rabid-grannies/)",lgbt
Would it be odd for a straight person to go to a gay pride event (or alike) ?,,lgbt
I'd like to know what this sub thinks of this upcoming netflix show.,,lgbt
LGBTQ online safety guide,"The place I wok for created this [super-helpful, comprehensive guide](http://bit.ly/LGBTO-Online-Safety-Guide) to help our community stay safe online. Whether it's safe sexting, online-dating or simply using the internet while trans/non-binary/asexual etc.

Please share this to help keep your friends (and yourself!) safe - our world doesn't always help with that.

[http://bit.ly/LGBTO-Online-Safety-Guide](http://bit.ly/LGBTO-Online-Safety-Guide)

&amp;#x200B;

https://i.redd.it/dk5s3lony4v11.jpg",lgbt
Non-binary songwriter Kaitlyn Alexander's first single and music video,,lgbt
I have some (probably ignorant) questions about trans people. I want to learn.,"Just a little background, I'm an advocate for lgbt rights (because ykno I'm a decent human) but I was raised very religious and indoctrinated with all that bullshit (gay people are gross, trans people are ill, etc) but throughout high school I started becoming more liberal within my religion and ended up leaving the religion entirely about a year ago. Now I'm a super happy atheist and I'm really passionate about being a voice for good now, but I want to be educated about the communities so I can be the best ally I can.

My biggest question is this: is transgender about gender or sex? I know that it's essentially being a different sex between the ears than between the legs, but it seems in my experience like it's more about gender expression, or not falling into a gender role.

If there were no female/male gender roles (men were just as comfortable being nurturing as being strong, women were just as accepted as leaders as as followers and mommies, every store was unisex and men wore dresses sometimes and women wore ties sometimes and there were no gendered toys and everything was for everyone) would you still feel like you were born with the wrong anatomy? Is it something everyone in the trans community even agrees on?  For instance, if you're mtf, do you think youd feel the exact same about yourself if you could dress and present yourself as a woman without anyone giving a damn? 

Can you be transgender but, like, cissexual? Where you present as the opposite gender but have no desire to change your anatomy?

I am trying to be blatant and clear, but I want yall to know I harbor no animosity or judgement. I want you guys to be accepted as you are, and I think a big part of that is asking questions so I can understand better. If anything was unclear or rude, let me know and I'll try to clarify.",lgbt
I’m confused about something...,"So, as many of you may know, in the USA, Trump is trying to abolish all trans rights. Now, this is horrible and all, but I’m confused about one thing.

Living in a pretty liberal state, I actually haven’t met any hardcore transphobes irl. I’m insanely lucky for that, even as a cishet, but I haven’t been able to ask a question that’s been on my mind for a while. I’m confused what the argument against trans rights is. Like, trans people existing doesn’t affect cis people at all. I honestly don’t know any arguments against trans people. Could some of you let me know what transphobes say, so in the future, if I ever meet one, I’ll be prepared, and know how to respond?",lgbt
Hmmm,,lgbt
Will children become naturally homophobic or respectful to gay people if we don't teach them anything about LGBT at all like in Russia nor teach them to hate LGBT?,,lgbt
Went to a Halloween party as Maggie (Walking Dead),,lgbt
Israelis: What do you think of gay people coming to Israel? [beautiful answers],,lgbt
I feel really alone,"My father told me that he doesn’t care that I’m bi, he still thinks non straight marriage is “ridiculous”, mom thinks that it’s just “an opinion” to be an homophobe. 

Grandmother is definitely homophobic (and racist... and a woc btw), my dad doesn’t know my other sibling is gay (his only other child). 

I’m in my early 20’s and have no idea what to do, I have so many friends from the lgbtq community, now I fear they will get killed in my country, people I care so much about. I see myself as queer but I feel weird being open about it on social media still... because the rest of my family is homophobe and they talk a lot.

I was so happy planning to go to Pride next year (for the very first time), now I just feel hurt and scared.

I hate my life right now, sorry if this is too much of a rant everyone.",lgbt
I used to be very homophonic.,"I was raised in a family that wasn’t too open to anyone being anything other than 100% totally straight, I used to follow suit. The thought of a gay person at the time made me uncomfortable. Thankfully my family, and I, have become much more accepting, however this has only happened within the past year or so. I was open about this homophobia to other people at the time. The problem is, I now have multiple gay (actually one is bi I think) friends, I don’t want them to hear about the things that I said and get the wrong idea, I also don’t want friends of mine to think that I’m still that way. Any suggestions on what to do?",lgbt
Is this flirting?,"There is a girl I have a crush on at school. She randomly hugs me every now and again. She grabs my hand when wants to show me something. She puts her legs on my lap. When I put my legs on her lap, she stokes my leg. I do that too sometimes. She also sat on my lap twice. She always tries to make me smile and laugh. I know she likes girls. She knows I am pan. She is gorgeous, but I am less than par. But, is she flirting with me?",lgbt
The fascist won,,lgbt
"Valentina, Vanessa Hudgens and Tinashe to Star in 'Rent' on Fox",,lgbt
What's it like to be trans?,"I've heard all about what's going on with Trump. It breaks my heart that he wants to erase the identities of human beings like that. However, I have a question. As a cis male aroace, I want some perspective. What's it like being trans?

Sorry if this is rude or inappropriate. I just want to support my LGBT brothers and sisters and in between. :)",lgbt
[Advice] What To Do With A Insta Crush,"Hey there r/LGBT. 😄 I'm a 18M and bi. My post got removed on r/LGBTeens for some reason so I decided to post it here instead since I really need advice. (Also, for context, I am from Malaysia, a homophobic country). 

So basically, I have a crush on this local guy that I literally stalked on Instagram. Long story short, he's openly gay. (Thankfully,coz all of my previous male crushes have been straight or closeted). I sort of knew him through my cousin sister's friend, who sort of hooked up with him previously. (And my cousin sister knows him).

He's kind of a huge achiever tbh (which impresses me a lot). And the fact that he's kind of smart, and doesn't let state-sanctioned homophobia get to him really impresses me tbh. Judging from that, I think we'd get along pretty well tbh.

Only thing is, he's studying in another country.  (He's 20, I'm 18). Question is, how do I even begin talking to him without sounding like a pretentious stalker? I mean he is kind of cute and all. But is there no chance of me to know him at all? Even as a friend or role model? I'm lost and confused tbh. Really would love some advice on this.

TL;DR: I have a crush on someone (a local) studying overseas. How do I initiate contact with him? (since I admire him as a person and also have a crush on him too)
",lgbt
At a rugby party last night. Still no princess for the Bud Knight though. Dilly dilly! 🍺,,lgbt
"Oh, you're Trans? Then why don't you look like this?",,lgbt
"I always imagine myself having a relationship with a woman, but I know it’ll never happen because of my conservative parents.",,lgbt
If LGBT+ was an option then tell me why did people from anti-LGBT+ country run away from their country? (repost: last post was accidentally removed),,lgbt
I want a girlfriend,I sure love being a starved and desperate queer girl in a mainly heterosexual enviroment wooooo. Can anyone else relate? I just needed to vent lmao.,lgbt
People Standing for what is right and getting your voices heard. #WontBeErased protest in solidarity with trans and inter people in the US - and everywhere - in front of the US embassy in Berlin. Photo Cred: Charlotte,,lgbt
Definitely more,,lgbt
"What are you all's honest, uncensored thoughts on this rap I made with my struggles about understanding my sexuality? I normally think with a certain mindset until I get snapped out of it by a person looking in from the outside. Link below. Hope you enjoy!",,lgbt
Polish schools cancel LGBT tolerance day under govt pressures,,lgbt
I'm a lesbian - with a crush on a boy,"I'm going to need some advice.

For a while now, I've identified as lesbian, as I am pretty sure I am sexually attracted to girls. However, for a few months, I've had a crush on a boy. He makes my heart melt and I really want to date him. Now I'm confused. I don't think I'm sexually attracted to him, but now I'm doubting myself. ",lgbt
Part 3 of my trans documentary series - Trans Voices: Nate's Story,,lgbt
WTF - US Votes Against UN Resolution Banning Gay Death Penalty,,lgbt
What is the process of finding out that one is a homosexual?,"Just to add clarification, I’m a straight male, but I support gay rights. I was just curious about what people go through when realizing that they are gay. I don’t really have any gay friends (that I know of) to ask this question to. How do you realize you aren’t straight? 

Thanks for any responses! ",lgbt
"My friends and I went as the Fab 5 from Netflix's Queer Eye for Halloween. Tan France, Bobby Berk and Karamo Brown approved!",,lgbt
In my first Gay relationship,"Hey so basically it’s simple. 

I’m 29 y/o  Cis male in my first relationship with another dude.  And I’ve only ever dated women.  I haven’t dated anyone since I broke off my engagement with my ex girlfriend 6 years ago.  I don’t really know what I’m doing and I’ve got a lot of emotions that I’m not sure how to process. fears, concerns, hopes and dream type stuff and I was hoping someone out there would have some advice or anecdotes that would be useful for me to keep track of. 


Tl:dr.  I’m in my first gay relationship and I’m rusty with dating in general.  Any random piece of advice would be nice. ",lgbt
The synagogue shooting happened during a ceremony for a gay couple’s kids,,lgbt
"Maybe I'm just Naïve, but Apparently /r/PublicFreakout is Transphobic too",,lgbt
A dumb question about identity,"Hi, sorry if this isn't allowed. I will post in another sub if recommended. 

Basically I'm struggling with my identity, as I always have. I was born as a cisgender female. I don't want to be male. Being called ""sir"" accidentally makes my skin crawl. But I don't exactly feel like a ""ma'am"". I feel like I'm more towards the middle of the spectrum. Still very ok with female pronouns but don't really feel like a true woman. 

Is this along the lines of agender or just an androgynous female? Is it even an LGBT issue? Am I considered queer for this? Or am I just a tomboy plain and simple? 

I'm trying to read as much as I can on the subject but I feel stuck until I can pin a label onto myself (I hate labels). 

Thank you.",lgbt
Don't know what to do?,"I'm a bi girl, with a preference for girls. My whole family thinks I'm this goodie-two-shoes Christian straight girl. I hate feeling like I'm living a lie when I see them. I feel so bad about it, it's hard for me to even talk at family gatherings. I can't come out to them because they're Christian and my mom said she would send me to counseling with a preacher if I was gay. My other family members talk about how gays are gross and one of them even said that I couldn't see my baby cousins if I was gay. When I was younger I hated gays (even though in the back of my mind I felt like I was gay, it was so toxic that I would force myself to have a stomach ache when I looked at girls) because my preacher said it's against god and they all go to hell. But that's beside the point, I feel like I'm living a lie and I don't know what to do about it, any advice?",lgbt
Are you in the green?,,lgbt
"From Brazil to the US, Fight for Trans Rights",,lgbt
Self made bowsette! I know not the super crown :| but happy with how it turned out. Goes out to all the other bowsettes in community &lt;3,,lgbt
We need these in every pride parade,,lgbt
local gendervoid gremlin here to wish you a happy sunday!! i hope you all have a fantastic day and rest of your week! (he/him),,lgbt
"This is how I found out my nephew knows and accepts that I am gay (Minecraft) it says “This is the place where the greats come to meet; this is the place where victory is found; this is a place where [you’re] welcome no matter if [you’re] gay, trans, lesbian and straight; we accept you.” He is 13.",,lgbt
I need help,"Ok so I am literally shit scared right now. I am 15 years old and live in Dunblane, Scotland 🏴󠁧󠁢󠁳󠁣󠁴󠁿. I recently (10 minutes ago) came out as gay to my entire class of 180 and school of 1035 people. My Snapchat (70+ notifications) is currently going ape shit and ive no idea how to answer any of their questions. This is not helped by my 16 psychological disorders including depression. Can someone please help me know what to do right now before I panic and do something stupid again.",lgbt
How do bi or queer women feel about dating men who are shorter and more effeminate than they are?,"Sorry for being heteronormative.

And i totally understand that it's totally on an individual basis but i was just curious how bi or queer women would find a man who is a lot shorter than they are and possess non-masculine qualities?",lgbt
Coming out,"I am a non binary trans male, and im happy that I have this platform to come out on. ",lgbt
Literally every time,,lgbt
Cupioflux Neon Moodboard,,lgbt
A Ranty Type Question," 

Hello everyone!

I'm a closeted 20 year old Bi guy. Of late I've kinda been noticing that even though Women show interest in me(not bragging lol) I somehow seem to reject them and not consider any idea of a relationship. I'm mostly into Women but like Men too especially Dick( Sorry if it's TMI lol). When I decided to think about why the reason I avoid women and getting into a relationship with them...I narrowed it down mostly to ""acceptance""...which brings me to my question.

​

I'm quite dominant with women and I like it but I dont know what it is about Men specially Dick that makes me want to be soooo submissive (Sorry for tmi again lol). My question is...are there Women out there that might find this attractive or sexy? I dont want someone to just ""accept"" this part...I want a Woman to be excited by this and for us to explore this together. I want someone to be excited about my ""submissive"" side and not just merely ""accept"" it as if it were a crime. Are there dominant women who get turned on by a switch Bi guy and the idea of exploration together in this world? :/",lgbt
Does your sexuality only depend on what you're sexually attracted to ?,"I've been gay for maybe the past 10 years. I knew I liked guys when I was in 2nd grade and I knew I didn't like girls when I was in 4th grade. However, I didn't know what gay was at the time so I thought that guys were supposed to be with girls even if they didn't like them. I grew out of the mindset towards the end of 7th grade when I finally came out. I never had a boyfriend nor have ever kissed a guy either. I had 2 girlfriends and kissed 3 girls. I have never felt sexually attracted to a girl  and only to guys. I have had close encounters with guys; something simple like a hug or holding hands for a few seconds where I would have this strange feeling that I never felt before (at least with my encounters with a girl). Last week, someone questioned me and asked if I'm even sure if I'm gay and how would I know if I don't have any experience (romantic or sexual) with a guy and I always thought that gay porn was a good enough justification to my sexuality but... is it really ? ",lgbt
My partner and I gaying up a teen fave for Halloween,,lgbt
The lgbt does not approve,,lgbt
"Investment Fund and Business Accelerator for Transgender and Non-Binary People - $250,000 available for great business ideas",,lgbt
"Anyone know any good short hair cuts, that fit on people with round faces?",,lgbt
How do you take measurements for a GC2B Binder?,"Please, explain as simple as possible? I'm really bad at comprehension.",lgbt
Pride section in the movie list on my air canada flight!,,lgbt
oh honey,,lgbt
"After years of nothing, I've finally formed the transbian couple of my dreams.",,lgbt
"Always remember that you are valid. Let no one take your happiness, be out and be yourself! 🌈",,lgbt
lgbt YouTubers ?,any recommendations for lgbt YouTubers?,lgbt
The Blue Wave Is Not Enough (But We Are!),,lgbt
The scottish boy - fundraiser for queer medieval fiction book by alex de campi &amp; illustrated by trungles,,lgbt
Honestly just super confused and need advice / guidance.,Could someone message me? It's a really complicated situation and I don't know of anyone I can talk to about it that would understand. ,lgbt
Naruto speaks his thoughts,,lgbt
Questioning my gender and sexuality and I dont know what to do,"Hi , I'm a 20 year old from England and recently I started to seriously question my gender identity and sexuality. It started a few months ago but I tried putting it to the back of my mind until just over a week ago it caused me have a serious period of anxiety. I'm hoping that here I can find people that have gone through a similar thing to talk to while I discover myself",lgbt
Butterfly,I have watched the 3 part series Butterfly on UK tv. I wanted to ask any trans people if they saw it if it was like their story ,lgbt
Do people ever realize your gay before you come out?,I don’t know if I’m just gay or bi at this moment. Im still in the closet and I wonder if my friends or family ever think I’m gay. Im 20 years old and never had a girlfriend and never talk about it either. I know it has to look suspicious from another persons view. My friends are always talking about girls and showing each other videos of them dancing or a hot picture but I don’t really speak about girls to them. I don’t want to come out the closet until I’m moved out of my house and living alone and I know I’m gonna have to stop talking to my only friends when I do come out. Excuses 5th grader writing skills. ,lgbt
Do Labels Hurt the LGBTQ+ Community?,,lgbt
The 5 Genders,,lgbt
"Hubby and I carved our pumpkin 🎃 I carved the bat, he carved the oogie boogie",,lgbt
Feeling a little witchy this Halloween (MtF),,lgbt
This is perfect,,lgbt
Becoming a Mom when you're a queer lady,,lgbt
Help? What am I?,"Hi! I’ve never done anything like this before. I usually keep my thoughts to my myself but lately I feel like this one has been bothering me as it makes me uncomfortable in certain situations. And it makes me feel like I’m a stranger to myself so I think I need external help. I really want to describe this as perfectly as possible for anyone who’s reading this to understand. But just to sum it up I want to know if I am Lesbian or bisexual or straight because I just don’t know and it’s driving me crazy. So to begin I am a female! And I am 18 years old. I’ve never dated anyone. I think my whole life my mom has assumed I was lesbian because of the way I dressed (Tom boyish). She hasn’t directly said it to me but she hints it through conversations when she talks about gay people. So this has kind of annoyed me that she’s always thought I was lesbian just because of how I dress when to me, sexuality isn’t based on clothes. I know people say girls are supposed to wear girl clothes but I don’t care about that and I never have. I just see clothes I’m comfortable in and fit my individual taste and wear it and I guess it’s people that label things that ruin it. So because of the way I dress, people apart from my mom assume I’m gay. I’ve been hit on by lesbian girls before but I genuinely wasn’t interested. Now I tell myself I’m not lesbian but I don’t feel straight either? Like when I think about it I’ve never had a crush on a boy. When I was younger I acknowledged cute boys in my class but I would always have the urge to be best friends with them and not their girlfriends. As I got into my teens, I did what most teen girls did and gushed over cute male celebs. But the thing is although when I was younger I said I loved these guys I would never claim myself as their future wife or even envision myself dating them. I just loved them but would never want to picture myself with them. I also feel quite awkward picturing myself in a relationship and for that reason stray from them in college. No boy has ever had a crush on me and I think I would feel burdened by it if they did anyways. I can actually see myself not being in a relationship for the rest of my life. I feel like friendships and pets and family are all the things I need to get by on. Especially friendship that has always been important to me. I know if I tell someone “I don’t want to date anyone” they would either say “yeah she’s lesbian” or think I’m totally crazy. It’s gotten to the point where I feel like I don’t know who I am. I know I’m not lesbian because I don’t feel attracted to girls. I think they’re pretty but I can’t see myself dating one, crushing on one, or doing sexual activities with her. And this may be personal but if I watch porn it’s always straight porn. And I crave the male parts but would never want to be in a relationship with a guy. And I wouldn’t feel comfortable being vulnerable enough to have friends with benefits either. I’ve actually never masturbated. I know it’s probably too much information but I feel like a very odd human being and I have enough self awareness to realize that. I would also like to add that if someone every asks, “do you have a boyfriend... or girlfriend?” Usually I think “oh yeah they assumed I was lesbian” but then I instantly think “even if someone assumed I was lesbian. That’s not a bad thing.”. So I just say no because I feel like I don’t have to explain my sexuality as well as be offended by it. I just don’t know what I am or who I like or what’s wrong with me. ",lgbt
I just finished a friendship bracelet I made for myself and I think it turned out great!,,lgbt
"I came out to bunch of my friends as trans today, and they were super lovely about it! And a good day was had.",,lgbt
Idk what to do,Hey so I have a friend and she knows somone and she keeps showing my boyfriend pictures of him and my boyfriend is starting to regent being with me and I really don't know what to do about it. I even talked to my friend and she lied to my face saying she hasn't shown him anything but I was there when she was. He also keeps calling him fit and he talks to him more than me now,lgbt
PERHAPS?,,lgbt
"guy rapes lesbians, goes to jail",,lgbt
WAR DAY - YUNG ZEL x MEGAMAN x SHIKIGAMI by Megaman,,lgbt
How would you describe my sexuality?,"Sorry if this comes off as TMI. 

I'm a guy and for as long as I can remember I've always been physically attracted to guys. I can remember as early as when I was in kindergarten having slight crushes on guys and being shy around them. To this day I am still the same. I am super shy around guys and feel so nervous around them, especially good looking ones, but I am very comfortable around girls. 

In middle school and high school I've always thought of guys as hot and girls as gross. The idea of making out with a girl made me sick. 

These days it's a little different. 

I'm 25,  and for some strange reason now I get slightly attracted toward females. 

I can even watch straight porn/lesbian porn and get off on it but... I'm still not into the idea of making out with a girl. 

For the longest time, ever since I was a teenager, I've only ever gotten off on gay porn, but these days I not only get off on straight porn, but I also find myself fantasizing about having sex with a woman and giving her head. 

As far as relationships go? I don't think I can see myself with a woman. 

Nothing makes me happier than the idea of finding a guy that I'm attracted to both physically and mentally, and spending the rest of my life with him. 

I'm a little confused about my sexuality. Am I bisexual? Am I gay? ",lgbt
My life,,lgbt
for ya guys,,lgbt
SANDY FROM GREASE,,lgbt
"Interested in the perspective of an LGBT person on something that happened to me, a straight dude, at a bar","My Halloween weekend out has been mostly fun but I can’t help thinking about an experience with someone at a bar and whether or not I am in the wrong. To set the scene, my good friend and his girlfriend invited me to go bar-hopping with them and we ended up at a gay bar. They went off to dance and I sat there taking shots of gin; all of a sudden this older man, around 55, began talking to me.
Now, I was at least eight drinks deep; drunk enough to disregard my environment while assuming the completely innocent interest of this gentleman. We had a conversation that spanned at least twenty minutes, at no point did he express any romantic interest in me. Some time later he invites me to take Jell-O shots with his friends in a truck. At this point I had figured out he was gay but not interested in me because, well, I am not very attractive and extremely awkward. Cut to his car, we’re taking Jell-O shots like nobody’s business. I ask him if I need to pay anything for the alcohol and he gives me an emphatic no. Then he starts asking me about my sexuality. I tell him outright that I am straight and most likely aromatic since I have never formed an emotional romantic connection with a woman along with an apologetic explanation that I wish I was gay because it’d be much easier to connect with the people who are usually interested in me (gay guys). Now this is where it gets muddied. The man started telling me I was very cute in a breathy way; I reaffirmed that I was unfortunately straight through no fault of me own. He then started feeding me vodka gummy bears by hand, a little strange but I didn’t feel threatened whatsoever. Somehow, my drunken friends found me out in the parking lot and dragged me away, I promised the guy I’d be back the next weekend but still felt awful because I think I lead him on somehow by agreeing to go back to his car. Was I in the wrong? I know it’s not uncommon for straight guys to goad gay dudes into buying them alcohol at these sorts of bars. My guilt is mostly stemmed from not paying him for the shots and also perpetuating that practice I mentioned. ",lgbt
"Brazil looks like it's about to elect a far-right virulently anti-gay, anti-transgender president. If one were to leave the country, where is the best option to flee to?",,lgbt
"The 1987 Merchant Ivory film Maurice (based on the book by E M Forster), starring Hugh Grant was my first gay film experience. What was yours?",,lgbt
How common is it that asexual people turn out to just not have accepted their true sexuality?,"A close friend of mine that I’ve known since we were 15 years old, was asexual until he turned 32. And suddenly he came out as gay and started dating like there’s no tomorrow. He now lives with a man, and he’s happily having sex. We’re still very close friends, and he says that for years he through he was asexual because he just didn’t see what men saw in women. He felt no arousal. And he never allowed himself to think those thoughts about other men. When he did, all emotions came at once and so did his sexuality, if that makes sense.

Is this common? I’m sure it’s a controversial question, but is it possible that asexuals just haven’t found what turns them on?",lgbt
Helpless parent,,lgbt
Nono Kravitz - F That Talk [Pop/Trap] (2018),,lgbt
Military gay,Anyone else in the US military and struggle to navigate work/dating/etc in that sphere? ,lgbt
#DonutSeason,,lgbt
Ok but can we just talk about how FUCKING HOT HALSEY IS???!!,,lgbt
A few years HRT with some weight loss :),,lgbt
der she blows,,lgbt
21 months HRT today.. but still having a rough time at work,,lgbt
advice?,"help, i am a 16 year old pansexual female who recently switched schools. this school is fairly christian and republican, and quite a few boys have a crush on me. however, recently i have catching feelings for a girl.
i'm super scared just because i'm new and all of the backlash i'm going to get from this. just the other day my friends and i were sitting outside during lunch and this one boy whispered ""ew why are we sitting near the gay kids?"" and i hear people talking crap about the lgbt community all the time and i don't know, i'm just scared.
furthermore, my mom is homophobic, so if i decided to try anything with this girl i'd have to keep it a secret from my mom.
also, since i'm fairly new at this school and have rejected every boy, if things end up not working out with this girl, people might assume i'm a lesbian and it could ruin all future chances of a relationship with a boy. 
i like her and i want to act on it but i'm just really scared. please give me advice if you have any",lgbt
Storytime: He cheated + Married Behind My Back,,lgbt
First Halloween,,lgbt
To be gay is to feel free,,lgbt
Had no ideas so why not pride for my car in iracing!,,lgbt
Bisexual Friend,"It's a kind of long story. I would like to point out that I'm straight, and that I grew up in the deep south (Mainly Texas [I come from an immigrant family]), so I grew up with mainly conservative/Republican views. I kind of differed, though, and am socially leftist and economically Republican (Feel free to ask about it. It confuses some people), and among my school I'm known for this. I never really grew up with any non-heterosexuals, so the LGBTQ community is a relatively new culture to me.

Anyways, I've been talking to this girl (who we'll call Alice) and we became real good friends. She has this other friend who is a transgender who is biologically female but identifies as male (we'll call him Jones). And, well Alice and Jones are best of friends and they do everything together, and I kind of joined the ""squad"" after seeing them out of class and we just kinda hung out. Since then, I've been seeing them more frequently and it's been great. I did develop feelings for Alice, and Jones thought I would be a good match, so hes rooting for me. Anyways, in one of our classes me and Jones were talking about Alice and what I should do and what she thinks about me, and I asked about her romantic history. Jones accidentally revealed to me that Alice has dated multiple women and is bisexual, and then said that he wasnt supposed to tell anyone, so he asked me to keep quiet (Which I agreed to, so that's why this is a throwaway account). 

Now, I'm cool with the fact that Alice is bisexual, I really like her and regardless, I dont really mind. But, I'm troubled. If Alice comes out to me, how am I supposed to react? What am I supposed to say? I really am trying not to screw this up, so any help is appreciated.",lgbt
First drag performance of Danielle Ice is in the books!,,lgbt
Your family tree LGBT.,,lgbt
Sweet Happy Gay Couple,,lgbt
I’m so confused about my gender please help,"There is no lgbt therapists near me and even if there was I don’t have tho courage to go face to face and talk about it so I found pride counselling but they said that it’s not the best option for me so I didn’t get a counsellor and redit is my last option (because I got no friends😂😕) so if you can help I will really appreciate it ☺️ just a little back story p.s I was born male

Ever since I was little I’ve played with my sister’s toys dressed up in my mum’s clothes and my sister’s costumes and I even asked my mum when I’m going to get breasts. Even when I was older I dressed up in my mum’s clothes as a joke but I actually liked warring the clothes it was ocword and embarrassing though. I’ve always gotten along with girls easily and had a couple guy friends too and I’m not fully sure but I think I got jealous of girls with how there body’s look. I’ve found. A lot of guys cute and going into high school I was embarrassed in the gym Chang room. I had a guy sit on my lap, there was no lock on the bathroom door there so ppl barged in sometimes and I never liked showing my body but I was always embarrassed with how fat I am and the shape of my body. Near the end of grade 10 I went to anime north 2018 and I saw guys dressing up as the sailor scouts and I smiled and sorta wish I could join them.

Then Toronto Pride 2018 came around it was my first pride parade I went to and I was with my girlfriend that is bi (I also thought I was bi and thought I was gender fluid) but then I thought to myself how I have romantic feelings for well Amy gender and that I’ve been feeling more female than male or gender neutral for almost all the time. then grade 11 shows up, I’ve been thinking to myself saying things like “what if I’m trans female, I did use to think I was a girl when I was a kid” and  here we are now I’m just confused and question my gender.",lgbt
"Genuine question, I want to expand my knowledge on the many different genders that have gotten “popular”(?)","Okay so bear with me here. I’m pansexual, I’ve been a part of the LGBTQ community for years.

I’ve noticed the obvious spike online in people coming out about gender pronouns etc. Can you explain to me what non-binary, gender fluid etc. means and how it feels? 

I’m really curious and I want to understand so badly but I just don’t get it fully? Probably because anytime someone talks about it they get shut down immediately for being a “stupid millennial” and other dumb shit. 

My younger coworkers have been discussing these things and I want to accept and add to the conversation and take them in with open arms BUT I HAVE NO CLUE HOW OR WHAT THEY ARE TALKING ABOUT. I’m in my 20’s so these things were never discussed when I was in highschool, or even “existed”, “pansexuality” didn’t even really exist. 

Sorry if I sound ignorant here, I just want to love lol.

Xoxo.",lgbt
The (trans) kids are all right: What gender-affirming health care really means,,lgbt
‘MAGABomber’ Cesar Sayoc Told Former Manager She Would ‘Burn In Hell’ Because She Is Gay: 'He knew I was a very proud Lesbian. He made it a point to say ‘God made a mistake with me’ and that I should ‘burn in hell.'',,lgbt
I Hate Indonesia so much,,lgbt
How do I explain to my grandfather that some things just aren't funny?,"So, I'm gonna start off with the fact that I'm not transgender. I'm a big supporter of the community but I don't speak for trans people, they speak for themselves.

I have a fall festival at my school, and I'm hosting a booth for GSA. I'm on the board for the club, so it's just an obligation as the Activities Manager. I was talking to my grandfather about getting a ride and he said ""Since your part of this GSA thing why don't you tell them I'm your aunt."" I said that it wasn't funny, and he and my grandmother jumped down my throat about being the PC police. Apperently his joke was hilarious and I was being oversenstive. He said that he knew transgender people from when he was in high school. (Despite that, he still refers to my trans friends as their birth sex, despite me explicitly stating what to call them and their pronouns. But that's a whole other topic.) My defense was that it wasn't his joke to make because 1) he's not trans, and 2) it makes fun of the trans experience. (Plus, it honestly wasn't a funny joke to begin with, 'oversensitive' or not.) Is there any way I can explain to him why jokes like that just aren't funny?",lgbt
am I transphobic?,"Cisgender lesbian woman talking!
so I’ve been with my girlfriend for a year now and a month ago or so she said she had this extremely important thing to tell me: she isn’t feeling comfortable with her body anymore... like if she was trapped. She also told me that she would like to start taking hormones and, basically, changing everything related to her biological genre to become a trans man.
This kinda shook me at first but after deeply thinking about it I understood that if this is what makes HIM happy, I won’t be the one who stops him from doing it.
——————
This process started a few days later after talking with him about it and it is getting a little weird for me... He seems very excited about this transformation and that makes me really happy, but I can’t avoid the fact that I’m attracted to women. He shows me all these before/after videos of trans guys and I don’t find them physically attractive at all; they’re men.
I haven’t talked with him about this yet but before I do it I’d like to make sure if I’m being transphobic or not; because I can’t really see myself going out with a guy, you know? I’m just not attracted to them. 
This feeling makes me so sick; I want him to be happy but I want to be happy too, and I don’t feel like dating him after the process is done is something very honest to do.",lgbt
Help; need advice for dating a transgender female,"She is transgender; male to female. 

We have been seeing each other on and off for several months. I consider myself a heterosexual male; all my past relationships have been with biological sex girls. 

I didn't know she was transgender until recently but, I am truly in love with her personality. 

She is the second girl I've met in my lifetime that I absolutely am head-over-heels in love with. 

Any advice for what not to do (or say) and things to do (or say?) 

She does not want to have sex until she dates; which is completely fine with me. 

I don't know how that would work necessarily; but I love her and I'll try. She has pretty high standards for guys; she constantly has a bunch of guys that try to get with her PURELY so they can ""see what it's like."" Pretty fucked, imo. She has accused me before of being ashamed of her but I happily hold her hand, kiss her in public. I truly love her. We have passionate make out sessions but she gets ""excited"" and needs to stop; and I happily oblige. I want her to feel comfortable when it comes to physical intimacy. Anything I can do to make her feel more comfortable?",lgbt
Is this typical platonic behavior for a male friend [19M] to be doing this to me [19M]?," After careful deliberation, I've decided to write this post so I can get to finally move forward and not think about it as much anymore. So for context, I've met a guy last July in one of my university classes, let's call him ""N"". We've known each other only for a short time, a year and a half, our friendship seemed to hit it off and he's what I consider to be a good friend of mine. One time however, we were waiting for our bus and I don't exactly recall how or why, we've joked about one of us being blind and it led to N asking me if he could hold my hand? I exactly can't recall if he was joking or not, it seemed rather insignificant at the time. I told him I didn't mind and we held hands for a solid couple of seconds. Neither one of us let go during that time though I did later because of his rather sweaty palms lol. It may seem that we were just joking, and that I thought so too... for a while. The next thing that made me pique my interest in him was on another time, I tagged him on a meme on Facebook detailing how ""the next time we will see each other in university, it won't be until March"" \[paraphrasing it\]. N commented that: ""...felt sad as he hadn't talked to a friend in weeks. Wanted to feel warm and cozy again."" I don't know but I get the feeling this isn't what men usually say to their guy friends, especially coming from a straight guy and me... well, gay. He knows this. He even one time, let me know he was gonna walk with me on our ways to class, still I didn't think anything of it then and remarked to him he was a mere gentleman to do so. The final thing nail in the coffin was during at the end of our semester, there was a small pet a farm animal event in our university, and as we were walking past it, I decided to pet the goats... after all, they are cute after all. Anyways, after I petted them, I saw N just standing, unmoving, gazing at me, as if he was admiring me from afar. I know how delusional it sounds, even when I tried to rationalize it in my head, it was a nagging feeling I sort of had. It felt like there was an expression in his face I couldn't read.

&amp;#x200B;

We're simply platonic, and I'm sure that's how he views me. He'd call me his ""homie/buddy"" once, heh... Aside from that, we'd used to take our basic classes together, usually sitting next to each other... nothing special, hang out every once or so often due to our busy schedules. I was once attracted to him, but nothing more than that. He isn't exactly the guy that I'd consider devastatingly handsome... but handsome nonetheless. This can't possibly be anything more than platonic right? It just seems surprising if it isn't. It has to be. What do you think? I am probably just overthinking it, it probably is the case of meeting a very affectionate, sweet, sexually secure guy who just happens to float on the other side of the river. In all honesty, I wish it was the truth... I'm not even ready for anything romantic at all!

&amp;#x200B;

So men and women, is this merely a rare, sweet form of platonic friendship he's comfortable showing or is this indicating something more?",lgbt
I need help. After ending his relationship with his girlfriend my best friend came out to me.,"He's my best friend. He's a big burly tobacco chewing southern-boy mechanic with a huge beard. I didn't see it at all. And I feel terrible. My best friend has been struggling with this his whole life and I didn't see it at all. 

I don't care about him being gay. Love the man to death and just need help on how to handle this. He says he wants to finally explore and be more open. 

Do I just take him to a gay bar, knock back a few beers and play wingman? Is there more to men's relationships? Do I act like he never brought it up? 

I'm sorry if I'm being offensive I don't have any experience with this or any  gay friends to lean on.",lgbt
"Need to be schooled on Grindr and how to compared to Tinder, OkCupid, Match","Is it that Grindr is more aimed to just men who are into men? Or are there other things that app targets Vs the others? Also, I noticed that an app like Grindr doesn't exist for hetero relations. Is it that no-one thought of it or what? Should I post this elsewhere in another sub? If this belongs elsewhere, I'd happily post in the correct sub.

Thanks",lgbt
I'm not an LGBT but I completely support you wonderful people. I have amazing friends part of your community that I treat like family and am even dating an Asexual. Keep doing what you're doing! 🌈,,lgbt
"Me and My Dad's language has never changed, even after I've come out.","This may sound a bit odd, and there is a small amount of back story before I get where I'm going. I am safe and happy, I just wanted to share some happy fluff with y'all. 

So, my dad has always communicated through giving me knives. Right on the cusp of puberty I decided I hated everyone and wanted to collect knives. My dad latched on to that, he's a good person but not the most emotionally intellegent. He does know a decent amount about knives though, so he decided thats how he would tell me he loved me.

At holidays or celebrations he would give me one. I got a knife for every holiday, a sword for graduation, and (because i find it theraputic) when a close family friend passed i got a beat up old knife to fix. Its been about 7 or 8 years of this now. he doesnt know i know, but he keeps a small stash of knives so he can give me one whenever Im having a hard time.

As an added side note, I am christian, i was raised christian.. im just not the same kind of christian as I used to be. I came out as bisexual almost 3 years ago and we've had a rough go about it since then. His stance has been basically, ""i dont like it and we wont talk about it but lord dont anyone criticize my daughter for it in front of me. Shes a good girl who makes her choices"" 

Well. Ive been having a rough time. Im not good at hiding it, and today my dad gave me a knife. He was smiling all goofy saying ""Well, i was looking and i picked this one because its a rainbow, because you know. Rainbow. They had others but this ones the only rainbow one OP."" Im ngl i was tempted to see how many times he'd say rainbow all pointed before he'd crack. I told him i liked it, especially the rainbow and he said ""well it's because i support you, you know, the rainbow."" Lord knows he's not eloquent enough to say the word bi, but honestly this means everything to me. Y'all ever seen a dog finally figure out how to get around a baby gate to come  tackle you? Yeah that was pretty much my dad's face when i told him i knew it was because I'm bisexual. Proud and happy...and then real proud again. Like he'd finally figured out a way to tell me he accepted me, without havin to deal with all the fancy word parts.

I guess I just wanted to share my happiness, and my new favorite knife. Change is slow, and lord knows its slow in the US south... but its changing. I hope yall find some reason to smile today, especially if youre struggling. 

Edit: i completely forgot to add the knife pic. Oops! http://imgur.com/gallery/QSFpCMz  hopefully that link works :)",lgbt
I don't want to be forced to come out to my parents. What should I do?,"Hi r/lgbt! 17 year old closeted gay cis male here, I have never posted but I lurk a lot. I am currently finishing up my applications to college and my parents want to read them. Great. That is so nice of them! There's a small issue though.

One of the schools I'm applying to has an optional question about sexual orientation. It is optional but my parents WILL see my response when they read it. I definitely don't want to put straight but I have only recently come out to some of my friends and even more recently my sister. 

I know my parents will accept me because of their attitudes on lgbt issues and I am confident that I am gay, and I have no idea why but I just can't bring myself to come out to them. I need to show them my applications by the end of this weekend.

What should I answer for the question? Should I just come out to them? Should I leave it blank (they would probably assume I'm gay because which confident straight person would leave it blank)? Should I answer ""other?""

Please help reddit :( ",lgbt
What do you seem to view differently than most straight people you know due to your orientation?,"To give an example of what I mean; I'm bi and together with a guy. It seems to me a majority of straight women have a huge issue with the idea of their partner looking at other women/get angry if they catch their bf looking in ""that"" way at another woman.

For me it's always been ""of course he's going to also look at other women/find other women hot, have you seen women?"" It's happened several times that we've caught each other glancing at the same cleavage for example.

Do you have anything like this where your sexual orientation seem to give you a very different view of a common ""straight"" issue?",lgbt
I need your advice,"Hello reddit! So I have been bi for the last couple years and I’ve developed a  crush for my best friend for the last year or so (we are both male). The thing is... I think he is straight. I never came out of the closet, We follow the same course in university, but I know he will never finish his degree and leave for a long journey to where I don’t know... So here is my problem... should I tell him how I really feel before he left... and risk to lose my friendship, but still get to ser him on an everyday basis, or just let him go and not tell him how I feel and stay friends? I know you redditors can’t decide for me, but telling me how you would react in my situation would help me allot! Thank you in advance! Ps. I think it’s real love i’m feeling, because in my opinion crushes don’t last this long (longer than a year).",lgbt
"TW Racism It's time we address the racism within the LGBT community. If any one of y'all know this fucker, i hope you blacklist him and spread this to everyone in your community.",,lgbt
My (Short) Story of How I Found Who I Really Am,"Last night was my school's Halloween party. Due to fear of rejection, I hadn't been to any school events in about 6 years, disregarding homecoming freshman year of high school. I've known I was gay since the end of my 8th grade year, when I had a crush on a guy for the first time. However, due to fear of rejection from my conservative parents, I've acted straight for those 6 years. It's been painful. Well, last night was probably the best night of my life. From the moment I walked in the door my best friend from high school was there to welcome me (he has a boyfriend now :(). As the party got underway, I began to loosen up. To put it one way, I was as flamboyant as could be, but not on purpose. I was finally myself. I made some new friends, and I have a (gay)date with her on Monday. For reference, throughout public school, I was bullied badly because I was different. Last night was a completely different experience of love and acceptance. 

&amp;#x200B;

P.S. - If anyone wants a hug, several people told me that I give the ""best hugs ever"".",lgbt
Am I Trans?,"So I know this has been asked way too many times but I really want to figure this out. So for the past year-year and a half I’ve been questioning my gender identity. I’ve noticed a change in the way I view myself. I feel very self conscious when it comes to my chest and try to cover it with baggy shirts and I wear mostly these “tight” jeans (that’s literally all I have and I hate it) that make me feel even more self conscious because of my thighs. In the past I’ve had dreams where I was a boy. Female pronouns don’t seem too right for me. When I hear “she” referring to me, I think they’re talking about someone else. I do get jealous when I see people with flat chests. 
Adding to all this, my whole life my name has always felt wrong. I always feel like it doesn’t fit me. Plus my voice always sounds really high to me and I really hate it. 
Please help
(Yes I know this is formatted awfully, sorry)
",lgbt
One of my students is finally allowing us to see their authentic self - how do I support them?,"A little backstory - this student has struggled for a long time to allow us even know that transition might be on the cards. I am in tears knowing of their struggle to be seen for who they are, and I couldn’t be prouder that they are finally allowing everyone to see the real them. I know the Importance of getting their chosen name and pronouns right, but what else can I do? I feel like throwing a parade! To see them walking tall, just makes me so fucking proud! But this is not about me, and I want to support them as thoughtfully as I can. Thoughts? Suggestions?

And please excuse me, if I’ve misspoken on any element. ",lgbt
Am I Transgender?,"I'm 14, FTM. I know alot of people would say that such a young person thinking about this sort of thing will eventually grow out of it but I've felt this way for 2-3 years now.

I've been extremely uncomfortable with my body ever since I've been growing up. To breasts to thick thighs, just the entire female anatomy disgusts me. Why do I have to get fat more easily than males in general? Just to state I'm Asexual and I have never been interested in females or males or relationships. The fact that me being born a female to take the female role and have children disgusts me so much, pregnancy, having breasts for the sake of children,when gaining weight all that fat goes towards your lower area and not stomach ect, I hate it so much, it's so uncomfortable. I'm extremely self conscious about my breasts, not the way they look in general or perky or saggy just the fact I have them. They're so useless and I can't go a day without worrying and trying to cover them up so I don't see them and others don't is so annoying. I get so jealous when I see guys have flat chests but I can't wear a shirt at all and have to wear jackets 24/7 because I hate that my chest even exists. I've never compared my breasts or my body/size type whatever you wanna call it, compared to other girls. I couldn't care less about that. 

I've researched alot about being transgender and what transgender is. When I hide my breasts with a good bra I feel so happy. I feel like I can do anything I want without having to constantly be conscious and cover up my shirt. I've always wanted a binder, but I have a regular bra (like a binder but shit and pretty cheap with average material let's say) and it's losing its affect of flattening my chest, looking like a regular bra.

I have always wondered ""why wasn't I born a boy?"" I have two step brothers. My parents always wanted a ""girl"" and they got one, me. I've always disliked girls when I grew up (not all of them of course) I never blended in with them, I had no similar interests to any of my female friends at all. 
I wear male clothing (shorts, oversized jackets, clothes from the male section, ect.) it's always made me so happy. Like I'm being my true self. But it's difficult for me to buy clothes and be happy with my body because of my weight and how big my chest, thighs and ass are. I cover these things of course but it really makes me depressed I have to do this and I can't do or buy things that would please me without discomfort with my body. (I know there's ways to fix this I'm just stating it.) this has led to me having extreme anxiety when going out comparing how shit my clothes look to girls. Not in the jealousy way if that makes sense. I think to myself if I was born a male I wouldn't have to worry about any of this and I could wear any type of clothing without being looked at as if I was incapable of dressing correctly to my assigned gender since nowadays everybody looks classy and shit. But everyone's different, it's just from what I've seen. 

I've come out to my inrl female friends a few years ago about me being transgender. They accepted me, but I really couldn't and still can't do anything at my young age to change anything or to transition. I know I'm young but I'm utterly sick of living like this with my body, hanging out with girls, I want to blend in with the boys. I want to do boy things, yada yada. I go as ""male"" online and ""he/him"" pronouns. It makes me feel more comfortable than to be called a she and her its so just repulsive to me and I can't handle it. (inrl doesn't make me feel any better.) Whenever somebody from inrl messages me online and asks what gender I am, it's so hard to answer because I really want to say I'm male but I can't at all because as you can see, I don't look nor speak as one. And coming out transgender for me, is a really personal topic since I have trouble trusting people.

At school it makes me puke (not actually) to wear such a tight female uniform (shirt) compared to the boy's loose shirts. Aswell with the skirts, I never grew up wearing skirts or dresses, I had the ""tomboy look."" it shows my breasts more than usual and I can't do anything about it. It's so shitty designed. 

When growing up, I've always had long hair.  I didn't necessarily enjoy it, I just didn't take much notice to it and never cut it. Since I'm growing older, I've decided to cut it at shoulder length as I think it suits me more and it's easier to handle. I've been self conscious about my face for a long time and whenever I had to tie my hair up, it made me crazy to do it everyday at school so I got it cut. It's easier for me to hide my face and it makes me happy. This doesn't really have to do with anything, thought I'd state it. (I don't regret cutting it at all) 
I don't wear makeup at all. I don't have any knowledge of it whatsoever. The only makeup I would wear is foundation but that's really just to apply under my dark circles under my eyes and pimples since they're pretty annoying. Anything other than that disgusts me or I have no interest in at all. 

I have come out to my parents. My mom accepts me but my dad finds it really weird which I respect. (they're both Christians so I grew up in a religious household so it's pretty sudden.) 

It's 12 at night and I'm pretty tired so I might have missed some important things, oh well. This is my first post on here but I really want advice, what can I do at the moment at my age, help, anything really, thanks. (this whole post is probably shit but I tried my best)",lgbt
Is what I did offensive?,"So like I was walking back to the car coming back from a party, admittedly I was a little drunk. I walked past two girls holding hands and I was like “Greetings fellow f**gots” they both laughed after I was like “I’m Bi”... but is what I did offensive? I’m just a little scared that I’m being a douche. ",lgbt
LGBTQ Quotes?,"My student LGBTQI+ group has started to design merchandise that we can spread among students etc.

&amp;#x200B;

We are still looking for quotes or sayings we can put on our merchandise, since we are not selling it but giving it away.

Does anybody have an idea?",lgbt
We always say it’s “us against the world”. I wouldn’t have it any other way.,,lgbt
Future possible boyfriend😬 [GAY],"So there’s this hot guy I’ve been talking to for a while and been friends for all year, he came out to me as gay and ever since then he’s been wanting to hang out more and texts me a lot more too. I think- I think he likes me. Not like anyone cares but my life’s going swell!",lgbt
"Always do your own research kids, read multiple articles and fact check. Don't blindly follow what the masses are saying.",,lgbt
Got dressed up in our Halloween costumes together as I am working trick-or-treat night,,lgbt
Indonesia disaster 'punishment for gay activities': Malaysia politician,,lgbt
"To those who ran away from home and didn't come back, what's life like now?",,lgbt
"Hey guys first post here! 30 yrs old transwoman( still in the closet) with 7 1/2 months hrt. How am I doing? I've been pretty dysphoric these past few days, do I look okay? Or do I really look like a potato.",,lgbt
I need your help to reunite with my wife (':,"&amp;#x200B;

https://i.redd.it/5bebx6nyxtu11.jpg

If you are interested in our story 'i'll do updates in this webpage and answer your questions if you have any.

Thank you in advance for your time and if you could give us a hand we'll really appreciate it &lt;3

[https://gogetfunding.com/help-me-reunite-with-my-wife/](https://gogetfunding.com/help-me-reunite-with-my-wife/)

&amp;#x200B;

Love and prosperity for all of you ",lgbt
Gender Difference Question,"I’ve been diving a little bit about differences of genders and sexual orientations and there is one specific gender that i still don’t understand, which is Pansexuality.
What exactly does being Pansexual mean?
By the things I read it looks kind of similar to bisexuality but I don’t know if it’s the case or not..",lgbt
What can I do to help my transgender friend feel supported?,"A very good friend of mine is recently transgender and is a she now. She's gotten a lot of backlash from her family and friends about this. She emailed me about this and said she was nervous to tell me. Based on context, I think she might be expecting transphobia from me as well. 

The truth is, I'm honestly not transphobic, even though I admittedly don't fully understand it. But I think everyone deserves happiness, and if this is her path, that's fine by me. So if you are transgender or know someone who is, what's the best thing you'd want a good friend to say or do to be supportive? I don't want to feel like I need to prove that I'm okay with her change and process, but I am supportive of what she's done. How do I help her understand that?",lgbt
Oh Matthew... 😢💔,,lgbt
An Identification Confusion,"Hey everybody. I wondered if you could help a friend of mine out (if you know what I mean). My friend, Stuart let's say, who was born male, doesn't idenitify with any gender at all. Stuart feels generally uncomfortable being referred to by any set of gender pronouns; the typical he/his/him feels wrong as Stuart doesn't feel like a man inside, equally they/their/them feels too impersonal and Stuart finds the more unconventional pronouns difficult to get used to. 

How should people refer to Stuart? What might you suggest Stuart does? ",lgbt
I (Bi 18F) have a crush on one of my female friends.,"She is straight, unfortunately. 
My one guy friend has a crush on her, and today some other guys at this party I’m at said that she was cute (loudly) as they left the party.

I have mixed feelings.  On one hand, I’m jealous of the attention she’s getting from these boys, on the other hand, I’m jealous of the boys and how I know that she doesn’t see any potential with me.
This sucks!!",lgbt
If I had a dollar for every gender there is...,I would've got an infinite amount of dollars to share with all my queers friends ,lgbt
"Matthew Shepard, symbol for gay rights, laid to rest in DC",,lgbt
Need advice and reassurance on how I handled my granddaughter confessing,"This is a bit long but please bear with me. As a parent and grandparent I have always discussed relationships with the children in a way that, in my mind at least, reassures them that the gender of their partner is never an issue. As they got older I made it clear that someone else's sexuality was a sacred thing and bullying etc wouldn't be tolerated. 

Fast forward to two weeks ago and my 10yr old grandchild came home from school and told me that she had confessed to her crush. I said ""Oooh and who is the lucky boy or girl?"" (My standard phrase when my grandkids speak about crushes etc) She got all shy and named a friend, Jenni, from a club she goes to. The friend can be a bit of a bully at times, there's been a few times she's made my granddaughter cry. My heart sank at the thought of this girls reaction.

I hugged my granddaughter and asked how Jenni  took the news and she said it went well, phew! It turns out my brave wee granddaughter has known she likes girls (her words not mine) for just over a year. We spoke about some reactions she might come up against and how to handle them. She gave me the biggest hug and told me she knew she could tell me anything and I would support her and still love her.

I'm ashamed to say it didn't go so well when she told her mum, my daughter, but a few minutes arguing with my daughter shut her up. I just hope she hasn't scared my granddaughter with her reaction. 

Did I do the right thing speaking to her about prejudice and people's reactions? I didn't want to scare her but I didn't want her blindly naive....now I'm worried I messed it up

",lgbt
Lesbian looking to interview 2 current or former NYC homeless LGBT youth - $$,,lgbt
I live in a low-key homophobic familly. What do I do?,"My mom thinks that saying the name ""Frank Lee Gay"" (which, by the way, is the best name ever) is bad because ""people might misinterpret it,"" or that ""only real gays can say that."" We had a big fight about it and eventually she said ""If you aren't gonna come out, then don't say that!"" She has raised my entire family to think that gay is the 'other.' I remember one day my mom was talking to my little brother and said ""Maybe if you decide, you'll end up marrying another guy.""
DECIDE?!?
DECIDE?!?
And the worst part about it is that she considers herself an ally, but is totally biphobic.
GOD! It's so awful. And I can't even just wait until I graduate high school, because I'm still 14. And being closeted for 4 more years is something that I just think I'll be able to handle.",lgbt
Me comin' out of the closet like,,lgbt
Are gay people specifically more sexual than heterosexual people?,"I guess I’m just looking for people who see meaning in life and it just seems that all a lot of gays talk about are parties, sex, drugs. Maybe I’m along with the wrong kind of people? Or could I just be looking in all the wrong places?
Am I crazy or is this actually a thing? ",lgbt
Friends are the family you choose—and the family that chooses you.,,lgbt
This is my son. Today he learned how shitty and harmful #ToxicMasculinity is.,,lgbt
Relevant John Mulaney bit,,lgbt
"As an LGBT+ person, do you feel that your future is secured in society today? (poll)","I was personally curious as to how LGBT+ people feel in terms of their long-term safety and understanding in society today. 

Let me know if there's anything I could do to improve the poll, as it's fairly simplistic.

&amp;#x200B;

[https://www.strawpoll.me/16723518](https://www.strawpoll.me/16723518)",lgbt
Proud to have this in my room 😊,,lgbt
"Scientists, in study consisting of nearly 500k individuals, have found a link between four genetic markers and same sex attraction/activity.",,lgbt
Happy Intersex Awareness Day!,,lgbt
Trump supporters on here,"Is it just a routine thing for Trump supporters to come on here and try and piss people off, or harass them? My last post keeps getting attention from these weak little twats, coming over to shit on trans people. ",lgbt
A safeplace for live advice for LGBTQ+ people. New streamer.," 

This may seem like a grab for attention, but if person feels better by seeking advice, is it that bad?

Through my love of you tube, and the lovely LGBTQ+ community, I've decided to combine them into one, reorienting advice for people because we're teens... and who watches you tube more than us?, by offering advice on streams, in the great words of red skull ""guiding others to a treasure i cannot possess""

I'm 17 and following my dream to start a you tube channel and decided to ""just do it"", i'm above average at fortnite so i thought i would share my experiences with you lovely people. Also with my limited experience on this Earth, i'm willing to offer anyone advice on anything, be it personal or not, coming out, family/friends, anything, a friendly, non judgemental space for LGBTQ+ teens or adults. I am also thinking about incorporating an anonymous submission thing, where people can submit stuff anonymously and i can answer live.

Drop a sub to be notified when i'm live, first live stream tomorrow.

&amp;#x200B;

 [https://www.youtube.com/channel/UCTMEtodw-yvSy2sCmH6zsHQ/featured](https://www.youtube.com/channel/UCTMEtodw-yvSy2sCmH6zsHQ/featured) ",lgbt
There Was a Record High of LGBTQ Series Regulars on TV This Season,,lgbt
Caitlyn Jenner: I Was Wrong To Support Trump,,lgbt
I'm working on looking androgynous. this is my progress so far. how do i look?,,lgbt
Can you guys please answer my question?,"This question has been bugging me for years and so far no one has given me a satisfactory answer yet. I figured i can go ask it here and maybe it can finally be answered by someone and offer some clarity and some personal peace of mind to me. 

What would a girl's gender be if she's emotionally attracted to males but is sexually attracted to females?

&amp;#x200B;",lgbt
"Being Transgender Is a Condition, Not a Choice. I Know Because I Tried Choosing Differently.",,lgbt
Question about stereotypes,"Hello r/lgbt. I was wondering, what stereotypes about gay people bother you the most, which are just outright falsehoods, and which have some element of truth? ",lgbt
Just a reminder: never read comments on Facebook,"I got really sad and cried when I read comments made by people in my country about Miss Spain. It's just awful. There are so many horrible people in my country. I hate it.
How can someone hope for the best with so much people like that?",lgbt
I am a lesbian and yes it is,,lgbt
"If anyone is interested in documentaries about homosexuality, you should definitely watch this. This one focuses on the history of the relationship between homosexuality and religion",,lgbt
[ADVICE] Person of interest came out how to go about it.,"Recently the person I like has come out as a trans-male on social media, I'm very happy that they are slowly getting comfortable with their body, and I understand that I wasn't one of the people he has told before going public about it. I'm not entitled to that, it's their hardship and I have to respect their decisions. So should I have a one on one with him and ask him how he feels with me being able to call him he/him because if I do it might cause some sort of dysphoria? I don't want them to feel uncomfortable around me but I don't know how to approach it either, I know that they probably know I've seen the post, but I'm not sure  what to do. I just want to be there for him is all I really know, sorry if this is selfish.",lgbt
I started a fun LGBT podcast,,lgbt
I’m coming out,Please help I don’t know how to tell my parents I’m gay please help,lgbt
"New to reddit, do we just post questions about lgbt or something else?",I don't know what I'm supposed to do here?,lgbt
Trans people and gender roles,"There's a post in r/TooAfraidToAsk asking if trans people reinforce gender roles. My comment is way too late to get noticed and most of the other comments are about what you would expect, so I wanted to post this here. I think it's an important understanding of the things trans people face every day.

I'm going to start by stating that trans people are incapable of  reinforcing gender stereotypes by nature. It is a stereotype that women are assigned female at birth and that men are assigned male at birth.  Assumptions about the way a man's or woman's genitals will look are  stereotypes. Etc. The core problem trans people have is people trying to  enforce these stereotypes on us. When you see a trans person in the  street, your ability to see them as trans is because they don't fit the  stereotypes you expect from the gender you suspect they're performing.

All of this is complicated by media. The public has a fascination  with trans people who are just beginning their transition and trans  people who fit the stereotypes extremely well. When you look at the  articles written about trans people, they are most likely to feature  trans people who fit either of those two categories. Articles, youtube  videos, and other media by trans people are more likely to become  popular if they fit those two categories as well. This is how cis people  use trans people to reinforce gender stereotypes.

When trans people first come out, there is often a period where they  play with gender roles. This often means playing roles that reinforce  stereotypes. This is a normal process that everyone experiences during  natal puberty. It's an important part of becoming your gender. It's  often an exaggerated process because of the driving need trans people  have to get free of dysphoria, but it's still basically the same  process. When viewed from the outside, this process often gives people  the feeling that trans people are trying to blatantly reinforce gender  stereotypes.

Trans people who have been out for a while are usually only featured  in media if they continue to fit cis people's understanding of the  gender binary. These are trans people who ""pass"" really well as cis men  or cis women.

When put together these two states, which originate from cis people,  create a narrative of transition that looks exactly like puberty, but  starts later in life and has a completion state. In the process it also  paints a picture of trans people as actively trying to reinforce gender  stereotypes. This understanding is so far from the truth that it isn't  even capable of being wrong.

The truth is that trans people are just people. There are some trans  people who adamantly enforce gender stereotypes, and push those roles  onto as many people as they can. There are some people who adamantly  fight against gender stereotypes and push to break down those roles at  every opportunity. I would say that most trans people are simply  muddling through life with the extra burden of having to constantly  think about these things because the nature of our beings irrevocably  breaks the gender stereotypes.

The definition of who is a man, who is a woman, and the roles they  should play are in constant flux. The borders are fuzzy and the language  used to define them is violence. The way that trans people's nature  breaks gender stereotypes is the source of the violence we face every  day.",lgbt
This is so fucking cute 🏳️‍🌈🏳️‍🌈🏳️‍🌈,,lgbt
Rami Malek: I felt terrified playing Freddie Mercury,,lgbt
"I always thought I was straight, but now I’m thinking that I’m sexually attracted to some men. I come from a conservative state (Indiana) so I’m scared to try having sex with a man. Any advice?",,lgbt
Did I go too far?,"I'm not exactly sure if this is the right place to post this or not, but here we go. (Also, I'm on mobile so sorry for formatting!) 

I frequent a small discord server of around 30 people. I've been there around a year so I feel like I know the group pretty well. For some reason the topic of transgender lesbians was brought up. Somebody said ""that's disgustingly messed up"" and nobody disagreed.

Now, I'm not LGBT but I fully support those that are. So I called the them out on that. After about 15 minutes of discussion, I called him a bigot. And now one of the mods has kicked me from the server for ""bullying"" him.

So I guess my question is, did I really go too far? I feel like they were just being assholes and I was in the right. Idk, I'd hate to lose a close group of friends like that, but at the same time, if they think like that I don't want to be in that group anymore.

Edit: thanks everybody that replied! I'm feeling a lot better about leaving that server",lgbt
Problems with family/coming out,"I’ve been out to myself and almost everyone (expect for family) around me as a gay female for around a year now (before that I idetified as bi), since I started university so I moved out from home to the capital city of my country to study there, so I’m not around my family constantly anymore but I go home two times a month. Now I have a girlfriend and really supporting friends and I know that they all love me lots. I seem to be pretty confident and have never felt like i’m less than a person for being gay.
Now, I never had any problems with letting my friends and other people that I interact with know I’m gay but my family is another thing. I don’t know if my dad would mind the whole thing (honestly i dont think so) but my mom... she is terrible, every time we touch even just the topic of anything lgbt related she freaks out, calls lesbians “fucking pussy lickers”, tells me every damn time that she really hopes I’m not gay and that if I were she wouldn’t want to meet me anymore at all, and that every gay person or really anyone from the community is a “freak” and just a disgrace for their parents, and how every parent would hate their kid being lgbt even if they act supportive. It really makes me feel like shit for obvious reasons. Even though I don’t live at home most of the time, I’m still depending on my parents financially and also emotionally (I’m an only child and I used to be relly close to my mom before I started constantly lying to them). 
The worst thing is that every time I visit my parents this happens, and every time I somehow feel like my mom is right, even though with my mind I know that she just talks shit, but I feel like really no one who isn’t a “degenerate” like me could ever really like me, or even if they like me, they would just be happy that I don’t ruin their family, but mine. And like... I know it’s bullshit and I know that my friends love me and that there are really normal and great parents who still love their children and that I was just told this so many times that I somehow started to believe it. 

Really I don’t even know if I wrote this out to get advice, but really, I just wanted to rant because I feel like shit lmao

(also sry if the punctuation is messed up in this mess of a post, but english is only my second langauge and I think I’ll never learn where to put commas lmao)",lgbt
"Tight lycra singlets, dominance play, intense body contacts. Is wrestling the most homoerotic sport?",,lgbt
Hey guys! Can I get some advice?,,lgbt
Trans Authors To Support!,,lgbt
"I'm honestly surprised at how much I like pictures of myself now, even though I used to hate them",,lgbt
"Five years ago today!! I’m sorry but I don’t think I’m scary like people say in the news. I’m a sweet girl that loves to love fighting my way through cancer and just trying to survive. And I’m proud of the girl I’ve become. I hope one day people will open their eyes, we will not be erased!",,lgbt
"Hey I’m Aki, behind me is Alice. We’re a pair of Transbians and she just turned 24. I wanted to share her beautiful smile with the world. Happy birthday, my death star sunflower.",,lgbt
Questioning sexuality,So I know I’m straight but my mind keeps questioning it. Like but “what if you’re gay” and I keep over analyzing my past with everyone in my life categorizing if gay or not. Lately that thought has been slowly fading away but when it comes back it just drains me and I just want it to go away. Please help ,lgbt
Got married last week!!,,lgbt
"ASU Library archivists make marginalized history accessible to all: ""a large portion of the Bj Bud Memorial Archives, the largest LGBT collection in Arizona, will soon be accessible online, to anyone, anywhere.""",,lgbt
Some of the personal items on display at the National Museum of American History that were Matthew Shepard’s. But a glimpse into who he was and who he could have become. My heart aches so much... ❤️🧡💛💚💙💜💖🖤🌈🏳️‍🌈😢💔,,lgbt
Don't know if I'm an Ace or repressed Bi- please help,"I don't know if this is the right place to post this, but here it goes:

I'm pretty sure I'm asexual, but I don't know 100%? I've seen guys and girls that I find very- for lack of a better word - attractive. But not in a ""wow, I want to have sex with them way"", more in a "" wow, that person is so beautiful"" kinda way. And I've had crushes on people (guys and gals) where I fantasize about getting married and having a future together, but never about having sex with them.

But it's not like I don't have a sex drive, because I do. Not to get too detailed but I definitely have a sex drive. It just doesn't seem to be directed at anyone in particular?? 

The idea of sex is gross, but I'm not utterly repulsed, just a little freaked out. And I'm not sure if its because I'm a virgin or asexual.

I've been thinking that maybe I should try having sex (with both genders) before I decide if I'm an ace or just a really repressed bi (or pan??). 

Do you think that's a bad idea? Have any of you experienced anything similar? Please let me know. 

- sincerely, a very confused person 
",lgbt
Yassssss,,lgbt
I just turned 20 years old just yesterday and at 15 I never thought I would last till then but I made it through and couldn’t be happier,,lgbt
"My intersex life:Now I have a new penis, I hope I will find love",,lgbt
Liking the dick?,"Is there any name to those who like it ? I don't really feel atracted to men themselves , unless they are feminine I'm ok with it.

There's something about dick that makes me want it .",lgbt
Tadd Fujikawa hopes his coming out gives other gay golfers courage to do the same: He’s the first men’s professional golfer to come out.,,lgbt
Transgender and LGBQ Community Take Action at Allegheny County Jail; Met With Pittsburgh Police in Riot Gear,,lgbt
Me 🏳️‍🌈 Irl,,lgbt
My friend said he’s pleased to report that the new Taco Bell near his apartment in Chicago is “very very gay”. So I made him this to help him celebrate.,,lgbt
I’ve come too far to be erased now,,lgbt
(Hope this is allowed) BBC piece about the legacy of Matthew Shepard 20 years on,,lgbt
Comic Girl Coffee Creates a Safe Space in RNC Hosting Charlotte,,lgbt
13 Mind-Expanding Nonfiction Books to Read for LGBTQ History Month,,lgbt
Love to see that representation!,"A record-high percentage of LGBTQ characters are part of the new TV season's prime-time network series, according...

https://www.ctvnews.ca/entertainment/study-finds-lgbtq-characters-on-network-tv-hit-a-record-high-1.4150670",lgbt
In need of support! &lt;3,"For your entertainment &lt;3

[https://youtu.be/Z7KfyJeqJm4](https://youtu.be/Z7KfyJeqJm4)

&amp;#x200B;

Please subscribe to my channel and support me. I love the community I am part of and I know many of you are so kind and supportive! I left a link to a video I made so you can find your way to my channel if you want to see more videos from me! New video every Friday or Saturday &lt;3

thank you and sending lots of love your way!",lgbt
Gay podcast! (X-post from r/actuallesbians),"My best friend and I started a podcast! Two lesbians talk about LGBT+ topics of all sorts. Its funny, personal, and entertaining. New espisodes biweekly. If we get any, we answer listener questions so hopefully we get to hear from you! Listen to is at: https://usersguidetoblank.podbean.com/ And follow us on Twitter @UsersGuideto___",lgbt
How can I educate myself?,"I just came out as gay about a year ago. How can I become more educated and well-versed in the LGBT+ community? I want to learn all about the history, culture,  issues, and figures that made the community what it is today, but I don't know where to start! Basically, i'm asking for ""must-see"" suggestions for movies, shows, musicians, books, articles, etc. etc.

Thank you!!",lgbt
A shirt I found at the mall.,,lgbt
LGBT Theme Tune,"May i propose to all the song and especially the Video of Beautiful by Christina Aguilera. 

Please all find comfort in that We Are All Beautiful.  

",lgbt
A kids book I found about crayons coloring rainbows everywhere to save the world from darkness. Precious.,,lgbt
My thoughts to the trans community of US! Together we’re stronger!,,lgbt
Still not on hrt. But 2 years still makes a difference,,lgbt
"Need advice on ""coming out""?","This is probably a bit out of the norm but I'm still not really sure what to do.

I'm nonbinary (agender specifically but a little more masc presenting). I'm fully out as trans, and medically transitioning. I've identified as aromantic and asexual for most of my life.

Im secure in my gender identity. Im definitely not cis, and I've known since childhood. Im starting to realize though that I'm not aro or ace. I might still possibly be under that umbrella (demi specifically) but I definitely like guys and Im starting to come to terms with that.
Now, Im afab, so if I were cis, I would just be a straight girl. It wouldn't have been a surprise until I came out as trans (and maybe even after that) for me to like men. Problem is
I have a hard time discussing romantic and sexual things, especially with my family (don't have the best relationship). I'd like to I guess
basically come out
but I'm not entirely sure what orientation I'd be considered since I'm only into men, and I don't know how to approach the subject with them without having severe anxiety despite it probably not being much of a surprise at all. 

I feel like Im kind of taking away from the struggles of other LGBT people too because hey

if I were cis, I'd just be a straight girl, as expected,  so I feel like viewing this as ""coming out"" is invalidating other people, and that my feelings or concerns are kind of stupid and not really valid. I dunno how to shake this feeling and also find a comfortable way to address this all.

Any advice?

",lgbt
Jacobin article on the attack on Trans life in the US,,lgbt
Caitlyn Jenner: I thought Trump would help the LGBTQ community. I was wrong.,,lgbt
Something,,lgbt
About to go on a date with a transwomen in a few days and honestly looking forward to it.,"So I'm gay, have been for years and never even thought of dating someone trans...that was until I met a girl named avery (name changed for privacy) who I honestly thought was a normal girl.

She started working with me, we got to know eachother over the past three months and for some reason I started getting feelings for her, which made me start thinking I was bi and made me question myself again. Yesterday I finally decided to ask her out and she looked at me with a surprised look on her face.

She looked at me and said, ""wow never thought you would be into someone like me who's trans! Been hoping you would ask me.""

She gave me a hug and we hugged and then that night we worked out when our first date will be, which is sunday. Right now I am really looking forward to it and now I think I might be pan but still a little confused. Just need to figure it out.

Anyway I've been wanting to share that story and thought this was the best place to do it.",lgbt
"I shared a video where Heath Ledger talked about Homosexuality. It got taken down by the mods for being ""Too political"" I had no idea that who someone is, could be politically offensive..",,lgbt
Asexual and Sociopathic Tendencies confused***,"Hello Guys :)

I've always been very confused about my sexuality and recently stumbled across the term os asexuality and realized that it had fit me perfectly in every way :)

(like a cozy blanket).

But I am very confused regarding the aspect of my romantic feelings.

I do not in any way experience sexual attraction and has never experienced sexual attraction towards anyone. But I have developed and liked individuals around me.

Disclaimer\*\*\* I have sociopathic tendencies diagnosed by therapists due to my childhood and how it had moulded me, no I wasn't born with sociopathic tendencies, and no I'm not sociopathic.

The problem is, my approach towards individuals romantically has always been the fact that I would not develop a romantic connection unless they had approached first, or if my friends wanted me to date them. As soon as someone responded in feelings, I would completely loose feelings towards the individual, but would date them because thats what people wanted me to do.

I always did what others wanted me to do, what I thought was normal for people to feel.

I have liked people before (romantically) but I have never ever been interested in someone without one of the reasons listed above happening.

I don't know, but I find that slightly odd, I don't know if thats normal or not

(just recently, I had thought that my sexuality was completely alike to those around me).

I was wondering if anyone else experienced something that this?",lgbt
I’m 12 Mormon and secretly gay,"Hi I’m 12 and live in the farming part of Wisconsin but close to Sheboygan if you know whare that is

Any ways I’m gay and the only one who knows is my best friend I live in a Mormon family with my brothers and grandma  

My brothers make jokes and call me gay and that I’m going to get sent to convertion tharpy as soon as my grandma finds out but that don’t know that I’m gay and that think it’s harmless fun because they  don’t know that actually I’m gay and it’s not like school is any escape either I go to the most homophobic school ever the most used insults are “fag” and “gay” 

As an example a kid said he was okay with gay people and one of the most popular kids in my grade said it was against the Bible and against god and know one said any thing not even the teacher 


So I came here looking for advice I already posted this on r/askgaybros but I thought I could get more advice here

Ps sorry for the spelling ",lgbt
How do you accept yourself?,"So, on the surface I’m a cis-gender, heterosexual female. But I really feel like I’m non-binary pansexual and have always felt that way even before knowing the words for it. My family isn’t accepting and I have kids (no partner) and there’s just too many people and too many questions and I don’t know how I want to do it if at all. It’s easy to hide behind this normative mask, but I’m not fucking happy. I want to be me but it’s scary, especially after being kicked out at 16 for trying out religion. Anything against their views is worthy of exile but I rely on them right now for practical support. 

Context: childhood abuse survivor, former addict, mentally ill, and student social worker. ",lgbt
Caitlyn Jenner: I thought Trump would help trans people. I was wrong.,,lgbt
No one cares until he comes after them,,lgbt
Turkish Transgender Social Media Star’s Song Rocks YouTube Lists,,lgbt
"Short Film ""One of the Flowers"" Is An Ode to Bisexuality",,lgbt
"For the first time in history, the number of LGBT TV characters that are people of color outweigh the number of LGBT characters that are white",,lgbt
It took the threat of trans erasure for Caitlyn Jenner to unsupport Trump.,,lgbt
"The UK's first bisexual dating show ""The Bi Life"" airs today on E! at 9pm! 💙💗💜",,lgbt
Got banned from r/politicalopinions for positing federal law protects trans right and then getting blamed for trolls targeting the comment.,,lgbt
This made me smile today. Hope it also brightens yours.,,lgbt
"#wontbeerased I'll stand by any of you, any time, any day.",,lgbt
PSA for trans people: Avoid Emirates (Dubai) &amp; Etihad Airways (Abu Dhabi),"UAE government has a new regulation in place ([http://www.mohap.gov.ae/Files/MOH\_Service/361/Guidelines%20for%20carrying%20of%20personal%20medicines%20with%20travelers%20in%20to%20the%20UAE.pdf](http://www.mohap.gov.ae/Files/MOH_Service/361/Guidelines%20for%20carrying%20of%20personal%20medicines%20with%20travelers%20in%20to%20the%20UAE.pdf)) which governs **incoming passengers** and **transit passengers** transiting through UAE - most commonly Dubai (Emirates) and Abu Dhabi (Etihad Airways).

&amp;#x200B;

Under the new guideline most HRT medications have been listed under **Controlled Substances**:

1. Cyproterone
2. Estradiol
3. Oestradiol
4. Testosterone

As such, the new regulation requires you to

1. Notify the government of United Arab Emirates in advance if you are carrying those ([http://www.mohap.gov.ae/en/services/Pages/361.aspx](http://www.mohap.gov.ae/en/services/Pages/361.aspx))
2. Cannot carry more than 30 day supply if you are passing through there
3. Require you to present a written prescription and medication upon arrival
4. Declare that you are carrying those

So be mindful of that if you are traveling. 

&amp;#x200B;",lgbt
[TW - Language/Subject] Matthew Shepard Will Be Interred at the Washington National Cathedral Tomorrow (26.Oct),,lgbt
"Coworker just told me that ""all guys with long hair are gay"". Hostile work environment??","My coworker (straight male) just tried to tell me that all men who have long hair are gay (totally serious).  I was like you must be joking, that is absolutely ridiculous, that has no correlation and it's super ignorant. Another coworker (also straight male) was there and I was like can you believe what he is saying? And he AGREED with him, again both of them are totally serious.  I live in Portland Oregon, and they then proceeded to say that I belonged on the show portlandia. Like what the actual f\*\*k, I feel really uncomfortable around them now and I don't know what to do.",lgbt
"My transition is done - 2y 10mo on HRT, down over 90lb, MtF 29y.o. (without surgery yet and without photo edit)",,lgbt
Am I overthinking this? Does she like me?," Hey there,

(Just a disclaimer: I did post this on [r/](https://www.reddit.com/r/LesbianActually)actuallesbians as well. Figured I should post this another community where I could read difference responses/opinions.)

This is my first post, not too sure how to go about this but I'll give it my best try. It's that leap forward that gets you somewhere, and if I don't do this then I know I'll get nowhere with this at all. I'll probably end up hating myself for doing this, or regret will kick in and I'll feel like shit for the rest of the day. But if I'm being honest I've never spoken to anyone about my sexuality or anything really personal really. I do apologise beforehand if this is long and if I ramble on and on. I know it's annoying, it's something that I hate about myself too. Before anything else, I just want to thank you for even taking your time out of your day to read this. This is probably so stupid and quite possibly the lamest thing to be even using your time reading.

I'm in this somewhat dilemma and I don't know how to pursue this or if this is just simply nothing (maybe I'm just being friend zoned, or maybe she's just ""nice."") There's this girl at work, let's call her ""R"". She's about 4 years younger than me? Currently still in secondary school (she's legal, 18 is the legal age in Australia) and I think I've fallen for her. It's those subtle signs. This is probably one of the only times I'm crushing so hard, and my gaydar is terrible. To be honest, I'm pretty sure everyone at uni and work thinks I'm the straightest girl. Little do they know hey? (Maybe? I don't know.) It's obvious I'm a tomboy, even shows. But I think what confuses them most is probably my long hair? Possibly?

Anyway, I like R right? But I have no idea whether she likes me back. Do we flirt? Hell yeah we do. Do I catch her subtly checking me out from a distance? Of course and she catches me checking her out, vice versa. We've gone on lunch together, had a great time, talked about our personal lives and on both ends we ask quite personal questions too.

I have asked her once before if she has a boyfriend or if she's seeing someone. Her response was ""No, I'm not. No one wants to date me"". And the first thing that went through my head was like ""Hell yeah, she's single!"". But then the other half was like ""she's probably so straight. Like why wouldn't anyone date her?"". Doesn't really give me much of an answer if she straight or gay. It's one of those tough ones. I can't like straight up ask her how she identifies or who she's into. That's just creepy of me. I'm telling you right, she's gorgeous. She's beautiful and bloody intelligent and smart af as well. Straight A student and at the same time, she's a party girl? Because she goes out most Fridays and Saturdays. How isn't she taken, that's my question. She's beautiful.

My heart skips a beat every time I see her, even talking to her makes me flustered. The first few times talking to her, I would stumble on my words, get so flustered that I couldn't even talk straight. This is so embarrassing. I'm sorry, omg. And don't get me wrong, I'm sure she notices. It's so obvious right? Or maybe she's thinking ""this girl is so funny"". Probably.

I feel like we both make an effort to visit each other when we're in different departments, just passing by to see each other or on purposely trying to scare the other. No even joking but our eye contact, it's on point. It's like she's looking deep into my soul, I swear. She touches my arm or hand, when she's laughing or telling me something funny. Is that another sign? Physical contact? No? Fair enough, I mean I touch my friends on the arm when I'm telling something funny or laughing too. She faces her body towards me when speaking to me? Is that something? No? Because that's what most parents taught us to do when speaking to others when we were younger right? Fair enough, I think I'm just overthinking everything. This is probably nothing..

But in the beginning I noticed her licking her lips lots of times, flipping her hair, smiling lots and maybe she smiles all the time. I mean after like 3 years of braces, why wouldn't you show off your straight pearly whites right?

There was this one awkward moment when I was finishing early, she was working, went to hug her goodbye and both of us turned our heads the same way, nearly ended in us kissing but no. It was awkward, we laughed it off and I left.

Oh, you know how they say wearing red lipstick brings attention to your lips? She wore red lipstick this one day, and I noticed it. Did I say anything? Yes, because as you can tell I'm the most forthcoming and confident person of them all. No, I didn't say anything. But I noticed it. She was still just as beautiful, even with red lipstick on. Wow

Also, take in consideration, I think she's very straight because she's a big fan of 5SOS, One Direction, Shawn Mendez etc. Yeah, maybe I did stalk her social media before when it was public. I feel this connection with her, at the same time, i have this horrible feeling that she's straight. When I say shes a big fan, she was a bigger one before but I think now she's not so much of a HUGE fan like before. As she's older now, focusing on the more important things in life.

One other thing before I end this, she's like best friends with a couple of girls that we work together with. They grew up together, went to the same school and whatnot, started working together at the same time. Is it weird that when I tell her friend (whom I'm friends with as well, not really best friend with) that we went on our break together, and then she's like ""yeah I know, R told me"". Is that weird? Then again, it's just a girl thing yeah? Or like ""I've heard this story before.."" and I'm like ""from who? I only told..oh.."". And then i think she realises, so i stop and it's awkward. So I'm guessing she heard that from R telling her? That's cool, no harm done. I've met a couple of her friends. Well not met met; but seen her friends with her. And her friends have caught me staring at her as well, which is embarrassing. Another time she went to try on a shirt, and the same friend convinced her to ask me how she looked in it. Even though she was very embarrassed? Not sure if embarrassed is the word, but she was clearly not wanting to ask me. I think she was embarrassed to ask me, I mean judgement from someone you like is critical right? And it would mean a lot to them. But I could hear them beforehand, (in the fitting room) going back and fourth about how her friend wanted her to ask me how she looked in the shirt. But she was too embarrassed to ask me, maybe she was just shy. But well with some convincing, (Well myself and the girl I was training could hear their bickering, so we were like ""what's going on..?"" And they heard us, so that's when she came out and asked. She was bright red though, I think she was a little hesistent to ask me) she asked and I said she looked good in it. Which is the truth.

I'm sorry this is so long and boring. I'm just stuck in this rut, and I don't know if I should do anything about this or if I should just drop it. This is probably nothing, just another straight girl crush. Please do share your opinion, I'm all for it. But thank you for reading this if you've gotten this far, I really do appreciate it.

Thank you,

(PS: Might delete because I'm embarrassed and I know I'm over-reacting, over thinking this and just probably is nothing but her being friendly..)",lgbt
Bigotry: Busted,,lgbt
Advice for a up and coming young person.,"I've known I was gay since 8, I've recently turned 19 and my family treats me like a child talks to me like a child, I run a small business my cash goes to help the family, hard times are a real jerk I've gone though a lot thought about who i am and dealt with inner demons I am a very quite shy person but I over come that and have been doing better I want to become a crystal healer and interact with people more, My family supports me but does not have the time to help me I can help my self that's not the point the point is they think someone needs to take care of me my only thing is they don't think I will ever meet someone they think guys would make fun of me but I will say this I've had 14 guy friends on the internet and yes they were straight they knew I was gay but the thing that happened surprised  me  they were attracted to me and I don't look for love online because I don't want to tell them that we can never meet because I still live at home and my family hates! Meeting people off line, if I met the right human being I could have a lot more in my life I could have a person my family would trust and would let me have a lot more freedom, but finding a boyfriend is hard enough as it is for some but finding one in the shape that my life is in right now is a little bit harder, the people who live near here stay to them self's and most I would highly not date but for one he MIGHT be gay he is kinda cute i know hes about 20 and he does not do drugs and I know hes mom and brothers name and were he lives I walk dogs for a living so I end up meeting everyone and knowing everyone so any advice and for a side note I have a speech issue and I look 14 but I am really 19 I know its weird I've honestly said its because I am magical and I eat skittles I've had a rough week thinking about this type of stuff any words of wisdom.",lgbt
Are gay people attracted to men nipples?,,lgbt
My girlie &amp; I heading out for the day,,lgbt
I am super super confused.,"Okay so long story short, I've considered myself a lesbian for a long time. I've only ever dated girls, I've only ever been with girls. I have a strange aversion to men as a whole, it's just weird, they always make me uncomfortable. I recognized recently that a lot of this stems from issues with my father, but that's besides the point. It's been a very long time since I was romantically or sexually attracted to a man,and after I realized I was a lesbian I figured that any of those feeling were down to internalized homophobia and wanting to fit into society. Since I accepted that part of myself I've been much happier and have been solely attracted to women. 

&amp;#x200B;

And now here's the part I'm sure you knew was coming, there's this guy. He's just genuinely sweet and nice and smart. And we do the same thing, and the conversation between us just flows so normally. We became friends really quickly, and I've always been sure that he doesn't think of us as just friends. However I've never encouraged this - I'm not a jerk. But lately I've been feeling more then just friendship. I've thought about this a lot, and I think honestly like him as more then a friend. And I don't know what to think, like the idea of explaining this to my friends and my family makes me sick to my stomach. And I'm so worried that like I'm falling right into all the stereotypes that anti-LGBTQ people say like ""You just haven't found the right guy"". I don't want to be that person, but like the idea of not acknowledging this guy like hurts my heart? I don't want to just let this go in order to stick to my ""gold-star-lesbian"" ideals. I'm just so confused? Is this normal? Am I bisexual? Am I just confused? Am I just lonely? Has anymore else gone through this? ",lgbt
Cher your trans pride!,,lgbt
i think i might be gay/bi,"im 15 male and i think im gay but have no idea on how to know for sure 

any advice would be helpful

thanks

:)",lgbt
I’m just a gay guy wearing his favourite shirt.,,lgbt
Bi,"I'm so proud of everybody who's had the courage to come out if my parents knew i'd be stoned to death or something worse like hearing disappointment in their voices every time they talk to me. I wish I was safe enough to come out, I have no friends to talk to about it and I feel so alone",lgbt
The only reddit advert I'll upvote.,,lgbt
14 year old sister is bi,"She will be 15 in a few weeks and told me she wants an LGBT flag for her bday. For almost a year, she has told me she likes girls and our mom doesn't understand it. Mom is Christian but so are we. Sis also has a girlfriend recently and they hang out a lot and are still allowed to have sleepovers (I think, I live in a different state) but they are heavily monitored. 

My sister is very ""to herself"" and shuts down easily. She is close to my mom but when I told my mom I wanted to get sis the flag, mom said she didn't want her to have it but she won't tell me what to do. I will be a mom in January and have a 12 year old stepdaughter. I still want to get my sister the flag because she knows our mom won't buy it but I also know our mom will disapprove. How do I go about this?",lgbt
Thinking about publically coming out to family for Ace Awareness Week,Should I?,lgbt
GLAAD TV Report: Actors of Color Played Most of the LGBT Roles in 2018,,lgbt
I am curious what it is like to have gender dysphoria,"I am a cisgender gay guy and I am curious how it feels to have gender dysphoria and or not Identify as the sex you where born with. I have seen some explanations, but I would like to see how people who have experienced it in their own words. Also If this came off rude or inconsiderate in any way that was not my intention and I apologize.",lgbt
What would you define me as?,I’ve always had issues with how to describe my sexuality in words. I mostly have romantic feelings toward men but always like women more when it comes to the sexual aspect. I just call myself bisexual but I’m not too sure if that fully encompasses how I feel. What would be the  most accurate term for me to use besides “queer”. ,lgbt
Transphobic subreddits masquerading as feminist?,"Which feminist/""gender critical"" subreddits should I be watching out for ? Recently realized r/gendercritical is really anything BUT gender critical (extremely transphobic) ",lgbt
Trump Admin Wants to Remove Gender from UN Human Rights Documenta,,lgbt
So confused about my feelings and everything else.,"So there’s this girl that I’m really close to, we’re like sisters but recently (3-4 months ago) I started having feelings for her and I think about how much I would love to date her but I just can’t accept being with a woman and want to have my future with a man. I have thought about dating her or women in general but in the end I feel like I will be missing something that I really want if I end up marrying a woman and will not be happy due to missing what I really want to complete me. I know she likes me, she has told me plenty of times and we also even ended our friendship a few times because of this (on her part) for her it’s hard to be friends with me because of the feelings she has for me, for me it’s not hard to be friends with her even tho I have feelings for her as well. I don’t want to ruin our friendship if anything does happen if we dated, I also know eventually I will be with a man (she knows this) and I don’t want to hurt her.  If I acted on my feelings I feel like I’m being selfish knowing I will end up with a man in the future or won’t want to then leave her because I would feel bad and I would just suffer the rest of my life, also if I end up feeling like I really don’t want this it’ll really hurt her as well. What should I do? Is there anything I can do to keep this friendship strong and not lose it. ",lgbt
Good real lesbian porn websites?,"Looking for real homemade amateur, not that fake shit that pornhub likes to promote.",lgbt
Philip DeFranco covers the White House Trans Memo.,,lgbt
White Hetero Christian Male with Questions,"Hello. I hate all of the division and hate in the country right now. I've asked my wife questions, because she has had many friends who are part of the LBGTQ community, to help me gain a better understanding of the LBGTQ community. I'm still wanting a better understanding of what your ""Why"" is as part of the LGBTQ community. I just need someone to talk to about questions I have. Thank you.",lgbt
Brooklyn Nine-Nine is probably the best cop show out there!,,lgbt
Looking for short LGBT videos,"Hi LGBT!

* I frequently do trainings for the community (parents, teachers, therapists, youth, etc) on topics that affect the LGBT+ community - in particular LGBT youth and young adults.  I have been kicking around an idea to create a training made entirely (or mostly) of videos - short, 5-10 minute videos that explain some aspect of the LGBT+ community.  For example, I love the Intersex Youth Advocacy Group's video [What It's Like To Be Intersex](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=cAUDKEI4QKI&amp;feature=youtu.be).  I feel like they explain what it means to be Intersex so much better than I ever could.  What videos do you love, that should be included in a training?  Thanks so much for your help educating the general community!",lgbt
I love you with everything in me 💓,,lgbt
What is a woman? Toxic debate over trans rights engulfs Britain,,lgbt
"I began to create my own comic about my life. Coming soon online in the form of a webcomic. Did you read trans-webcomics? (2y 10mo on HRT, down over 90lb, MtF 29y.o.)",,lgbt
How do I know if I'm pansexual??,"So I (25F) have been straight for as long as I can remember, with a super high sex drive that got me in trouble from a really young age. Story for another time. But recently I've met a trans woman (26F) whom I really like and had a ""friend crush"" on for a while. I never knew her pre-transition so she has always just been female in my eyes. 

How do I know that I am pansexual or bisexual or just straight? I think about having sex with her and I think it might be fun, and I know she's pansexual bc she's dating another trans woman. If I had the opportunity to try it without ruining our friendship I totally would. 

Help??",lgbt
Found this on Pinterest but cant pin it because family will disown me ♥️,,lgbt
How to Deal with PTSD from Being Born Trans in America?,"This is a for real question. Cause of the bullying I’ve received and shit I’ve gone through I am pretty sure I have PTSD. I wake up in a cold sweat after having nightmares, I have intrusive thoughts like the time (probably average at least once an hour), and constantly self sabotage my own inter-personal relationships (platonic and romantic). Some days I just wish I could give up. It gets better for gay people. For trans people it stays the same or you go into hiding. There is very little in-between. ",lgbt
The strong groundhog,,lgbt
Gender Identity??,Could someone pass me a list of gender identities for a project I'm making??,lgbt
I exist,,lgbt
"My cousin just came out of the closet, but hasnt told her more traditional and conservative other side of the family.","She wants to tell them, because she loves them, but is afraid that they will shun her. Please help.( I know I have posted to subs like edgymemes and darkjokes, but I dont mean any of that stuff)",lgbt
I feel so attacked rn 😂😂😂,,lgbt
Looking for resources,"My 13 year old daughter came out as bi a few months ago and we're looking for resources. We want to make sure we won't fuck up our daughter. We picked up Coming Out, Coming Home and are reading it together. We live in northern Colorado and have failed to find groups for us or her to join.

While it's better now than ever in our society for LGBT folks it's still going to be a long road to adulthood and after with people not treating her right and I want her to be as prepared as possible. Particularly as we live in a fairly conservative area. Though her school has been great as have all of her teachers which I'm incredibly thankful for.

My wife is struggling with everything, she's not good with change and was raised in a very conservative part of Nebraska both working against her. She's trying but it's not as easy for her as it is me she's said.

And not just resources to help me with her, I also want to educate myself and inform my vote as well.

Thank you in advance!",lgbt
Just in case it’s wasn’t clear... #WeWontBeErased #WeWontLetThemTry,,lgbt
Bisexuals of Reddit. Do you have a 50/50 attraction to each sex? Or do you prefer one over the other?,"Bonus question: Would you feel like there's something missing in your life if you got married? To clarify, would it bother you to know you'll probably never (or never again) have sex with someone of the opposite gender to your partner?",lgbt
Fight all erasure,,lgbt
HILL HOUSE changed me...,"I finished watching THE HAUNTING OF HILL HOUSE a few days ago and it has changed how I see things. My life, my family, love, death... And so much more. I realize it's just a series, but it felt like so much more... Especially that finale.

As a trans woman in hiding, I've been very scared, for many years... And now I see I've built walls between myself and people I care about, trying to protect myself and them, but mostly myself... But as the show states, walls don't work that way, putting myself behind a wall has just been slowly killing me and causing me unnecessary suffering. I've been trying to meet fear halfway, yet I'm actually yeilding to it... I need to start fighting it.

There's gonna be hard times, it's a certainty, my family isn't gonna be on board right away. I'm probably gonna hurt them, as they will me. But in the end I know they love  me, as I do them. That's all... The rest is confetti.

I only hope I can build the courage to break down those walls... And soon.",lgbt
"I went to a wedding last Saturday, this was one of the awesome photos taken 💕",,lgbt
"6 years ago when I took this photo I was a scared, depressed and anxious trans youth who couldn't vocalize what was wrong with them. When we are finally getting to a place where kids like me 6 years ago are finally seeing positive representation and voices, let us never be erased.",,lgbt
Being Trans in America Was Already Scary. Now It’s Terrifying.,,lgbt
Uruguay passes a groundbreaking trans equality law as the US rolls back rights.,,lgbt
"I made my trans friend (FTM) a Trans flag beanie and pride flag ""beard"" to wear. I hope he likes it!",,lgbt
Apparently I need help,,lgbt
Too Fierce to be Erased,,lgbt
Am I Trans?,"Yeah, and I know that question is asked a billion times daily on this sub. But it’s been a real pain in the ass, trying to figure it out, and the only answers I’ve been getting is “you’ll figure it out” or “be patient”. So here goes, and forgive my really long rambling.  
My birth name is Nathan, but a lot of the time I go by Amber with my friends. I’m a junior in high school, and I’ve started having some vague thoughts, some remotely sexual I guess (not sure about that part) about being female since at the very least seventh grade and possibly longer as well, back to maybe 5th grade when my friend explained to me the idea.   
The issue, however, is that I’ve always had dislike for my body, originally my weight and then acne and other things. At my current point I’m actually not too bad in the body positivity department, not happy or whatever but I’ve accepted I’m around if not a little below the average area and not totally ugly. I’ve had a girlfriend and somewhat intimate experiences but definitely not looking towards sex. However my point overall is like, dysphoria wise, I don’t really get it much? I mean, sometimes when I’m browsing through this or some other LGBT sub and I’ll see some flawless trans girl I’ll get really upset for reasons I can’t fully trace, but overall? Being in my body is manageable. Down there, with the ‘equipment’ so to speak, honestly seeing that sometimes makes me uncomfortable or cringe when I, but at the same time, the thought of bottom surgery does too. Metaphorically speaking my body isn’t the best, per se, but I guess it’s comparable emotionally and mentally to driving some new, sleek Mustang being transitioned as opposed to some dirty old crap car you’ve had your whole life and have adjusted to. And I’m far from an emotional person, at least publicly, and regarding pronouns, honestly I somewhat prefer female (I think?) but it doesn’t matter much. I’m pretty sure I’m not gender-neutral or enby either, because my feelings are pretty consistent except for when I suddenly get into fearful bouts of “I’m not/can’t be trans”.  
Emotionally and personally are, arguably, like, bigger issues. I don’t have feminine speech patterns or interests a lot of the time, being all cutesy and stuff is something I sorta feel into a little bit every now and then but I feel like I’d be lying if I said I had a female personality, despite wanting one? I make stupid and dirty jokes incessantly, I’m obnoxious, loud sometimes around my friends I’m comfortable with, but a bit shyer in public. I have typically male interests; video games, superhero stuff, guns, all that (although I do like a well-written romance book every now and then, and I’m far from a competitive or sporty person). And I’m not sure how much this affects things but I never spent much time on my appearance, and me and a few trusted friends were gonna work on makeup and seeing if I could pass, but I’m even a bit anxious about THAT. Weird thing to say but for me I almost feel like...I don’t know, if I’m really obviously just biologically male wearing female clothes, what’s the point? Maybe I’ll feel a bit better but it won’t do shit unless I pass. Sometimes I sort of think and wonder that if I was female, I could have a more feminine personality and do more feminine things without feeling awkward and still be happy with myself, but I’m not sure. I have ADHD and possibly some bigger self-esteem issues or depression, if that affects things?  
Regarding my social life and this situation, it’s been mixed. Before I realized I was trans and probably something that helped me realize it was that online in games and chat rooms I would go on with a female username or persona (not sure if that’s immoral but oh well). AFTER I realized, I confronted one of my trans friends about it, and she said that out of our group of friends I was the most likely she thought would be as well due to being asexual and general behavior and not really caring about style or my body for some reason, although that could’ve been hindsight bias. Every single other person I ever told was completely blindsided by it. My parents, after raiding my social media account and reading all my conversations and secrets (still haven’t mentally recovered lmao) had varied reactions. My more liberal mother confronted me first and before she figured out the truth assumed I was gay (she believed that for a while for some reason and still thinks I like men), but once I told her the truth she was supportive, saying I could make my own decisions, she understands, offering to help with transition, etc. However, once she did her own ‘research’, her opinion continuously changed. Her mindset then moved to that I can make any “non-permanent” decisions, then moving to her classic position of hardcore pressuring me NOT to, and not even allowing me that. She currently believes and has said things like that there was no sign in childhood (which is probably true from her experience but I’m vaguely sure that I remembered dressing up and playing pretend with a lot of female friends I had, although not positive), that there was NEVER a time that I said anything or did anything that made her think “wow, that was effeminate”, and that there’s really no point of transitioning because I’m so manly and I’d just be a “manly girl”. Another thing to note would be whenever I really see anti-trans rhetoric regarding me or not, saying that a lot regret surgery or that I’m not trans, I instantly go paranoid about it, such as “what if I’m not trans and I said I was to my friends and now I’m just playing along and have to eventually admit that I’m a boy” and the like. My mom’s comments had the same effect, even though she’s claiming she doesn’t want me to be pushed into either role of male or female but suspects my friends have done so with me thinking I’m trans. My conservative father, on the other hand, doesn’t understand nor really care about me being trans, and ironically is more supportive than my mother has been. He doesn’t believe I am and all that, but he firmly believes that it’s my life and therefore ‘my funeral’.

So the biggest point is that just...it’s less of reasoning that I’m not trans, but I honestly feel like the only thing that could even classify me as trans is the mentality that I want to be a woman at least in physicality and sometimes emotionally? Now I know that sounds dumb and how “that’s every trans person”, but what I mean is like from an exterior or behavioral perspective there are no signs. There isn’t any objective reason or thing that I’ve said or done or shown before my knowledge that I’m *really* trans, and not just curious or some weird-ass sexual deviant. So am I trans? And if so, how? I’d really, really like some hard truthful answers, trying to be as objective as possible regarding it instead of relying on “well do you think you’re a woman” or something. And as a reminder, I’d rather get the truth than a yes, if you get my meaning.

Anyway, that’s all I can think of for now. Sorry for wasting your time, and thanks for reading. You can message me or put down a comment if you have an answer or are willing to help.

&amp;#x200B;

Edit: A few words

Edit 2: Goddamn formatting, jesus christ",lgbt
"'You can't undo surgery': More parents of intersex babies are rejecting operations for ""gender normalization"", which can lead to complications later in life for some. Delaying procedures until later in the child's life are gaining support.",,lgbt
Now the Trump Administration Is Trying to Erase Trans People at the United Nations,,lgbt
Why Cis People’s Feelings Must Not Take Precedence Over Trans Rights,,lgbt
Fuck Trump,"I just wanted to say that on here. 

I am so sorry this country treats you like this. I hope I live long enough to see things get better.",lgbt
We will fight for everyone! None of us will be erased.,,lgbt
Faesari purple moodboard made by proud-nblm on Tumblr,,lgbt
No exaggeration: Trump wants to erase transgender people,,lgbt
"AMA: I was the first at my school to ever come out as LGBT+ (bisexual) and led to my school being more acceptive and open to LGBT+ subjects and topics, also leading to other students coming out as LGBT+","Title says it all, if this isn’t allowed here ask me to delete it and I will.",lgbt
"As a pan boy currently questioning their cis status and someone with many trans/nb friends, I am absolutely terrified and enraged at what the Trump Administration is doing.","If only they knew the suffering my friends go through daily. Dysphoria, general doubt, low self esteem... and now they're going to be erased from existence?!

Honestly, if they maybe just stepped into your shoes for one day, they'd know the suffering and pain you already go through.

It's going to be tough, everyone. But you are strong. You're tough. You've fought and won almost impossible battles. I know you can win this. And I'll be with you every step of the way.

Godspeed, my friends. Godspeed. ",lgbt
The Advocate wants video submissions from as many trans people as possible.,,lgbt
So I did something new and daring,....I bought myself some lace hipster panties because this  Bisexual Bear wants to explore his femme side. Thank you and Good Night.,lgbt
Can anyone help a cis girl find more trans media?,"Hey friends! 

I live in the US, and as many of us know, the orange man is threatening the identity of trans people. 

I want to use this opportunity to listen much more actively to my trans brothers, sisters, and siblings. I know that it is not the place of trans people to teach cis people, so I’m more so looking for people and things to learn from. Sources that are true and trans positive. 

I am from the southern US, and our LGBTQ+ community is very small as is, so I don’t know any trans people that have spoken about being trans to me (I’m not sure this makes sense... I know of one trans woman, but have never talked to her, and anyone else I know who might be trans has not come out to me). 

When I came out, it took me months and months to find much in the way of knowledge about my own identity, and I feel like this situation in the US is much more time pressing... we don’t have months. 

I am so sorry if I have made any phrasing mistakes, or said something wrong. I am trying to be the best possible cis ally, and we all have to start somewhere. ",lgbt
This is how trans exclusionary “feminists” react to a cis woman victim of sexual assault,,lgbt
"What are your favorite queer music videos? (not 'political statement' queer, but videos where it's treated like a normal thing)","I've been looking for queer music videos and all of the ones I seem to find make a big deal out of the fact that they're queer and milk it for drama. I'm thinking [Same Love](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=hlVBg7_08n0),  [1-800-273-8255](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Kb24RrHIbFk), [Take Me to Church](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=PVjiKRfKpPI), etc.

&amp;#x200B;

I want cute, fun, lighthearted shit that doesn't make queer persecution a big dramatic spectacle. One example I like is [Come Over by The Internet](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=NB3gWkhLkxM). Are there other songs/music videos that are like this?",lgbt
I’m a 46 year old married mum and today I came out to my family.,"This is pretty much my first post on Reddit ever, the title sums it up to be honest. Should I feel this scared? It all kind of just blew up over the last 5 days and I had to stop lying to myself. ",lgbt
LGBTQ-Affirming Church Hit by Bigoted Vandalism Yet Again,,lgbt
Bi roomate also transphobic,"Hello everyone 💕
I AM SO ANNOYED lol

So me and my roomate are great friends. We both are queer (me being lesbian, her being bisexual) yada no we are not involved with each other at all.

We got into a discussion today about someone she invited over (a tindr date) or something and it pissed me off.

1) she was disgusted this person was trans and talked a bunch of shit 
She is a trump supporter 
she claims to be bi.
She makes mean comments about trans people anytime the topic comes up

I just don’t get how she can say she’s lgbt and hate trans people ? Is this common ? ",lgbt
"Muslims Have Been Doing This A Lot Lately. Going To Gay Prides /Minority Gatherings And Insulting People In Their Own Language To Get Likes On Twitter. If You Find Shit Like This, Report It.",,lgbt
DOJ: Businesses Can Discriminate Against Transgender Workers,,lgbt
Forever my favourite picture of me and my girl.,,lgbt
It’s my cake day! 🍰🍰,,lgbt
Trans FTM or Non-Binary?,"As of now, I have been identifying as nb, using they/them pronouns. 
But, I constantly have thoughts like, ""If I could wake up tomorrow in a guys, body. I'd do it."" ""I wish my name was more masculine."" ""I hope this isn't too feminine."" Dressing masculine, I get serge of confidence. Getting called m'am, miss, she, her, etc. I get major dysphoria. My chest-- I can't bear it. I think, ""Girls have chests. So why do I have one..?"" But like, I wouldn't ever want facial hair. I'm not sure, what this all means.",lgbt
I think I might be trans (FtM),"I've identified as a lesbian for the past four years or so, but I've also wondered if I could be trans. And lately I've been wondering more and more.

A few days ago I got my hair cut shorter than I ever have, and I felt so happy. Looking in the mirror I actually loved what I saw. I didn't understand why it made me so happy, but I think it might be bc I looked like I could possibly be a guy.

I've always felt uncomfortable in my body, but I figured it was due to being fat and having body image issues. But lately I've just been so frustrated by my breasts, wanting them gone. And honestly I've hated the size of them for as long as I can remember.

Despite being a lesbian, I have this fascination with men's faces and bodies. Not in a sexual way, but still some sort of desire. I usually enjoy straight porn more than lesbian porn.

As a kid I had mostly guy friends, though I liked girls a lot, they made me very nervous and I felt out of place with them.

I used to imagine romantic stories as a kid between a guy and a girl, but I identified with the male characters much more than the girls. I'd always watch romantic movies/shows and relate to the guy a lot.

Could I be trans? Are there any trans guys that could tell me how they figured it out/ noticed it? Am I just overthinking this? What do I do if I am trans? I'm feeling very overwhelmed by all of this",lgbt
Trans mood rn,,lgbt
Transgender rights petition to stop trump. sign and share x,,lgbt
Celebrating 9 Years of Marriage Today! (My Wife is Trans &amp; I am NB),"Today is my 9 year Anniversary with my beautiful Wife Karissah!  She came out to me a few years ago during The final Presidential Debate.  She was so furious with Trump that she finally let down her guard and told me.  We kissed and celebrated and I revealed that I had known.  I had noticed over time and was just so glad she finally was able to just come out to me.    


We have 2 amazing kids ages 6 and 11.  They have adjusted just beautifully and are Karissah's biggest Advocates and call her Mom!  Our oldest, was actually just my son from a previous relationship and just this year, the courts finalized her adopting him!  I LOVE MY WIFE!    


We live in a red state but fortunately the city is liberal and our kids school is too.  These are scary days and we are very active in the community here in Boise and won't be silenced.  Here is a picture of She and I at this years Pride as she is leaning down to kiss my nose as she so lovingly often does.  


I look forward to growing old with her.  While my parents and brother disowned me for standing by my wife, I couldn't be happier living my life with her and our two kids!  This is where my heart and family is now.  This is where I belong.  

https://i.redd.it/j72ri7hee5u11.jpg",lgbt
One hell of a situation,"Hello,

I don't know if this is in the wrong spot or anything so please forgive me if so. Also, if the formatting is off I'm doing this from my phone.

I have been dating my girlfriend for about a year now, and just a few days ago I underwent the realization that I was gay. For my entire life I had been repressing feelings that were there and telling myself they weren't right. And now I've dug myself such a hole by doing that, that I genuinely don't know what to do.

My girlfriend is truly an amazing person, coming out of an abusive household with a life that to be fair, before college, was pretty shitty. She had been thrown so many curve balls by the universe that it's genuinely unfair. 

My problem is, is that I can't continue in this relationship. I want to be friends, and I really don't want to hurt her. I don't know how or when to tell her. I really don't want her to hate me or think that I'm lying, or even blame it on herself. Dealing with depression and anxiety I know that the first thought that will run through her head is that it's her fault. I just don't know how to do it as painlessly as possible as bad as that sounds. I want to come out of this as friends and certainly don't want to lose her but I'm scared that she won't want to be around me at all after this. 

I don't plan on coming out to anyone but maybe a few people, but I don't know what I would say to our friends either, I don't really want them to know for a while and if I just tell everyone that I suddenly broke up with the woman I thought I was going to marry, it'd certainly raise some eyebrows.

Any help whatsoever would be entirely appreciated, please.",lgbt
A thought I had on the hypocrisy of many of those against the LGBT community.,"I hope this is okay for me to post this here, it was just a thought that I put into words. This of course is not directed at the members of this group, but towards those who are against members of the LGTB community. This is something I wish I could say to all of them because to me it just really does not make sense.

This is for everyone who is so against members of the LGTB community.....you do realize how hypocritical you all are right?

You are all okay with the concept that workplaces and employers cannot discriminate against things like gender, gender orientation, sexuality and sexual orientation, religion, race etc....but you yourselves have no problem publicly judging people about these things...pathetic.

Especially when you take into consideration how many of you would full on disown your own children if they should be involved in anything you are not in agreement with...such as being gay or transexual.

Just something for you all to think about...if its not okay for your employer to judge you based on these things...why is it okay for your family and friends to?",lgbt
Don’t Give Up My Trans Siblings! There IS Hope!,,lgbt
I would like some advice,"Yesterday I had my fisrt personal homophobic happening. My younger co-workers had a conversation about homophobic topics like how 'gays aren't really humans' and how 'people can't let their kids be trans'. I was so upset and hurt, being a queer myself. I am not sure how to go about telling them how hurtful this stuff was. Please if you have any advice or tips to talking about these important topics.. Leave a comment. ",lgbt
Hello r/LGBT! I need your help. I’m hosting a Pride Night at my local arcade and I could use some input.,"This is my first long winded text post. I’m sorry if it’s not formatted very well.

# Some Background

I live in South Texas, specifically the Rio Grande Valley (the literal bottom of Texas,) and after some research I found there are very few queer public spaces here. There are some events, advocacy groups and a few bars, but I was pretty disappointed that there weren’t any more spaces that felt both approachable and coincided with my interests. After crying a bit, I figured I should just try and just make a queer space myself (with the help of my friends.) Here are some details about the situation:

* It’s a fairly small arcade, total capacity at a single time is maybe 100 people. It's usually open from 4PM-12PM (but we can mess around with the events time frames with no issues.)
* There are a lot of classic and new cabinets you can’t really find anywhere else, and the owner I’m working with can interchange them out quite easily to sub in any games the community wants. They also have a ton of consoles (from old school to plenty of new school ones PS4,XBOX’s, Switches.)
* The arcade is free play, and entry is usually 5 bucks. The owner doesn’t really run the arcade for major profit. It’s a passion project for everyone involved, and it’s very obvious when you set foot in there that it’s made by gamers for gamers. Most of the money the arcade makes is from events (tournaments, birthday parties and stuff like that.)
* It isn’t a bar-cade, so they don’t serve alcoholic drinks or food (but there are bars &amp; really good food places nearby.) I spoke with a few of my friends about what they’d want to see and on most of their lists, alcohol was usually somewhere on there. So far after talking with the owner quite a bit, his policy seems very “Don’t ask, Don’t tell.” As long as you’re not causing problems for the other patrons and you’re not bringing any drinks inside, you can come in buzzed or stoned to play a bit. You don’t really every see any drunk people, but you do see a few stoners every now and again.
* We’re planning on doing giveaways, contests, and other shenanigans. Of which, the details are a bit blurry (that's where you come in!)

My personal intentions for the event are to make it as approachable as possible while pushing for a good turnout. I’m going to avoid framing it like *“We’re opening our doors to all of the LGBTQIA+ community on every third Tuesday of the month”* (which kind of implies that they don't already?) Instead, I want it to be more of an active celebration of queer &amp; gaming culture all rolled into one fun night every month. I want people to look forward to surrounding themselves in their community with their friends, without the usual awkward pressure to fit in. (Which will always exist, but at least they don't have to put themselves in places that they wouldn't normally go, like bars, which I know aren't for everyone.)

I don’t want it to have any weird sexual undertones (or overtones since gay and arcade in the same sentence seem to pull interesting search results.) I also don’t want it to be geared towards a specific subset of the LGBTQIA+ community, which I imagine could be easy if I were to rush it ^(since I am a flawed gay cis man.)

So I guess I have a few major questions, and separately I’m open to general feedback.

1. What are some of the intersections between queer culture and gaming culture that I can try to incorporate? Aside from Bowsette and Menat ^(yaass), I haven’t really gotten any ideas. This could apply to the prizes for giveaways, the music playing, and even the games we put on display.
2. What are some of things you’d personally like to see from an event like this, if one was running in your near area?
3. Are there any specific games that would be cool to bring out?
4. What night of the week would you feel most comfortable going out to an event like this? (I made a strawpoll for this question, [vote here!](http://www.strawpoll.me/16709060))

I know this was a metric fuck-ton of text to read, but if you did read it - thanks. If you didn’t you can check out the TL;DR below

# TL;DR

**Trying to host a recurring LGBTQIA+ night at my local arcade. What game’s would be cool to display, and how can I can make it as inclusive, fun, and accessible as possible. (Hard Mode - Alcohol won’t be served but you can pregame if you want,** ***just don’t be an ass*****)**",lgbt
What's a good name for someone MtF?,"In light of recent political events, I decided I'm going to be brave and come out, but I need a name! 

&amp;#x200B;

I was thinking of Luna or another celestial name like Aurora, but the name Luna is used by so many trans girls that I'm not sure. I really love Isabella, but it seems too common maybe? Serafina / Seraphina sound really cute too :3

&amp;#x200B;

Any advice would be sooooo helpful &lt;3 

&amp;#x200B;

If it means anything, I'm white, 20, and really silly / sweet / sarcastic / funny / loud :D ",lgbt
Owners of LGBTQ Magazines Donated to Anti-LGBTQ Politicians,,lgbt
You guys were so supportive when I came out the other day. Here's just far I've come this past year! My wife is just as supportive as ever!,,lgbt
Trump Cannot Erase Me and My Transgender Community,,lgbt
Nashville gay bars receive pro-Trump fliers with image of assault rifle,,lgbt
How do I get over doubting my sexuality?,"Any advice would be helpful, thanks. ",lgbt
Anisosexual/homoflexible studying Moodboard/inspiration,,lgbt
This. This is how you parent.,,lgbt
"Am I an ""egg"", or just fucked up?","15, Biologically male, have always considered myself male, have never *seriously* considered a sex change. However, I sexually fantasize about becoming a girl. I still like women, but something about turning into a girl and acting all... girl-like just gets me off. I've seen things from r/Egg_IRL that make make me raise doubts about myself. Am I dysphoric, or do I just have a fetish?",lgbt
Why Now Is The Perfect Moment For Gaia's Divine Mural Celebrating Baltimore's Queer History,,lgbt
On Love (as I understand it),"   Figuring out that I was gay was a confusing and sometimes scary process, but I can honestly say that I am better for it. While most of the crushes I've had since then have mostly been sexual in nature, the most recent and currently ongoing one is much more messy. 
   Here's the deal. I moved in the first month of my senior year (2017-2018), and met a whole bunch of people at my new church, with one standing out in particular. While attractive, his personality is what really draws me in. He is kind to everybody; in the year I've known him, I've only seen him get angry once--and that was only for a few seconds before feeling ashamed of it afterwards. He gives freely and smiles often. He is not afraid to put himself out there, singing and dancing with complete gusto. He is funny and even naïve. In short, he is perfect, especially considering my sarcastic, bitter attitude toward others and my hesitation to get outside of my limited comfort zone. 
   I love him, not a shallow lust, but a deep lasting bond that straddles the gap between the platonic and the romantic. After realizing this, I made the decision to come out to him last December, in order to have somebody to confide in within my church group and to give him the chance to realize how much I cared for him. (I didn't explicitly explain that I had a crush on him.) 
   Since then, we've had several long conversations about feelings, ranging from his dates with girls to my thoughts about the mere prospects of me dating. After every time we see each other (roughly biweekly), we share a lasting hug. I love these because they are full of warmth and free of the stigmas of heteronormative society. He won't hesitate to say ""I love you, man."" But I will, not because he might misunderstand, but because I might.
   While I know that I love him, in which way is still a foggy question. The very sight of him is bittersweet, because I couldn't ask for a better friend, but I also fear that I'll never find a romantic partner that is as truly, humanly good as he is. The thought that I'll never find a match like him is a deeply scary one.",lgbt
"Hello r/LGBT! I need your help. I’m hosting a Pride Night at my local arcade, and I could use some input.",,lgbt
Queer wizards find love in outer space in this music video.,,lgbt
Walked in on bro and friend kissing update,"Last post:https://old.reddit.com/r/lgbt/comments/9q2cdl/walked_in_on_my_younger_bro_and_his_friend_kissing/ 

Update- so everything is fine now yay!, Pikachu came over to our house and I apologised for walking in on them and he said it was okay, he also apologised for ignoring bro and found it funny ignoring me(wow).  I also did warn them to be more careful doing stuff like that especially in our house while our mom and dad are home. bro and him spoke privately for a little while (which I didn't think about it then but they were probably actually making out lol......) and everything is okay again.
I'm still worried for bro though if mom and dad find out since I don't know how exactly they'd react to him being gay... I would never let them do anything bad to him, I just don't want him to feel like it's not right being gay or something...
Anyway I'm really happy that they're still friends (or boyfriends lol) and thanks for everyone that helped in the last post! 

Also this is unrelated but we laughed a lot because they're dating and kissing before I have.....",lgbt
Who proposes in a gay/ lesbian relationship,"In a gay relationship, how would you decide who proposes. Traditionally it was the man but if there are two men or no men what happens",lgbt
It’s Halloween on QLRadio. In addition to our regular great music from LGBT artists we’ve mixed in some eerie frightening Halloween themed songs as well. Grab a friend to hold tight to and tune in. Streaming 24/7 QLRadio.org,,lgbt
How many trans people regret transitioning?,"I know I could possibly get biased results, but I keep hearing the point about “a lot of trans people regret transitioning”, and I’m sure it’s either over or underestimated to some degree. But I think I’m probably trans and I don’t want to make a mistake and all that, but some unbiased, veritable sources with percentages could be nice.",lgbt
I Am Transgender,"I am transgender. I didn't ask to be transgender. I didn't want to be transgender. But I am transgender. I am a woman who was born male. I lived 21 years of my life as a man, questioning who I was everyday. Tomorrow, the 24th of October, I will have been on hormone replacement therapy for one year. I have been trying to live my life every day since then as the person I know I am, a woman. I will never be a man not matter what anyone says. No matter what the government tries to define me as. And I will never back down to those who call me a man because I am not a man. I am transgender. I am a woman.",lgbt
How to connect with another and find my first boyfriend?,"Here I am a 59 year old cisgender male. It wasn't until my mid forties that I am realized that relationships with other men\* could a be thing for me.  While I have had shared intimacy in what could best described as ""swinger"" situations, I have never had a ""boyfriend"" relationship.  Heck, I am not even sure exactly what I mean by that word.  But I know I want to try it on for size. But how to do this?  Although my city of residence is very ""queer friendly"", there are no ""gay bars"" or similar.  I have always been a very shy person, having great difficulty with initial contact with strangers.  I am also on a very limited fixed budget, which means that many activities that might lead to meeting people are not financially possible.  Which leaves out paying for an online dating thing.

&amp;#x200B;

One thought I have is somehow ""advertising"" my desires?  Would somehow the right hat, t-shirt, wristband or some such contrivance make me more visible to possible partners?

&amp;#x200B;

Any help is welcome!

&amp;#x200B;

\* while I now consider myself polysexual (and polyamorous) this post is focusing on finding another cisgender male, as that is what I feel is most missing in my life right now.",lgbt
Chicago HIV prevention app - paid study,"  

The MyPEEPS Mobile study at Ann &amp; Robert H. Lurie Children's Hospital of Chicago is looking for young guys who are into other guys, between the ages of 13 to 18, to help us test a mobile HIV prevention app. Eligible individuals will complete surveys and be given the app to use. Participants will be compensated for their time (up to $275).

   
 

MyPEEPS Mobile is a nation-wide research study at Birmingham (Alabama), Chicago (Illinois), New York City, and Seattle (Washington). 

   
 

To find out if you are eligible, please go to:

[https://redcap.sac-cu.org/surveys/index.php?s=K3RJACWLYM](https://redcap.sac-cu.org/surveys/index.php?s=K3RJACWLYM) 

Or, please call us at 312-600-5168 so that we can see if you might be a good fit for the project. 

More information about the study can be found on our website: [https://www.mypeepsmobile.org/](https://www.mypeepsmobile.org/) and [https://www.luriechildrens.org/en/specialties-conditions/adolescent-medicine/research/](https://www.luriechildrens.org/en/specialties-conditions/adolescent-medicine/research/) 

   
 

Other partner institutions include: Columbia University, University of Washington, and University of Alabama at Birmingham. 

   
 

Approved by the Columbia University IRB (PI: R. Schnall, # IRB-AAAQ6500).",lgbt
Oh so you're fine with violence and nudity but god forbid two men kiss.,My dads watching a movie with some serious gore and fucking nudity but as soon as two men fucking kiss he's got to turn it off. Honestly the sheer hypocrisy with this shit. How can you not realize that  sitting in the same room as your gay ass kid and saying that that's disgusting and you can't even bare to see it but you're fine with some lady tits floppin around is just plain idiotic and stupid. God. I love him but I seriously want to slap him right now. ,lgbt
roud of Tim Cook,"As a public figure, Tim Cook announced he was proud to be gay and it was a gift to him today. I am also very proud of Tim Cook! Many celebrities are gay and they live just like any of us. We should never discriminate anyone because of their sexual orientation and I think there is nothing wrong to be gay. In fact I know many lesbians or gay are even more talented than us! So love is love guys, please put down your discrimination!",lgbt
Let me give you some life. Give Me A Chance! &lt;3,,lgbt
"Tim Cook: Being gay is G-d’s greatest gift to me. [He] decided he was being “selfish” by keeping quiet about his identity…. “I needed to do something for them,” Cook said. He wanted to demonstrate to gay children that they “can be gay and still go on and do some big jobs in life.”",,lgbt
"This week in Baltimore, an amazing street artist, Gaia, finished a mural in tribute to Divine and the city’s queer history. At a time when our rights are threatened, I hope Divine’s beauty will inspire people to know that they too are beautiful.",,lgbt
"Boyfriend is Poly, I'm not.","I met someone about half a year ago, and we really clicked. We really, *really* like each-other, but there's one problem. Just before we started dating, he told me he was Poly and in a relationship with a girl. We've talked about it a lot, and it makes me super upset. I don't want to separate, but I want to stop feeling this way.  If you have advice (or want me to go more in detail) please do tell. Thank you so much, Reddit",lgbt
Genuine question. What is the difference between having a male sex but identifying as non-binary and being a cis-gender male?,Edit:as in physical behaviours/characteristics,lgbt
Work Place Discrimination Survey (Tennessee),,lgbt
What the Trump Era's New Transgender Definition Means for Patients,,lgbt
Sappho poet.,,lgbt
"Three years ago, I came out to my family and friends. Never would have thought I needed to tell people about my sexuality! But I knew coming out to the people I love was about growth and self-love, and someone once said that that doesn’t always have to be alone when you’re with the right people.",,lgbt
"So, I came out to my family via facebook as PAN let's see how it goes.",,lgbt
Confused Please Help,"I can't remember what the acronym LGBT stands for...

Was it Let's Get Bread Today?

Or...
 
Luigi Got Big Titties?

https://pbs.twimg.com/media/DepxCOLVQAAT3j8.jpg


",lgbt
"WATCH NOW: ""Who The Eff Are These Guys meets Basic Witches"" - a Halloween Crossover with Drag Queens, Witches and Vampires (oh my!)",,lgbt
"A Trans Plea to the L,G,B, and Q: Help Us",,lgbt
We’ve got to stop this sex/gender dichotomy,"We’ve spent a long time building up this rhetoric, going to a great deal of trouble to establish the difference between sex and gender. 

**It is not helping is**.

Today, the DOJ issued a statement **to the supreme court**, weighing in that trans people are not protected by Title VII, because Title VII stops **sex** discrimination. 

This dichotomy is hurting us and we’re only legitimizing the rhetoric they’re using to attempt to oppress us. ",lgbt
With all the news right now...,,lgbt
Any ways to refer to a person wich gender was not specified?,"English is not my first language and sometimes I find it weird that there is no way to refer to someone in a gender-neutral manner, I'm really self concious about writing in english so assuming genders is the last thing I want to do, I do know that ""xir"" exists but I really don't like using it (personal preference, may change my opinion about it later, but yeah), so if a friend comes to me and says ""today I encountered my favorite teacher on the street"", I should respond with ""what subject does ___ teach?""",lgbt
A pic that perfectly fits my wife and I,,lgbt
Brazilian LGBT Flag. We are all hoping for better days on Democracy. #EleNao,,lgbt
Beyond XX and XY: The Extraordinary Complexity of Sex Determination [key diagram],,lgbt
Why is it called LGBT?,"I thought of this a little while ago and asked my cousin who is a lesbian about it and she didn't really have an answer. Shouldn't it be HBT (Homosexual Bi Trans)? Both lesbians and gays are homosexuals. And even further, gay is also used to describe both male and female homosexuals. What gives? There's so much overlap and confusion when HBT solves it all and is technically scientifically correct. One could also reach a little and say that gay and lesbian can be used/said with wrath by homophobes, whereas homosexual, even when said with wrath, can really only be neutral.

What gives?",lgbt
LIVE YOUR TRUTH (ft.Kyson Metcalfe) *WATCH TO THE END!!!*,,lgbt
"I've been carrying this sign around all day. This morning when I read the articles about Trump, I cried so hard my nose bled. I am terrified. Those who can vote, please,use thag power and fight for us!",,lgbt
When that one relative starts posting on social media again,,lgbt
How do I come out,Hello I’m 19/M and I’m bi but how do I come out. My family is somewhat religious but they are very vocal towards their feelings about homosexuality and being bisexual. I always just laugh it off and ignore when they talk about it but I’m afraid what they would say and think if I were to tell them. ,lgbt
Donald Trump is still selling a LGBTQ pride shirt despite anti-transgender policy,,lgbt
I feel like so much has been stolen from me. 21/Bi/M,"So, not come or yet to my family and not planning on it until I can move out because theyre not the accepting type, spent most of my life hiding underneath this fake skin when at home, being scared to death of the idea of being made homeless as a teenager and losing that family relationship forever once I do come out. 

(I am out to my friends and the general public just not my family) As a result I’ve cut off any thoughts/emotions relating to being bi (except when I’m with my friends), not gotten into a relationship and just not been myself at home, throughout it all it’s like I got through it with my brain on autopilot but I feel now that it’s taken a toll on me.

As the opportunity of moving out is coming closer, my thoughts and emotions are opening up and it’s just so intense. I feel like I’ve had so many years, moments, emotions and opportunities stolen from me and it sucks. 

I just feel so lost and don’t know what to do with myself, will probably go to see a doctor before it gets too much. ",lgbt
I will be running my first marathon for the Terrence Higgins Trust support me on my journey,Please support me on my journey by subscribing to my YouTube channel https://youtu.be/RPQq8nChQ6U,lgbt
Call to Action NYC: Trans Rights are Human Rights!,,lgbt
"Hi I just have a question for gay couples who have kids. Do they call both of you mom/dad or what. If they do call you both the same thing, how do they differentiate you two?",,lgbt
"Hi, r/lgbt! I am out of the loop with the Trump thing","Hi lgbt, I planned posting this on r/outoftheloop, but I don't want to start a shitstorm in the comments, and I would like your perspective. Now, what is the whole thing with Trump and trasgender policies or smth? I would like to know so I can try to help somehow",lgbt
my aunt and her family are using religion to excuse their transphobia. tips? (tw transphobia &amp; christianity),"my name is caleb. i’m 20, and i live with my mom in west texas. i’m dfab gendervoid (using he/him) and i am out to pretty much everyone in my life. my mom is less than perfect about my gender, but she calls me by the right name and gets the pronouns right 95% of the time. since the holidays are coming up soon, i decided to text my aunt and tell her i need her to call me by the correct name and pronouns if she wants me to be present this holiday season (we do thanksgiving and xmas at her house).
she responded with several scriptures: genesis 1:27, leviticus 18:22, romans 1:18-32, &amp; 1 corinthians 6:19-20. she also explicitly said that she would call me whatever name i want, but that she refused to even try with my pronouns. my partner went to a lutheran school and helped me type up a lengthy response that may have kicked her ass a bit because it well refuted every “anti-lgbt” passage she sent me, and i thought maybe it would help, but!
we had dinner a few nights ago, and she and the rest of the family deadnamed me and misgendered me the whole time. the holidays are fast approaching, and i am worried i will break under the strain of having to be misgendered and deadnamed for the entirety of it. i want to be present and have a connection with my blood relatives, but it’s going to be so tough; any tips for helping her and my other family members see how they’re hurting me? or even just tips for enduring the struggle?",lgbt
THE MIND OF A BORING PERSON...,,lgbt
Cis gay guy in a new relationship with a trans gay guy. I could use some advice.,"So we’re both 16. There’s this really cute guy I met and our personalities fit really well together.  I don’t mean to sound weird or anything, and don’t mean to offend anyone, but I had no idea he was trans until I saw he was wearing a binder, as he passes really well. He’s also pre-t. When we admitted that we both had feelings for each other, he told me he was trans, which I told him wasn’t an issue for me. At least, at the time I thought it wouldn’t be, as my feelings for him were, and still are, really strong. 

Anyways a few days ago we held hands, kissed, and cuddled which was absolutely magical and amazing. I’ve been thinking about him ever since, and how much I like him. However, I started to think about sex with him. I watched some ftm porn and found myself turned on, but for some reason I’m having trouble wrapping my head around having sex with him. I think I’ve found that I’m more into men and masculinity in general than what’s downstairs, but whenever I think about having sex with him, I just have trouble becoming excited. I think the thing that is difficult for me the most is the fact that he can get pregnant and has periods. I just really don’t want to mess this up, as I really like him and this is my first relationship. ",lgbt
Let’s get this beauty to the front page for Asexual Awareness Week!!,,lgbt
Someone wrote this in Kyrgyzstan at a mashrutka (public bus) so I snapped it while bursting by laughter. All the love from a place that noone effin' knows lgbt people &lt;3 (for those that can't read it says: Love is Love! Gay is ok #rainbov),,lgbt
What do I tell my mom?,"I came out to her a few days a go. She's still trying to grasp the concept that I am gay. She's more of the ""it's a choice"" person since my family has strong-Christian ties. Luckily, she said she'll love me. I'm just trying to get her to understand that it's not a choice, but that you're born with it. Her and I love to study psychology. I am trying to combine that with my gayness, but I can't find anything that say ""you're born with it"" or whatever. Does anyone have any idea what I can tell her?

&amp;#x200B;

Update (10/23/18 9:00 CST): I told her that I've had this feeling for men for a very long time; and that I was happy to get out of the house and to express myself at once without the ridicule. She replied that a mother's goal is for her child to always be happy, but that I should never abandon God. I told her not to worry since I prayed for safety at college. Aside from the back-and-forth messages, thank y'all for your support and help. ",lgbt
Anti-lgbtq group coming to my school what questions should I ask them?,"So a group an anti-lgbtq group is comming to my university tomorrow by the name of H.O.ME (Heterosexuals Organized for a Moral Environment), their group uses science, and logic to debunk homosexuality. Since I'm making a short documentary about them. What are questions that would be good to ask them?",lgbt
Im struggling.,"Hey everyone. I haven’t posted on this sub before, but I’m really feeling sad tonight and I wanted to get it out somewhere. 

I came out to my family last November- nothing in particular, just that I was dating a girl from our hometown who they know (I am in college 8 hours away) 

I was raised extremely catholic and so my parents took it really really hard. My dad and I didn’t talk for about 4 months. 

My gf and I had a rough patch for about a month and we broke up. I idiotically told my narcissistic mother, and she was so ecstatic and of course made it about her and started telling me about how it was so hard to hear my dad, her husband, cry and ask her where he “fucked up” as my father. My dad doesn’t use that language. 

My gf and I got back together, and things are amazing. The thing is, i don’t want to hurt my dad again by telling him. I honestly give no fucks about how my mother feels because she’s honestly a jerk. 

But, my dad started working in the oilfield when I was 11 and has missed out on so much so provide for his family. He is the best man and I know how much he hated the lifestyle I was living/ am living. They also provide my car insurance, phone and health insurance finances because I am a full time student and my job doesn’t allow me to make enough to pay for those things. I feel so torn between my dad/mom and my gf. I want to love her fully but I feel like I can’t because I always think in the back of my head how I’m hurting my dad. And I just don’t know how to get over it... ",lgbt
I created a support group at school!,"Hey guys! This is my first post here. I’ve been working on creating an LGBT+, No Place For Hate support group for my school. Today I started campaigning- flyers, posters, an announcement. Everyone knows about it, and everyone’s talking about it. As an introverted teen with social anxiety, oh god am I nervous for people’s reactions. I saw some flyers torn up on the ground, and heard some people laughing about the group. I’m kind of scared, I really hope that nobody is insanely homophobic, and confront me about it. My name is the only student one on the flyers, so people know who to talk to. I don’t mess with people or really piss them off, I’m just one of the weirder kids with my little friend group. Regardless of the possibility of backlash from others, I’m really excited to meet other gays in a safe environment and getting the group rolling. The first meeting is this Thursday morning, and I hope it goes well! I’ll keep y’all updated",lgbt
Be Radical and Vote! #WontBeErased Please My Transgender Wife and I are so scared and I know you are too!,,lgbt
"What am I? Not so sure I'm ""straight"".","It's something I never put much thought into over the years. If I was asked if I was straight, gay, or bi, I'd always say straight. After all, I've only ever dated women. It was an easier answer. But observing my behaviors and thought patterns, I'm not so sure what I am. I love the female way too much to be gay, but am I perhaps bi?

I have been consistently mistaken as ""gay"" for most of my life because I'm well dressed, well groomed, am a hair stylist, and I'm perfectly aware I give off this very metro or ""gay"" vibe. It's just how I am. Back in high school I was picked on for being a ""f**got"" more than the actual gay kids were.

in recent years I've had roughly 100 sexual partners (struggled with sexual addiction due to severe depression), all being women minus one man, and even then it was foreplay at best. He was hot, well dressed, rich, popular, and pursued me endlessly. But when we fooled around, I just didn't feel much. I guess how you can put it is the male body is very attractive to me, minus the sexual parts. When I'm at the gym I find myself checking out the buff gym guys a lot more than I do the girls in their yoga pants on the ellipticals. I'm not into the skinny twink types or the hair ""bear"" types specifically, but when I see a hot guy, I know it. At least what I consider to be hot.

I know this is all super shallow, but I'm just being honest. When it comes to things like anime I watch, I almost always really like a well written yaoi (such as Junjo Romatica or Sekai-ichi Hatsukoi), can't stand yuri, but I also like your normal hetero romances. So I guess the only ones I really like are the male-male or male-female ones?

When it comes back to being sexually involved, even though it's been a while, I love anal play... but by myself. The idea of being penetrated by a man seems off to me, but at the same time if the right guy came along I wouldn't be opposed to it. And the thought of a female doing it to me is a total turn-off. With women I'm always the dominant one and like it that way, but with the right man, maybe not? I know I sure as hell tend to be flattered and blush internally when a cute guy flirts me up.

Perhaps my ideal man could only exist in fiction? Because the gay or bi guys I meet tend not to be my ""type"" and I can't find myself being romantically attracted to them.

**So all of this being said,** I can't exactly pin-point what I am. Straight or bi? Is there an in-between? Admittedly I'm at a loss and would much appreciate some feedback. ",lgbt
"They can close their eyes, but we won't stop existing.",,lgbt
An Apology,"(This was x-posted from r/bisexual) I'm not sure if this type of post is allowed so if it isn't, the mods can go ahead and take it down.

I'm more of a lurker when it comes to reddit. When I started using reddit, however, I was a very vocal person. I made posts about everything, and commented as much as I could. I found one of my old accounts somehow and remembered the post I made on r/bisexual about a year ago. I'm not gonna go into detail but I expressed my dislike for  transgender people in the post. One of you called me out on it but I stood my ground, continuing to believe that being transgender was a  choice, and that people were doing it for attention, or because it was  ""trendy.""

Months later, I met someone on the internet. We became close friends, and about three months ago, he came out to me as transgender. At first I  didn't say anything, because I didn't want my opinions to effect him. He began to express his troubles to me, describing his dysphoria and how he identifies. And that was when I decided to educate myself more on  the topic. I began to watch videos, read articles, and talked to people  who were transgender. I learned that it wasn't a choice, I learned that  they're not going to harm anyone, that they weren't doing it for  attention, and most importantly, I learned how happy someone can become,  when they finally realize their true identity. The apache attack helicopters and ""Did you just assume my gender?"" jokes weren't funny  anymore, and I began to distant myself from my toxic friends.

One week ago, I was sent a really long message from my friend. A  majority of it was too personal for me to say, but he explained things  about how he feels, and what other people think of him.

That same night, he took his own life. He was only 17 years old, and his name was Dorian.

So, from the bottom of my heart, I am sorry. I'm sorry to anyone I've hurt. I expressed my opinion on a topic that I had no knowledge of.

I hope you all are safe, especially in America right now.

I know these numbers are posted everywhere, but I still think you all  should be aware of the hotlines (Nation Suicide Prevention Lifeline -  1-800-273-8255, and The Trevor Project - 1-866-488-7386, and [here's a list](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/List_of_suicide_crisis_lines) of the suicide prevention numbers if you don't live in America). Please talk to someone if you are struggling.

Stay safe,

RonoArcher",lgbt
Looking to learn about asexuality.,"So I’ve been doing my best to learn more about the community at large because of my distancing from it in the past due to biphobia. If anything I ask is offensive, please tell me. I’m willing to hear everyone’s side, because I’m not coming from a place of personal experience or full knowledge. A full disclaimer, I have been working through some issues stemming from an ex-SO who identified as asexual, so I am doing my best to process through that, so if I ever come across in a bad way, please tell me. I probably need a check.

1) I’ve understood asexuality in the past to be a lack of sexual attraction, so that’s the basis I’m working with. More recently, though, I’ve seen many people saying that it’s okay to enjoy sex if you’re asexual. I never was under the impression that asexual people never had sex — for a terrible example, I have no desire to eat oranges, but it’s not that I will never eat an orange, I just don’t have the drive to — but the “enjoying sex” statement confuses me. The only way I’ve been able to work through this is that there’s only a lack of sexual attraction toward people, but the act of sex itself is still pleasurable (for some, sex-repulsion is a valid thought processes). Is this in the right track?

2) Aphobia is real. That’s not a question. However, some people bat around that asexuals are not included in the LGBT+ community because they can be cishet (emphasis on can, not always are). I am torn on this issue because on the one hand, it seems understandable that cishet aces would not fall under the LGBT+ label. However, I’ve often also thought that it’s basically everyone who isn’t what society considers to be “normal” (cis, het, with sexual attraction) belongs under the label, and that it’s best to let people decide on their own. What’s your take?

3) Lastly, this is possibly a hurtful question, so please be warned. My ex identified as asexual, but only told me halfway into the relationship. Because I did not know, I was put into a state of severe self esteem loss because all of my physical advances would be rejected. I would never press any farther than asking, but it has seriously messed up how I see myself, even now that I know they were ace. Here is the problem — if I had known they were asexual, I would not have entered a relationship with them, rather I would just want to be friends. This loops back to the first question — assuming a person is not sex repulsed, but asexual, I would (in my current understanding) feel uncomfortable being in a relationship with them. Just as an asexual person is valid for not having sexual attraction, I am valid for having it. However, I’ve been called aphobic in the past for this. Is this view aphobic?

Thank you for your time.",lgbt
I am proof that anti-trans rhetoric can have real consequences,,lgbt
Question for closeted people regarding internalized feelings and feeling like absolute sheit,Do any of y’all closeted people just feel like the only thing you ever want to talk about is your sexuality (or anything related to gayness) but you feel like absolute shit cause you literally CANT due to you not being out to people? I’m literally feeling so weighed down through the suppression of my thoughts I literally just feel like shit rn dafuq am I doing on reddit bruh this shit succs ass ,lgbt
Trump Says Transgender Erasure Policy Will “Protect the Country”,,lgbt
Right-Wing Fantasies About Gender Are Killing Trans People,,lgbt
Chatting with a Transgender Woman,,lgbt
too gay for my family to watch me on Youtube? :{,"[https://www.youtube.com/channel/UCn6K21OKfxpHi8YQmWOO7ag?view\_as=subscriber](https://www.youtube.com/channel/UCn6K21OKfxpHi8YQmWOO7ag?view_as=subscriber)

&amp;#x200B;

Guys I feel very depressed. I like to make people laugh and entertain them with just being silly. Recently I decided to start a youtube channel so I can feel happier and get some fulfillment out of my life by letting some people find  escape from the real world and get a couple good laughs after watching me or relate to me and the things I have gone through and see it will get better. Long story short the main people I thought would support me have 100% let me down. I have even been told that I am ""too gay"" for them to even watch my videos. Yet I am 100% authentic and I act on camera how I am in real life. If I feel like being sassy one moment I am, If I feel like being serious another I am. But for friends/family members to say, they can't watch my video because I am gay. It really hurts. I have not felt the way I am feeling right now since I was in middle school and was bullied for being gay. I also caught some friends talking about how ugly I look on video. I literally have not cried because of feeling depressed since middle school and I can't stop. Should I delete my channel? I don't know what to do? Are they right? Please I am looking for some honest critique and advice. Am I too gay and ugly for people to watch me?",lgbt
How can Canadians help protect Trans rights in America?,Hello! I'm a Canadian and I have been outraged by what's happening in the states and this assault on trans rights makes my blood boil. I want to support trans folks anyway I can but I'm not sure how since I'm not in the US. Are there any specific organizations we could donate to or petitions we can sign? I've been searching online but I'm a little clued out of American organizations so I'm not sure where to look.,lgbt
I came out to my parents and they said i was just following a trend. How would i respond?,,lgbt
my gf and i started a youtube channel!,,lgbt
any advice or help please?,so a couple months ago i came out to my mom as being gender fluid but feeling more confident as male then female. i came out to her in a note like i did a couple years ago when i told her i was pan. any time i bring it up she doesn't even acknowledge the fact I'm talking about it or she switches subjects. any advice on how to try and help her accept this? I think having a binder might help but i don't have any money to buy one. does anyone have a spare they don't use or a old one that they are looking to part ways with? i can wear a s/m shirt so I'm not sure what that would translate into for binders. thanks for any help or advice you give.,lgbt
Scientists see a problem with Trump plan on defining sex: biology - STAT,,lgbt
"Finding Love, Support, Relationships","Hey everyone, I have to warn everybody that you are about to read a long post and would like serious responses and any helpful advice. 

To give you a good idea of my background, I am a 26 year old average looking guy living in a smallish city and I am having many issues with finding love, support, and keeping friends that I can’t shake this crushing empty feeling I have. 

I’ve been single for the last year after ending a 3 year relationship and had my fair share of hookups, a couple of dates, and met two guys who were serious about a relationship but didn’t last longer than two weeks. 

I seem to never have the time to ever have a life of my own but I’ve been feeling like even if I had all the time I needed I still wouldn’t do anything with it. 

I work 2 jobs Sunday through Monday, which is how my weeks is set up and off two days Tuesdays and Wednesday’s. I usually will work 9am-2:30 then have a two hour gap until my second job which is 4:30p-11:30pm. 

By the time I get home I am exhausted and it’s generally too late to gather up enough interest for people to care to meet up. The main reason for having two jobs is to afford my living expenses. 

And on my days off I can usually get someone interested in meeting up whether it’s lunch with my close friend or try to have a fling. But lately, I feel like my life is in such a limbo and has died down so much. 

I do have Grindr and I have used tinder before, plenty of fish, and even eharmony for a short period and I am at the point in my life where I want to meet someone serious and looking for a relationship. 

The experience I’ve had with the other guys in my area used to shock me with what other people are capable but now I can see from a mile away the patterns of gay men and I feel not very confident about finding what I’m looking for. 

Im looking for a kind, pure, goofy guy that wants to build towards a future and eventually get married and have a family. I know that seems heteronormative and I could go on a completely different rant about how I feel that there has been a shift in expectations and realities of current ideals about love, sex, and relationships in a new generation shaped by modern technology compared to ten years ago. 

Of course there are changes to be expected as we evolve but aside from that, love seems to be more vague and frustrating just in my experience. 

I find myself reading the minds of typical guys I wish would give me the time of day. Sure, some have expressed interest but then as time goes on, their interest fades away and it seems no one is interested in making an effort or wants to put the labels on a relationship, which is completely fine. 

I for one, do not like to be confined by labels. I don’t want to call two people “talking” or “hanging out” dating but that’s just what we have redefined as 2018 dating. But it’s hard to deal with rejection in 2018 terms and I know I have had a lot of it. 

Whenever I get the excuse from other guys “I’m just super busy right now” I can pretty much deduce that you’re no longer interested in me, are seeing someone you’re more interested in, or just are an asshole and don’t want to face up to saying the truth. 

I know I’m not completely there where I need to be yet where I can just focus on being me. I don’t know if I ever will be at that place where everything will be easy because I am very much a guy that does a little too much overthinking for his own good, reads into everything, and has developed abandonment issues from the wrong kind of guys.

 Im looking for validation in the wrong places. And I can’t help it because everyone wants to feel loved, and desirable, and yeah sometimes with men, things feel a little more personal sometimes when I know I’m a great person but knowing gay men typically look for physical attraction before anything else. And I feel like I barely come close compared to the guy I wish I could be. 

And sometimes I don’t believe personality has anything to do with it because I’ve heard the spill about it’s not just about looks. I’m not sure what to call it. 

My biggest weakness will always be that I will forever be in my own head to just drop everything and just have fun with things and not read into anything. It’s never been a bigger challenge. 

But at the same time I feel like that makes me unique because I’m sensitive and deep enough to think of these things and gay guys don’t seem to get hung up on things like that. Maybe they do. I believe they see the same things and maybe even repress it because there’s no use to get hung up on it. 

To add a little bit more to my backstory and feeling in limbo, I do have a goal to finish furnishing my house I’m renting and moving to my own house and not living in apartments anymore. I’m looking to finance a new car hopefully within the next year, I’d love to travel a little bit more but it seems like it’s moving at a very slow pace and then there’s never really anyone to share it with. 

I didn’t finish college and I don’t see any benefits going back to school since I’m still undecided about what I want to do. I don’t have any plans of buying or saving a house because I consider relocating to a bigger city quite often to Maxine the dating pool. 

I think my biggest aspiration is to find my soul mate and unfortunately a lot of time and energy has gone into that when I know I should t focus so hard on it because it will give off vibes that I’m desperate or clingy when a great opportunity presents itself. 

And I think a lot of that fear comes with the fear of aging and becoming less desirable due to the high standards I feel the gay community has. I feel like no one already wants me so I imagine myself when I get older and that’s a scary thought. 

I just wish I felt fulfilled instead in this constant state of in-between where I shouldn’t focus so much on a relationship but I’m having a hard time destracting myself from it. 

I know all my friends are starting to move on, or get into relationships, and will have families and kids before long and won’t have time for me so that bums me out a lot too. I don’t like to settle for being by myself but it’s absolutely necessary at this point. 

Anyway, that’s just what’s been going on I. My life lately and if anyone has a word of advice I could use it. ",lgbt
"What makes trans people, trans?","I am a cis male and am trying to learn more trans people and trans issues. My understanding of transgender is that the brain identity does not ""match"" the biological organs like vulva/penis, gonads, chromosomes, etc. For example, Chelsea Manning has said that she felt like an alien in her body before she transitioned. I think of Trans vs. cis in terms of ""not Matching vs. Matching"". As a cis person, my brains matches my sex organs - a trans persons's does not. Is this a good way of looking at it?

My Question is: what makes trans people, trans?

I don't believe in a female and male brain - there are just human brains. Why would person A (cis) feel comfortable having a penis but person B (trans) does not? I KNOW I am cis because I really do feeling 100% comfortable having a penis and a scrotum; but trans people feel deep down that their penis/scrotum doesn't belong to them, like it shouldn't be there?

Just curious about your thoughts. Thanks for any info.",lgbt
Dressed up extra flashy for my trip downtown in light of recent events. If I had the time I would have painted a trans flag on my cheek,,lgbt
How do you confront people who use homophobic slurs?,"I go to university in a really rural area (the university bought a bunch of buildings in 1998 so it's far from a bustling metropolis). 

How do you go about confronting people, friends or strangers, who use homophobic slurs? My friends, and most of my acquaintances, know I'm a lesbian so it's usually a habitual slip-of-the-tongue when once in a blue moon somebody says ""that's so gay"" etc. I know it may not be my place to go up to strangers using the f-slur in casual conversation, but it's so incredibly frustrating to just sit there and hear it go on and I'm sick of it. 

Pls help.",lgbt
I am a 16y male and my family has cause both me both sexual confusion and frustration. I am having a hard time talking about it with them.,"Alright, so this story is going to take a little setup. Firstly, i must say that I have some sever anxiety problems with a mix of Asperger which was diagnosed in my childhood, and my older sister (19) has some sever mental health problems relating to depression and anxiety.

She had original at around 16 came out as openly bi sexual, all fine and dandy except for one thing. She has a problem with pushing her own mental health disorders and other such things on me and my two other sisters. Over the course of this year she has professed both my younger sister (13) and my youngest sister (9) as being bi sexual and gay respectively. Since the two of them look up to here they have taken up the rolls of what she told them they are and won't let them think for themselves, or tells them that they most likely are lgbt.

 Now here is where my problem starts to come in. She has been doing this practically the whole year and over the course of the past two years the has been trying to get me to come out as gay/bi or asexual. Now in general I have not shown much interest in other people over the years and because of my introverted personality I have mostly stuck to myself and have not gotten into any relationships. While I myself know I am straight, because of her manipulation both my younger sisters and her have been backing me into a corner in almost a joking manner.

&amp;#x200B;

I feel trapped and scared because of the fact that I hate talking about that stuff but she just keeps trying to force me into a corner. I don''t know what I should do considering she is trying to mask the shit that she is doing by basically saying how progressive she is.",lgbt
Owners of Out/Advocate Donated to Anti-LGBT Politicians,,lgbt
"Sending love to the trans community, particularly in the USA this week",,lgbt
I'm conducting a survey for a presentation I'm giving in a few weeks and need people to take it. Thanks!,,lgbt
Trans people can do anything :),"&amp;#x200B;

https://i.redd.it/ai9wak6cfxt11.png",lgbt
HELP,"Im FTM and my parents don't want to let me go on testosterone because of clitoral growth associated with taking T, now people will say go on puberty blockers but I'm nearly 16 I've already gone through puberty I'm on period suppression but I'm still really uncomfterbal. i live in Washington state im wondering if its possible to go on T without parent consent???????????????????????",lgbt
What am I?,"I have always considered myself straight. Lately I have been naturally changing into the person I'm supposed to be. All throughout high school I have always had sex with my girl friends for fun. I don't think I could be with a girl romantically, but I'm not totally opposed to the thought of being with a person that I loved regardless of gender. I am in a 4 year relationship with a guy, and I find men sexually attractive and not women. I just think that if I wasnt with my boyfriend and absolutely met the right girl that I could swing it. Am I pansexual? I don't consider myself bisexual I still consider myself straight, but I could see myself with a girl if I met the right one. I am not sexually turned on by women but I have been and I could be. What am I?",lgbt
Letters to Strangers,"Hi all, in the midst of anti-lgbt sentiment &amp; erasure efforts, I want people to know that they are seen &amp; heard. I also love writing letters. 

as a queer &amp; trans person myself I have been feeling so many different things lately. I've never really found a home in the lgbt community and I think that's okay. I think community is important though, regardless. I really think it takes the right kind of community, or the right person.

I also know how cathartic it is to write. ""Writing is humanity distilled into ink."" -  Diana Choa 

So maybe I'm trying to build community, or feel less alone, or connect beyond my current circles. I just know I want to be writing letters to folks who could need them. Or reading letters that need to be heard. Stories matter.

Message me if this is something you'd be interested in!",lgbt
"2 years ago, I co-founded a small business. Now, after receiving my legal name change, it's finally time to update name and picture on our website!",,lgbt
[Rant] Trump Trans Thingymadoodle,"So, I am infuriated. I myself am not trans, but I have friends who are, want to be, or don't identify by male or female. I really want to protect them, but i'm young and can't do shit. I don't think the government did much reading to find out that trans people are already having problems being accepted into society, and this whole thing seems like it's based on an opinion about trans people. If you have anymore information to tell me I would love it. I just don't understand the why. Trump says it will protect us. Protect us from what? Sorry about the stupid rant you've probably heard millions of times before.",lgbt
Girlfriend Tag! | LGBT,,lgbt
"Woke up feeling like shit, worked a 9 hour shift, and fucking showed up to Los Angeles City Hall for ALL OF US!",,lgbt
Coming out,"I have this problem that feels like a joke but like I’m going to share it anyway.
Im 21 in the closet and I’m not going to come out in the near future because of my family and also I don’t feel like my friends will seaport me .
The problem is that I don’t like gay apps because it feels very fake and all about sex so the only way to meet guys is in real life .
And this is the part that feels like a joke the only guys that makes a move on me have a girlfriend literally every single time. 
And I’m not the type to do something if you have someone.
But sometimes I feel like ok like maybe I need to put myself first and like if he making a move I should go along with it .
Please tell me I’m not the only one it happens to!?",lgbt
Coming out to my aunt,,lgbt
[Advice] I really like a girl but idk if I can go for it,"I'm a girl, who like girls, and I like one girl in particular. She's really nice, hella gay, and we always have a great time together. We've been flirting for over a week(very badly, but still) and we're all in all very gay for eachother.

However, she just broke up with her girlfriend of over a year. Her ex is in the same friend group as both me and her. I don't want to hurt her ex, and I really don't want to be seen as a shitty person. But I don't really want to let go of her either, I really don't know what to do. Is it wrong to go for her.",lgbt
Science does not support homosexuality?,"So I ended up in a heated debate with a family member about the science behind sex/gender and the end result was him using the old line I have heard a million times.... ""Sceince does not support homosexuality"" and while I do know this is an insane statement I actually couldn't think of any papers or articles by name to support my claim. I'm asking if anyone knows of a site or sites where I could find and do a little research for myself for the inevitable return of who I am now refering to as ""that crazy uncle"".

Thanks in advance to any help!!",lgbt
What are the legal ramifications of Trump's transgender memo on those planning on transitioning?,Does it just codify discrimination for trans or does it do more than that? Will the new legal definition of sex prevent someone who plans on transitioning from getting hormones? Will it be illegal for them to change their sex on legal documents? ,lgbt
Scared of being different,"I'm sorry if the title offends anbody, I'm new here and just need a place to let it out. I'm a 22 year old male and I've been dealing with depression since High School, which lead me some pretty self destructive behaviour. I hated myself for so long and I couldn't figure out why (more likely that I didn't want to admit it to myself). Today my aunt talked to me about it and mentioned the possibility of me hating myself because I'm gay. After a long tearful talk and even more thinking about it. (God my hands are shaking while I'm typing this, I'm so scared...) I am at least bi, possibly more to the gay side. I don't know for sure, I have yet to be with a man or woman, I've been scared of IRL sexual activity for such a long time, even talking about it makes me extremly uncomfortable. I just needed a place to vent as I'm about to admit something to myself and it scares me so much. I'm so ashamed I even went to the bathroom to type this out. I just can't help but hate myself for it and the fact that I think about it like that makes me hate myself even more. I'm just so lost and confused...",lgbt
tips for finding friends or at least some sort of support,"I came out to my family in my senior year of high school. It wasnt my choice really... My family is super religious and wouldnt allow me to hang out with people outside of our religious community outside of school, i was caught ""sneaking around"" (my ~~wonderful~~ mother's words) with friends from school and eventually she found out about my girlfriend. Right now im in my freshman year of college and my mom is currently kicking me out. I feel very alone. My family mostly belongs to this religion and my ""friends"" did too. now i have no one because of the whole coming out thing. Ive made two friends in college but i want to make more because i feel so isolated with no one to talk to. i always have my wonderful girlfriend but, i need a little variety you know? Any ideas?",lgbt
"Anatomy Does Not Determine Gender, Experts Say",,lgbt
Omg we just celebrated 18 years of being together!,,lgbt
[RANT] I feel so frustrated and somewhat violated by the way staff treated me when I was hospitalized yesterday,"So, I started on testosterone a month ago.  On 1000mg of Reandron (I'm in Australia if you don't recognise the substance).  Anyway, about 2 weeks ago I noticed I was getting increasingly exhausted and was having a harder and harder time staying awake.  I ordered some modafinil online to help me finish the last few weeks of uni, which I have done before but not recently.  I thought I was just tired from uni.  

Fast forward to three days ago and I had progressed into not being able to stay awake at all.  I slept for 2 days straight and booked an appointment to see a doctor the coming morning to see why I could not function and to get my depo shot.  I also had a therapy appointment that morning, which I wanted to attend to rant about uni.  My gender specialist doctor is currently on vacation, so I couldn't see her.

Monday rolled around (day 3 of this total exhaustion) and I woke up early that morning and knowing I was not going to be able to wake up to an alarm or stay awake to see two doctors in two different suburbs, I took one of the pills.  I was still stuggling to stay awake, so I took two more over the course of a few hours.  

I didn't feel good an hour before I was planning on leaving the apartment, and wound up vomiting a transparent green liquid.  I was raised in an environment where you do not go and see a doctor unless you are going to die within 5 minutes.  So, I sat beside the toilet debating upon calling an abulance or not, when I suddenly realised that I was going to pass out then and there.  So I called an abulance.  

The paramedics were nice, and there was a very cute parametric student I would absolutely have flirted with if had I been able to form a coherent thought.  They took me to a nearby hospital which is where I have my frustrations with.  My name is still in the process of being changed, and unless I have had all sugeries done I am not able to have my gender marker on any offical document changed.  

They (the hospital staff) found my medicare details and every single doctor after that insisted upon calling me ""she and her"" and by my old name (I hate the term deadname tbh.  Sounds really harsh way to refer to a name I don't even respond to).  I have been living under my name and as male since I moved out almost a year ago, but since I have no contact with my father and my family are conservative Christians, I have not been able to change my name until I turned 18 just recently.  

Eventually, a doctor decided to discharge me.  Still unable to control my muscles properly or with enough strength to pick up a shirt without difficulty (an issue which progressed as my exhaustion progressed), I was told to find my own transport home and pointed in the general direction of the exit.  I managed to stumble out out and ordered an uber with a lot of confusion  (I was still unable to think coherently), following which I went into my apartment and passed out for 12 more hours.  I've been awake maybe an hour.  I had a shower and washed my hair, which (in addition to this post) has sapped my energy to the point where I'm ready to go back to sleep.  

I don't know of this is related to my T levels, and without anyone in this entire city versed in transgender healthcare I am stuck in a state of complete incapability for the next 2 weeks until there is someone that can take a look at me.  The doctors at the hospital say that I have no indiaction of an infection and they pumped me full of saline so my electrolytes are fine.  I was already planning on dropping out, but it looks like I probably will have to now.  My final exams are in about a week and I'm already behind.  I'm probably better off canceling my enrolment and transferring to a different uni and degree next year (the latter part of this was already a plan)

Edit: I did tell them to at least call me by [my name] multipule times and got ignored ",lgbt
Any of yall feel more insecure around people of the same gender??,"I had this crush on this really really cute girl in an art class this and i remember feeling really sad because compared to her i look like trash lol so i was really nervous to talk to her or anything. Now i have a crush on this cute guy, and dont feel insecure in the same way. he's obviously way more attractive to me but i dont really get the same feeling anyone else feel this way??",lgbt
"No, im into girls","There's this one boy in my English class that I like talking to. He's just as much as an asshole as me and we have a similar sense if dark humor. Another guy that sits near us made some kind of remark that we should be dating. I shook my head and laughed, but he was persistent on our shippabilaty. I was kinda fed up so I said something like ""Uh, no;I'm into girls, sweetie"" I swear to God that everyone in a five desk radius stopped taking notes to look at me in surprise. One of my friends that I'm out to was having a heart attack laughing like an idiot. So I came out to approx. 15 kids. Great day. This one girl that I'm kinda into asked 'really?' and im all like 'Yees? Why do you think I wear a rainbow bracelet to school everyday??'",lgbt
Is cross-dressing for Halloween BAD?,"Here's the long form of the question in the title:

Would cross-dressing for Halloween be considered insulting and/or disrespectful to people who cross-dress as part of their lifestyle and/or personal identity?

&amp;#x200B;",lgbt
I came out,"I did it. 


I came out.


I came out as Bi to my family.


It’s my sister’s birthday and we were eating a restaurant and talking about Marvel characters, and the conversation drifted over to “What Marvel characters are hotter and/or cuter?”


Seeing an opening, I finally said “Well, I like guys and girls… so I’d have to say Doctor Strange or Captain Marvel.”


Let it be known that at Perkins, at around 11:30 AM the Ginger Ninja came out of the closet to all of her siblings and her mother.


The reactions?


Older Sister: “Hm? Oh, cool.”


Younger Sister: “I still think Tchalla is cuter.” 


I think my mom surprised me the most, though. My Dad is super, duper conservative but my Mom is more liberal.


“Ginger, what I’ve discussed with your Dad is that as long as it’s two consenting adults - *and that’s the important part; there must be consent* - is up to themselves and themselves only. No one has any right to have any say in that, your Dad and myself included.”


So, in other words? No big deal. We spent the rest of the day at the Mall and I bought some art supplies. ",lgbt
An open letter to the Australian Prime Minister by a friend who suffered gay conversion therapy,,lgbt
Advice I guess,"Hello people,
I'd consider myself to be bisexual but I've never actually had a gay experience, I have had sex with a girl before, it was great and now really want to try sex with a guy. I wouldn't say I'm necessarily attracted to guys like I am to girls, but I'm definitely attracted to the idea of having sex with another guy (If that makes sense) just wondering about how to go about this as I'm not necessarily attracted to guys, just then fucking me 😂. Thanks in advance. ",lgbt
"Minority in a minority: life as a bisexual Sufi, fighting prejudice from all sides",,lgbt
I (one on the left) would like to introduce everybody to my girlfriend and she was disguised as my best friend for the past 3 years.,"&amp;#x200B;

https://i.redd.it/33oj4bc03ut11.jpg",lgbt
"Meant for nothing negative in religion… but love , hope &amp; Inspiration. To support the LBTGQ community, promote equality, peace, &amp; understanding. This oil painting took 6yrs (after ~12yrs not painting, was only ever mediocre), woke up to a vivid dream &amp; began working… had never even painted people.",,lgbt
Trans Woman and NYC Nightlife Staple Wrongly Incarcerated,,lgbt
'Repent': Religious activist burns LGBTQ library books in protest against Pride Festival,,lgbt
Hm. Maybe a statement? 🤔,,lgbt
"Working at my old middle school today, I saw this in an English class’s library",,lgbt
We got to a quarter million!,,lgbt
Things that can help LGBTQ+ youth?,"I'm doing a service project in school where we work to support a community. My friends and I have chosen the LGBTQ+ community, and we have to create a project to better our chosen community. So far we have thought of ways to show support with pins, stickers, flags, posters etc., but we are struggling to think of something we can physically show to represent our progress. I know another LGBT group is thinking of creating online forums to talk to other LGBT youth, and I was wondering if you had any ideas along those lines that you think would help the LGBT community. Our goals are to educate people about the LGBT community and support other LGBT youth. What impactful things can we do to help?",lgbt
"When you're queer angry, and all alone",,lgbt
Flagging Help,"hi! i’m a lesbian and i don’t really know how to flag. not only do i want a girlfriend, but also just some new gay friends. i have some big ol’ stompy boots that i’m wearing as it gets colder. i usually wear flannel. i am pretty open on social media. 

are there some other things i can do to look ‘gay’? makeup tips? hair? mannerisms? jewelry? brands? ways to wear clothes?

edit: revised some things, added more things i don’t have much experience with.",lgbt
*Cries in gay*,"Why does she have to be straight. She’s so pretty, kind and funny. Ugh. I need a break from life. ",lgbt
Gay baseball player comes out to team in comic strip. ⚾,,lgbt
Frusturation,"A classmate of mine has brought up that she does not like gay people and that being gay is not correct during our math class. Our math teacher went to talk to her to suggest that she should not say that in school as there might be people who are gay in this room who has not voiced their sexuality, which would be just rude and mean to them,  and simply because he opposed that way of thinking. She argued that she should be able to voice her opinion, that it was because of her religion, and that if the math teacher was so open minded he should just accept that as her opinion and stop arguing against her.  The math teacher responds that as a teacher his job is to educate and that he would like to let her think if her religious goes against such things as sexuality to identify if a person is good or not, if it is the right way to base her thinking around. He ended the conversation there.

I decided to ask her to clarify what just happened out of curiosity. But she started to rant about how the teacher should not talk shit about her religion (even if he didn't) and started to victimize herself by saying that  shes just a student and can say whatever she wants but a teacher should not force ideas on her. And I started arguing with her just because I did not agree as well. 

It ended with another classmate just telling us to take it out of the room to stop disturbing the class. There were just so many things that she said that were hypocritical and it frustrated me that some one so ignorant was in my class. 

As an international school with an IB system our whole objective is to have a multicultural and open-minded system. (Some of you may know that one of the IB learner profile is open-minded.) I grew up in this school so I never experienced racism or homophobia that much, and it breaks me when I think about when I go to college abroad how many more ignorant people there would be there. I am a straight, Asian, teenager finishing my last year in high school, so might not be directly affected by this, but I know that some cultures are not open to Asians and also just thinking about how so many people are getting treated unfairly in the world because of their sexuality, race or other useless categorization without reason frustrates me indefinitely. ",lgbt
I'm new to this topic and I'm trying to learn and have many questions.,"If a boy who is straight is comfortable in his body but he also feels like if he were a girl. the only thing here is even if he was a girl, he'd be lesbian then as he likes girls only. Does this makes him a transgender? I mean if he's comfortable in being a girl and boy both, irrespective of his orientation.",lgbt
The official beverage of lgbt,,lgbt
[TW] Please stop what you doing to read my plea,"First off, I don't know reddit. Hardly at all. I've seen it be a Haven and a hellhole for people online as it is basically it's own online world connected to real life. So I don't know where to post, how the guidlines work, or how reddit functions as a community. I don't even know if it's okay to post on this subreddit.

But I need my voice to be heard. Because I am afraid.

I don't often post like this, but guys, I'm scared. This country scares me. Our government is trying to wipe anyone who has any gender identity other than male or female off the planet. I don't care if you think that lgbt and transgender people should be accepted, because that's an opinion. Here's a fact. There are millions of us. Millions.
M
I
L
L
I
O
N
S
Millions. Yes you heard it, millions of legal LGBT+ citizens. We have fought, so, so hard for equel rights. The only thing we have EVER wanted, was the same rights as everyone else. We are all human. We are here. You can't just make, I'll say it again, MILLIONS of people just vanish. Not without a seperate continant or an ocean of blood.

Your political, religious, and personal beliefs do not change the fact that we exist and that we are human with our own beliefs, just like you. We are not the middle east, where just having a single gay thought will get you shot dead on the spot, or worse. And if you think I'm exaggerating about that, you don't pay enough attention in the world.

But I look at the current state of affairs, and I look ahead in time should things continue as they are, and all I see is violence, bloodshed, and in the most extreme scenerios, I even see civil war.

We had civil war over slavery (among other reasons as well) and it tore us apart. We came out of it for the better (sorta...), we shouldn't need to have one every time the question of ""should this human being be treated as a human being?"" comes up. Because the answer should always, ALWAYS be a unanimous ""YES!"". A yes shouted so loud that life on other plnets will hear it!  So loud that we'll wake God himself from his daytime nap. Anyone who says otherwise is probably a Hitler sympathiser. You know, the guy that DID cause an ocean of blood by trying to eradicate MILLIONS of people just for existing.

So now Trump is trying to make it so transgender people will legally cease to exist. And it will probably pass because the supreme court is under Republican rule. And there isn't much we can do about it. (If there is though, please tell me).

The underlying cause is voters. Not enough people vote. Too many people vote without doing research. We could have prevented this. We could have prevented EVERYTHING that has happened. Instead, we hid. We thought our vote didn't matter. We were afraid to voice ourselves, afraid that we would be attacked. And some of those fears are rightly justified. But we have to take the risk if we want better lives! For ourselves. For our kids and their kids.

More people need to vote, and they need to vote for what is right. Humanly right. Put your personal, political, and religious beliefs aside and ask yourself ""Do I want be hurt the way these other human beings are being hurt?""

If your answer was no, then MAKE THE EFFORT! The Maine Gubernatorial election is NEXT MONTH. Don't listen to the campaign ads, don't read the attack articles. Do your research. Find the best candidate who advocates for a friendly, more accepting and loving future for EVERYONE involved. For you, your friends, your neighbors, and for all those who are assaulted every day for just wanting peace of mind.

And when 2020 rolls around, DONT RE-ELECT TRUMP! For the love of common sense, if his own party doesn't fully support him, NEITHER SHOULD YOU! So DON'T!

YOUR VOTE MATTERS!
DONT BE AFRAID TO VOTE! 
YOU COULD CHANGE THE FATE OF MILLIONS OF LIVES FOR THE BETTER IF YOU'D STAND UP AND LET YOUR VOICE BE HEARD!

I'm begging my family. I'm begging my friends. I'm begging the internet in it's entirety.

Don't let us be erased.
Don't let me be erased.
Stand up for what is right.

I have copied, pasted and shared this to almost every social media outlet I'm signed in to (waiting on Twitter to unlock my account). I want to see things change for the better. If reddit brands me a spam-bot and downvotes every post I make on it, that's okay. Just do what's right and I won't ever complain again.",lgbt
A beautiful wedding photo,,lgbt
An Open Letter to Donald Trump,"We are indomitable, unquenchable fire,

Spare us your ire that an inferno cannot be doused.

We are the bearers of love, beacons of light,

Long have we weathered the darkest nights,

Born of solidarity, not fear, this will not end here.

We are more than these words, much more than your words,

We are herds of people, as real as you, and we will not be silenced.

Not by this, not by you.


We are defined by the one thing you lack above all else: our love and compassion.

We are the inventors of a language of love used to define that which you cannot comprehend,

out of spite, out of malice, out a fear, but you do not control us here.

Your power is not a noose with which to make a dictionary genocide,

Barely a yoke that we have bucked off, again, and again.

It will happen again.


We are an army of history's downtrodden,

beatten, neglected, murdered in hate.

War of an age to which you, a white man, will never relate.

And we persist.

Through bullets and shame, let the paper rain,

We have survived much worse and we will survive again.


With our heads held high, look to the sky,

you cannot ground us.

You cannot erase us.

We are queer. We are here.

We will never leave.


-A woman with a penis",lgbt
Canada is doing it right!,,lgbt
Anna Akana comes out as queer during acceptance speech.,,lgbt
An overly respectful person concerned about respecting others.,"I want to start by saying I’m not trying to stir the pot. I’m not trying to be mean. I have autism and struggle with communication, so any malice isn’t intended. 

I live in Texas, and something I’ve been trained to do here is say “yes sir” or “yes ma’am”. It’s a thing with respect, and I don’t intend to change it for those who don’t ask. But there is no gender neutral term for this honorific. It’s meant as a sign of respect, so I don’t mean to be disrespectful, but it would be contradictory for me to use an honorific term on someone who is non-binary, as it would be disrespectful. 

Unless I’m wrong. Am I?

So what is the right word to use? I asked the president of the LGBTQ+ club at my school, but they didn’t have an answer. It’s not super important most of the time, but I feel like It’s going to come up sometime and I want to have a prepared response. ",lgbt
A Super Cool Generic Title,"Me and my friends, in 5th grade: We’re straight af, it’s so weird to be with someone if the same sex!!! How does that work???

Me and my friends now, in 8th Grade: The queerest queers whoever graced the grounds of our middle school ",lgbt
Edmonton Purolator Trans girl,"Last week while at work (Canadian Navy), I received a delivery from Purolator. While signing for the items, the girl stated she also is Trans, how difficult transitioning can be &amp; to stay the course, and how pretty I looked. You probably noticed I was having a shit day and If you didn't, I want to thank you as it put a smile on my face &amp; made me feel a bit better. Nothing beats the power of positivity! All of us in the LGBTQ+ community should use this as an example of how we should be supporting each other &amp; lifting each other up. You never know what someone else is going through.",lgbt
Just watched Queer Eye for the first time,"I don’t know why I never watched it before.   I just never did.   I don’t know why I put it on tonight.  I just did.

I watched Episode 1 of the first season with Mama Tammye and her community center and the homecoming at her church.  I almost skipped the episode but felt like I should watch it.

I grew up in the church.  It was my whole life.  I worked at my church and went to Bible college to.

Things are not the same since I am queer and married to a transgender woman.  My own parents have disowned me and our kids.  The church has turned their back on me.   It hurts.

I cried so much during this episode and just wished that my parents could be like Mama Tammye.  I have been praying that they will come around.

I hope they do.  Jesus loves me and my wife.   Why can’t my parents?

I’m 46 years old and I still wish my parents would accept me.   I guess it doesn’t matter how old a person is, we all just want to be loved and accepted.

I couldn’t handle watching another episode tonight and I don’t know when I will again.   Are all the episodes this intense?",lgbt
Help,Im not okay the new trans laws are really fucking me up i had to take benzos to calm down people are going to be able to legally discriminate and the government is going to force me to be something im not i cant take this,lgbt
"People who are genderfluid, or bigender, or pansexual, or anything else that I haven't really heard of it, what it that and what's your thoughts, feelings, and experiences about it?","About a year and a half ago I stopped being a fundemental christian and along with that a bunch of homophobia, transphobia and other things got thrown out as well. And since then it's just sort of been that. Except when it comes to the + in lgbt+. I sort of thought of that people made stuff up to be unique, but that was last year. 

This year I have been trying hard to work on my crappy personality and adapting the life view of ""if it doesn't hurt you or anyone else then why not?"" and that's sort of been my view of the + of this community. 

It kind of got shoved to the back of my mind until my co workers girlfriend clamed to be some thing that I forgot but it was like a genderfluid thing. 

So people who are of the + of this community, what your identity, sexual, ect and tell me about it. ",lgbt
Forever in the Closet,"So I recently came out to my sister, who is just a very accepting natured person. Who, well, wasn’t surprised and pretty much already knew. With her reaction, it gave me hope that society had adjusted it’s perspective on such things as being part of the lgbtq+ community. It’s taken me awhile to validate my own feelings, love and accept myself for who I am and actually get to know myself and respect myself not just in the lesbian thing. Although I knew I couldn’t come out because I’m an athlete and it would take away chances at scholarships and representations, and limit my access to high-end resources and coaching that the scholarships would offer. A part of me must of believed a time would come when I would be able to come out, be free to be who I am, get a girlfriend, and all that other jazz; because when my mum told me everything she did tonight it destroyed some subconscious fantasy I had about it. 

Bit of a background story: my family, the only one that haven’t entirely disowned me yet. For reasons, that, would be too complicated to explain of why the multiple families I’ve been apart of have. Bottom line is that it’s something I had no control over, and isn’t a reflection on who I am as a person rather on what people we have in this world. Anyway, they still push me to the side. Critique me at every turn. They’re constantly waiting for me to mess up, turn into some delinquent, go off the rails, I don’t even know at this point. Everything I do is taken under the microscope. They’re waiting for the day they can say they were right about me, in order to also say they were right about my mother. 

For the first time they’ve acknowledged that my mother did a good job at raising me (of course attempting to take their own credit). They’re finally, almost, accepting me. It’s taken me to graduate high school at 14, have my first degree at 15, stop using anything to express myself like makeup and clothes, smile all the time, pretend I’m not sick all the time and jumping from specialist to specialist who tell me “you will die, you should have died, and you could die”, less my opinion, have the hell of my past go only leaving the mental and physical scares I mustn’t talk about, along with so much more. Though the real tipping point; getting my health fairly under control and stepping back onto track, becoming an athlete with times that will have me a strong qualification at nationals. Now I’m being treated almost like I’m one of them, and my mother has finally been acknowledged for not screwing me up. 

Now she tells me in a conversation tonight (after her parents had told her that she done well pretty much) that amongst many other things they were expecting me to “become gay” and “catch gay” because of the way I was being raised. Now, I thought they were accepting of  the lgbtq+ community. I was wrong.. it seems like .. well they said if [name that’s not me] was gay they could never tell anyone because it would destroy their reputation, and that they couldn’t have them in this family. It would be a disgrace. 

They only tend to accept people, once a bunch of other people do, and once society does. I could be gay, if I became a respected athlete and everyone else did. Until then, I’d be a disgrace. 

I know a lot people would just tell me to be myself and screw them. That if they don’t accept me for who I am then they’re not people I want taking up space in my life. That true friends, or true family would love me no matter who I love. Because that’s the exact advice I’d give to someone else. Although this isn’t just a reflection on my failure as a person, but my mums “failure” as a mother. Which I refuse to do that to her, because she’s the best mother in the world and she’s like my best friend. She deserves to get told she’s done it right. I can’t turn around and say I’m gay now. 

Im thinking of waiting until they all die.. or wait until my cousin, who’s a big junior league football player, who I’m pretty confident is gay comes out ... although I don’t know if he ever will because he knows 110% the criticism he faces. Not even I’m sure if he’s father will completely disown him or not.

I wanted to tell my mother so bad tonight. I honestly thought she already knew, with hints she’s dropped and certain things she’s said. After tonight though.. I’m not sure she does. I know what she’d say though. She’d tell me to be me, do what makes me happy and fuck them. She’d push me to be myself, and I’m afraid of what would happen if I listened to that advice. I don’t want to complicate stuff, when I’ve already had such a complicated and painful life.

I don’t know what I’m looking for here... just advice, another way out. Someone to just tell me that it would just be the right thing for everyone if I just made another little sacrifice. 

(Thank-you for reading 💛 - every bit of advice will help 🌹. Also, I’m sorry for any grammatical errors or spelling errors it’s late at night after an exhausting day xx). ",lgbt
How stupid can Malaysia Ex Duputy Prime Minister can be? When he talks about LGBT,,lgbt
The Trump Administration’s Definition of “Gender” is Not Science,[https://www.psychologytoday.com/us/blog/political-minds/201810/trump-administration-s-definition-gender-is-not-science](https://www.psychologytoday.com/us/blog/political-minds/201810/trump-administration-s-definition-gender-is-not-science),lgbt
Thank god for that Quality praying time,,lgbt
"Homophobic/transphobic ""friend""","So I'm in 8th grade right now and I have a ""friend"" I've known since 6th grade. Everyday he says some homophobic or transphobic crap. In my chorus class there is a gay kid who wears makeup and is dating a transgender. He always says that he is a a weirdo and a f*g. He also said that he will get rid of his phone if they don't get rid if the pride flag emoji 🌈. The worst thing he said to me that Donald Trump needs to deport all of the LGBT community to hell. Then he said that if If I was ever gay, he would ""beat my ass. "" What do I do? He is my only friend.  I'm not good at meeting new people and I usually sit alone at lunch. If anyone could help me, that would be nice. ",lgbt
Trans rights in America - what is going on?,"I am European and I don't understand what is happening over there with The Trump administration changing the Department of Health and Human service’s interpretation of Title IX. 
What EXACTLY are they doing? Some sources just say they are changing the definition of sex, but others say they are bringing gender into it and connecting it to sex as if it were the same thing.",lgbt
"Asexual, Gray-Sexual, Demi-Sexual help please?","So I'm Biromantic Asexual, but last night, I came across Demi and Gray-Sexual and now I'm confused on my part.

I know it's okay to be confused and to not know yet, but in all honesty not knowing something like this gives me crazy anxiety (I know I sound ridiculous, but that's aside the point.)

The reason I'm so confused is because both Demi and Gray sound a lot like me and my ideals of ""sex."" I'm not really down with having someone's something up in me ~~(fuck that shit m8)~~ for just the few minutes of pleasure and there are far too many risks to take. Of course, with that being said, I'm not shitting on people that do enjoy sex, I'm simply saying that I for one do not like the idea. 

I knew identifying myself as Asexual made people think that it was a giant ass red flag on my part on ANYTHING sexual, but that isn't the case. I like getting a bit intimate, and I still fantasize or whatever, but the truth is is that I never truly felt comfortable with the label of Asexual because of these very reasons, even though I know that it's still totally acceptable for an Ace to do those things. 

The thing is, I don't want to ever have sex until I have a very strong romantic bond and lots of trust and knowledge of the person, something that would put me under Demi-Sexual. But I also rarely actually WANT to have sex, which would make me a Gray-Sexual.

So my question is: **Is there some sort of middle ground between Demi-Sexual and Gray-Sexual? Or could you help me classify as either?**

If you need more details of my personal experience, then I'll reply to your comment explaining what you need.",lgbt
Is it really the “best of both worlds” or is it a curse?,"I am a 19 year old male and I identify myself as bisexual. However, there is so much to think about and this is why I am struggling to decide if my sexual preference is actually going against what I am seeking in the long term. I think that people have a bad way of understanding that I do not like one gender more than the other. I know that I am attracted to both and that I shouldn’t have to choose. As a single man I can see why the quote “best of both worlds” can be heard as fascinating and exciting because you can enjoy being with anyone you desire. However, what happens when it is time to get a bit serious and be in a relationship? How do you decide you want to spend the rest of your life with a male or female? To me that sounds that I will never be able to be emotionally and sexually content with myself. A relationship commonly consist of 2 people so what happens when I am feeling sexual attraction towards wanting to feel, just an example, a penis instead of vagina and vice versa? I feel that this is a reason I will never be truly happy because it’d feel like the other part of me is missing and this doesn’t make it any easier to find my self identity just yet. I shouldn’t have to choose my preference as it is already in me psychologically. Have any of you had a similar thought in this? If so what advice can you give me? I currently just ended an 8 month relationship because it had to do with a little bit of this",lgbt
“openminded” christian,,lgbt
Sexuality is hard and I'm confused and frustrated,"Growing up I was always teased for acting ""gay."" I hung out with almost all girls and was awkward af (and not the most masculine guy around) so i became the ""straight gay friend."" Well I thought I had finally gotten past that but now I'm starting to question my sexuality a little. A lot. I've only ever been with women. I've had a few girlfriends, and no boyfriends. I kissed a dude once, but that was because he was creeping out one of my girl friends while we were drinking and that seemed to be the best way to diffuse that situation.

I've been flipping around a lot on it. Sometimes I think I'm ace, sometimes demi, sometimes bi. I want to experiment a little and figure out where I'm at but I don't want to deal with the ""ha I knew it"" from my friends. And if I figure out I am actually straight then I reeeeaaallly don't want to deal with getting teased for that either. I really don't know what to do and could use some advice",lgbt
In loving memory of Matthew Shepard.,,lgbt
Theo and Trish (The Haunting of Hill House),,lgbt
Starting to think Omegle is the wrong place to find friends..,"&amp;#x200B;

[Ashe tries to make friends on Omegle](https://i.redd.it/e26flgc99ut11.png)",lgbt
I just came out as bisexual to my dad. It went pretty well!,"After two years of feeling attracted to men and women I finally came out to a family member. I've been out to my boyfriend and friends for a year now. (I am a 20 year old female) I came out to my dad and he was super sweet and said he just wants me to be happy in life. He also said whoever I end up with (man or woman) he will be supportive and happy. Which is awesome! I'm a little upset because he insisted I am not bisexual I am just bicurious because I have never been with a woman. He said I shouldn't call myself bisexual unless I've slept with a woman and dated her for at least a few months. This kind of made me feel invalid, but at least he has said he will support me no matter what.

Edit: I came out to the my mom and my brother too and they both took it pretty well. They didn't seem to mind that I'm bi, but they weren't negative about it! 

Although my mom thought this meant my boyfriend and I are now going to have an open relationship. I explained to her that that is not what we plan to do, it's just that over the past few years I came to the realization that I am attached to women as well as men.

Overall a success!

I feel so relieved. :)",lgbt
Prevalence and determinants of anal human papillomavirus infection in men who have sex with men and transgender women,,lgbt
Early voting begins in Texas! Beto supports LGBT!,https://www.votetexas.gov/calendar-dates/early-voting-begins.html,lgbt
Nerd some clarity,"Hi everyone. Firstly please don't judge me harshly, I'm (37 F) just starting to figure things out. A friend of mine (28 non binary) recently was chatting about their husband and said something about accepting them being binary. They asked me how my husband handled it. I was confused what they meant, then they said ""well you're gender fluid"". Again, I didn't get it. Then they got awkward and asked if identified as female all the time cuz they had a feeling I was fluid and that's why they never used a female pronoun with me. After they explained it, it got me thinking. I called my mother and asked her why she used to say ""my son (I have a unisex name)"" as a joke my whole life. She said that at times she saw me as a boy, in the toys I liked, the clothes I wore and my mannerisms. I just always thought I was weird. I am straight and I apologize of I offend anyone, but what little I knew about gender fluidity, I assumed sexual preference would also have to be fluid. I'm now questioning my identity and if anyone can help me I'd really appreciate it. Tia",lgbt
Transgender activists slam US govt plan to define gender as ‘male’ and ‘female’ based on biology,,lgbt
A few months ago my cousin was complaining about how hetero-normative and exclusive sports news/radio/podcasts are...,"so we started our own sports podcast! It's just your average comedic sports show, but we are LGBTQ+ and women friendly. Almost every week we like to add at least one segment that showcases an LGBTQ+ athlete or women in sports. 

It is not exclusively a queer and trans show, but we do our best to make everyone feel comfortable and welcome! We're hoping that eventually other people will hear our show and start making some changes of their own. ",lgbt
How can I help the transgender community? With Trump threatens to take away their rights. It makes me want to help out the community.,,lgbt
How do you know if a girl is flirting or doing straight girl things?,"Not sure if this is the best sub for this, but figured the LGBT sub could help me figure this kind of thing out.

There’s this girl that I think I’m forming a crush on and she’s always touching me (reached for my hand once, probably an accident? one time demonstrated how she reacts in haunted houses and wrapped her arms around mine when there was a group of girls), joking around and whatnot, but that’s also something a lot of straight girls do? Like, I feel that it’s hard to understand where the line is because we (girls in general) change in front of each other, sleep in the same beds when we stay at the other’s house, etc. 

So any advice before I fully commit and fall for another straight girl? Coming out isn’t exactly an option because I’m all the way in Narnia atm lol",lgbt
Iowa man burns children's books from public library to protest Orange City Pride,,lgbt
Iowa man burns children's books from Orange City Library to protest Pride,,lgbt
Lambda Legal: Trump Administration Effort to Erase Transgender Americans Will Not Stand,,lgbt
@jack_turban via Vox: It’s okay to let your transgender kid transition — even if they might change their mind in the future,[https://www.vox.com/2018/10/22/18009020/transgender-children-teens-transition-detransition-puberty-blocking-medication](https://www.vox.com/2018/10/22/18009020/transgender-children-teens-transition-detransition-puberty-blocking-medication),lgbt
This Man Is Building World's Biggest Virtual Library Of Coming Out Stories,,lgbt
Wife and I went to the pumpkin patch today 😻 happy Sunday y’all,,lgbt
Where do we go from here?,"I am using a throwaway just to be safe.  Also sorry if this is a wall of text or if I say anything that offends anyone, but we are out of our depth here. My sweet, quirky, quiet 15 year old cousin came out to my immediate family (my sister, mom, dad, brother and I) last week as a lesbian.  I was so happy she finally felt safe and comfortable enough to tell us.  We let her know that we love her and it's cool, we support her and it was all around a happy family time. The problem is  (and I am feeling like *what century is it* typing this) her parents are not accepting and it is becoming a huge issue. 

My aunt and uncle are extremely conservative in all ways, some might say fanatical.  They co-run a church and go 3 times a week.  Dad is a youth pastor &amp; to give you a quick idea of what we're dealing with he does not believe in self-esteem or mental illness or privacy for children.  (Being depressed and being happy are not real things, if you have God's love you should always be joyful or something like that) They feel very strongly about their beliefs. Anyway, she had an outpouring of everything she's been going through for the last few years..  In 8th grade she told her father she was bisexual with the aid/support of her best friend at the time (she said she was still not 100% sure of whether she was bi or lesbian at the time) and he told her to wait until her mom got home and they would discuss.  What actually happened was they sat her down and told her she just *thinks* she likes girls because she never had many friends when she was little so she can't tell the difference between friend feelings and I like you feelings. Then she was not allowed to hang out with the friend who was there when she told them anymore. So they denied her feelings and isolated her.  Fast forward awhile.

Late into freshman year of high school she was grounded from her phone for 6 months. None of us knew why, I assumed she had a social media account (which is forbidden in their house) and they are very strict with her so that's why it was taken away.  Turns out she forgot her phone when she went to youth group one night and mom went through it and found texts that she hadn't deleted yet to a friend talking about liking some girl at school. So she was confronted and asked ""are you still having these feelings?"" and told that this was not acceptable. So she was scared and she lied and said she was just confused again because there was a guy that had been harassing her at school (there was not) and so she didn't really like girls, but she doesn't like guys either.   They half-bought the story.  So no phone for 6 months and they changed her number as well and told her not to give it out.  They regularly go through her phone now that she has it back.  Her parents told her they wanted her to see a counselor about this and she agreed but only on the condition that it be doctor-patient confidentiality so they couldn't know everything that was said.  So counseling didn't happen because they said no, you will speak to someone who shares our beliefs and no keeping secrets from them.  They told her she can tell them anything and she should trust them.  

As of right now she says her most of her teachers know, most people at school/her friends know and now we (small portion of the family) know.  She has a girlfriend who happens to attend youth group with her (their way of getting to hang out because otherwise she is questioned about who/what/when/why she wants to hang out with any given teenage girl).  So essentially she is ""dating"" this girl directly under her parents' noses.   However, as she says her mom and dad don't know and can't know or this relationship and her life as she knows it is pretty much over. 

But since she told us, she has been calling and trying to get us to drive her and said gf to the mall or a movie to celebrate their one month anniversary.  This is where it's getting sticky.  We've put her off for a few days trying to decide how to handle this.  Please understand,  I would drive her anywhere in a heartbeat. I want to support her in every way possible.  But it's one thing for us to be there for her when she needs to talk , and keep her ""secret"" and let her know that she is perfectly within her rights to be who she is.  It's another thing to actively go behind her parents backs and take her on these dates she is not supposed to be going on.  I feel like she is going to feel so defeated when we have to say we can't do this for her.  Like she finally got the courage to get support from family and now we have to turn the request down. 

The best way I think to explain it would be to tell her that if her parents had a rule of no dating until she's an adult, we wouldn't be willing to help her sneak around whether she wanted to go out with a boy or a girl. That's not exactly the case but it might help put it into perspective.  Also, if her parents find out we know and we are helping her disobey them, she will not be allowed to be around us.  I don't want her isolated further.  Same as if they know everyone at school knows, they will pull her out of that school.  I also thought about offering her a compromise of okay, we can drive her but like me/my sister or me/my boyfriend kind of going along to the mall or movie too.  That way we can't ever be told she was left unchaperoned on some sneaky date. 

I don't know. I don't want her to lead double lives, but she is.  I'm worried about this being damaging to her mentally, but her parents don't believe in mental health so there will be no argument there.  I don't want her shipped off to some scary camp. I don't want her not to be allowed to talk to us and I don't want her to feel like we are being hypocritical (we support you but we can't help you date??). How do we go about supporting her past the initial coming out? Any help is appreciated!",lgbt
Dam u gay,,lgbt
#WontBeErased#TransRightsAreHumanRights,,lgbt
Watch: Transgender Advocates Rally at the White House Over Erasure Memo,,lgbt
How Do You Even Come Out?,"The past couple weeks I have really wanted to come out to my best friend but I can never figure out when and how to do it or what to come out as (I know I like guys but not sure about girls).

I think I am just going to come out as Bi beacuse that is more socialy accepected at my school and also leaves my options open in case I do end up liking a girl. I only want to come out to him so it has to be alone but i feel weird just randomly walking up to him and saying ""hey btw I am Bi"" so how should I bring it up? I am going to see a movie with him this weekend so should I do it their? I am also just so scared that are relationship will change because we have been friends for 8 years so should I even risk the relationship and come out to him?

(I already posted this on LGBTeens but figured it would be worth getting more peoples opinion)",lgbt
I had an uncomfortable interaction with my RA and I'm not sure what to do about it.,"Background: I'm gay but don't really ""show"" it in anyway and so people assume I'm straight.   
   
I live with 6 other people in an on campus apartment and on of those 6 people happens to also be my RA. Up until now I've considered him a friend and have felt fine hanging out with him and interacting with him, but this past Friday I had an interaction that was uncomfortable and awkward and has made me not want to interact with him anymore.   
   
I came back from a party on Friday to find 4 of my roommates, my RA being one of them, in the living room talking and hanging out so I joined them. Eventually one of them asked me how the party was and I responded that it was good but had an awkward interaction when someone tried to set me up with this guy who I wasn't very interested in and so I left the party. Once I said this my RA looked taken aback and/or shocked and started on a very weird conversation. He basically kept saying that I wasn't actually gay, how I'm straight, and how it was gross that someone tried to set me up with a guy at the party. He kept asking me if I was really gay and once I emphatically said yes he seemed unsatisfied with my answer and then asked everyone else there if I was really gay and once they said yes as well he said something along the lines of ""Aw man, I can't believe your gay.""   
   
This conversation was quick but really uncomfortable and I just stayed in my room for the rest of the night. Every day since then he's seemed more stand-offish and distant like he doesn't want to interact with me. The whole thing has just made me feel not comfortable around him anymore.   
   
I feel like I should bring this up with him but him being an RA and in a position above me makes me really hesitant to do so and I know that he as a person is not very receptive to criticism and I'm worried he might respond poorly and it might have consequences.   
   
So I guess I'm just looking for input for whether I'm blowing this out of proportion and if not what should I do. ",lgbt
Can someone help me ? ( no idea if this the right sub reddit sorry ),I was planning on asking a few members of my GSA this but it's out until November. I'm really confused about my gender on one hand I want to stay being female on the other I want to be a guy. I don't wanna come out to soon as this might be a phase but I figured talking to other people would help me out. I have no idea if what I feel is dysphoria or just thing my brain thinks is cool. I'm scared to tell my school because I know I'd be misgendered and the transphobic commments would be endless. I hate being a girl but I'm scared to be a guy I feel like I'm faking it. Can someone please give me advice thank you.,lgbt
Ive always wondered (demisexuality question),"Is demisexuality an orientation or a preference? What do you think? Not to offend anyone, I'm just curious ",lgbt
A Legacy at Risk: Why RuPaul’s Views on Gender &amp; Race Feel Problematic Today,,lgbt
Coming out as pan,"As a child, you are sweet, innocent, clueless and don't see anything wrong with anyone unless they steal your favorite toy. I was one of those kids. I had Naruto action figures that I would play with constantly (I has no idea who they were at the time). But I would (i fucking hate that I'm saying this) would make Naruto and Saska kiss. I didn't think it was weird at all in my mind. I had always liked being happy with people they loved. So when I started feeling attraction to guys and girls I thought I was bisexual. And then I learned about the whole gender spectrum and it blew my world. I loved how people identified as all of these genders. And I realized something bigger; I was pansexual. I found out I was pansexual at 14. Now the problem is that my mom was severely conservative and thought gay marriage was ridiculous. So coming out wasn't really an option at the time. But I had came out to friends about it and they supported me, for the most part. At 17, I was confident enough to tell my mom. I had a fall back plan if it didn't work: either go with my grandma or one of my friends. But I was one of the lucky ones. My mom was very accepting and said her feelings didn't affect the way she felt about me. I know this isn't the case for anyone that comes out and I do symposium for anyone who wasn't accepted. But hear me when I say this: if you come out and you are proud of your sexuality, you are very strong and you will make it through your hardship. You just have to find the right people.",lgbt
YouTube is still censoring LGBTI content after promising it wouldn't,,lgbt
What an interesting week I've been having 😬 (fully story in comments),,lgbt
Unintentional Conditioning?,"Hi everyone - just had a random thought while talking to my boyfriend the other day about our childhoods. Was curious if anyone experienced anything similar (for clarity’s sake, we’re both men). I’ve always been fairly certain I’ve always been gay, but for whatever reason was thinking about “what could have been a  cause for this?” and something popped into my head that I thought was funny if it was true, but fairly certain it’s just coincidental.

Growing up, would regularly watch movies and tv shows with my family. Any time there was ever a known scene with nudity coming up, or if it was a surprise, would always be quickly told to cover my eyes, hide under the blanket, etc. In contrast, there was no such need to cover my eyes when there were shirtless/half-naked men on the screen ready to be ogled. I wonder if this over the course of many years conditioned my brain to be afraid of the female form. Like Pavlov with his dogs and his bell, any time I see boobs I get a tiny heart attack. My brain screams, “Ahh danger! Shut your eyes or get in trouble!” It’s not rational in any way, but it’s still my initial reaction. Did anyone have a similar experience/results growing up? ",lgbt
How LGBTQ people are breaking down barriers to take on the great outdoors,,lgbt
I made a follow up video about life in the closet as mtf!,,lgbt
Small New Brunswick village removes ‘straight pride’ flag after backlash,,lgbt
This is truly amazing,,lgbt
ACLU to Immediately Sue if Trump Admin. Greenlights Trans Erasure,,lgbt
Human Rights Campaign calls on Trump admin not to go forward with potential rollback of transgender protections,,lgbt
What are the practical implications of the Trump administration's move?,"With a lot of angry feelings going around, I just want to know what will happen?

* Will I still be able to get my hormones? Will they still be covered by state health insurance? 

*  Will I still be able to change my ID gender marker when it's time for that? 

* Who will now be able to discriminate against me?

* Do state laws and bathroom laws still have power? In Colorado we have protections from discrimination and we can use the appropriate restroom, legally. 

* Are there any relevant protections we need to take into account for our family? We have children. My spouse has been concerned about that. 

I know there are plenty of hurt feelings and people up in arms. I don't get my feelings hurt easily and I could care less what people think of me. But I worry that this move will interfere with my ability to peacefully raise my family. Thank you.  ",lgbt
Plans to Establish Biological Definition of Gender Threatens Trans Rights,,lgbt
Martell NCF Curious Sessions EP01: Stag to Drag,,lgbt
"Honolulu has won a bid to host a major sporting event – the Gay Bowl – in October of 2020. More than 1,200 players are expected to turn out for the annual gay flag football tournament, which will mark its 20th anniversary here in the islands.",,lgbt
Gay family members,"Does anyone else have fellow gay siblings, parents, aunts, uncles or grandparents?

I'm gay and my dad is also gay. ",lgbt
Am I gay?,"I really need help. I have no friends and my family isn't really open minded on this topic. 

I'm a male, 20 years old and I've been in an heterosexual relationship for 7 years with a lovely woman. Nothing was faked and my feelings were absolutely sincere, I loved her with all my heart and I felt destroyed when she left me. 

However, since she left me I felt different. I'm not grossed out by men, and I sometimes feel very attracted to them on a physical level, I've never ever felt that before and it's extremely confusing. Time has passed and even on a sentimental level I feel like building a relationship with a man would be very nice and comforting. 

I've never felt that way, please don't judge me I feel lost. I don't even know if I'm on the right sub. Please help me, you can even ask me questions if you want more context or anything. ",lgbt
I got to marry my best friend and love yesterday. I’ve never been so proud to call her my wife. Plus I think we make a pretty cute family.,,lgbt
Is there an official pansexual non-binary flag?,,lgbt
"I want to comw out to my family, but i dont know if its the best plan for me.","I came out to my friends and co-workers slowly over the past year. I am a bisexual female in a long term heterosexual relationship with a man I love very much. I have avoided at all costs coming out to anyone related to me or family friends for fear of it getting around to my parents and siblings. They would never disown me or be abusive if I came out to them, I just know they'd be a little dissappointed. My family isn't necessarily homophobic, but they aren't very excited by the idea. I really want to come out to them, but I'm just worried it'll make things awkward and they tell me I'm going through a phase. It really bugs me that I have to hide it from them though.  Should I come out to them?
Edit: sorry for the misspelled title, lol.",lgbt
Something I made while waiting for Kesha to take the stage,,lgbt
HELP ME,"My name is Alexandra ! i am A girl ( that info is important lol) so i have to share something that is going on in my life right now . and i could use some useful adivce from any who is willing to share from experience . because i am not so experienced . so any help is very usful to me and fortunatley i enjoy writing ! okay .

i have a friend and we are very close . i actually only met her 10 months ago. We have grown to be very close friends . she has become one of the best friends and people ive ever loved so deeply. the nature of our firendship is very loving . She is a naturally sweet and compassionate person. You know those people who just love others naturally ? thats her . Shes literally the purest person ive ever met. when i first met her she always invited me over her apartment, she loves hanging with friends and having sleep overs and having some beers . though when i met her she was new to the area , she had just moved into town and i was the only person blocks away from her to be down with all her cool adventure .( she has tons of friends now ) but thats how it started, and ever since we just became literally one person . now its just normal for us to spend every minute together, she will come over my house and suprise mewith a pizza pie when i was feeling low, and we would just lay on the couch and watch funny videos on youtube. or she will sleep over and we will talk all night in my bed, or she will come over and chill for the night and id cook her dinner. and we can just talk and talk and talk. and she really values our friendship. ALOT. one time we had a little fight and she literally said to me "" can we please stay friends , because i love you very much ?"" lol and over the summer i even went with her to her home state for two weeks and spent time with her and her friends and family. she invited others to come on the trip as well, but i turned out to be the only one with the circumstance to go and we had so much fun! so yeah . best friends literally playing every stereo type of what best friends do. lol but then something happened to me . i.... fell in love with her . i fell in love with my best friend. and it was super scary because im so close with her and so deep in her life, how the heck would i overcome this in a timely matter ???!!! i have had deep romantic or sexual attractions for other women before and i have dated women before , so im not scared because i had the feelings , im familiar with them. i got scared because its with my best friend . GET READY

so in a deep conversation at a cafe with her i talked to her about my past alittle more . and i told her i used to date girls ( yes i havent dated a girl in forever , school, college and work, i havent dated a guy since freshmen year of college lol ) so i told her i used to date girls and she told me about her past alittle more in depth. 1 week later we are texting at like 1 am in morning and within the convo she texts me saying "" so i used to date girls too "" and i said oh .. cool!

and through out that month she brought it up like 2 other times more with me about me being involved with other women. things like"" how many girls did you date?"" "" did your mom ever know you dated girls ?"" and id give her number and i responed ""no actually my mom never knew, just my brother and my close aunt "" and id ask her "" how about you?"" and she says "" my mom and brother and entire family never knew either , just one of my bestfriends back home"" this conversation took place while she had to crash on my couch cause she was having car problems and couldnt drive home. she was downstairs texting me this . so i ask her if i can come down and see her and she says yes. and we talked about on the couch and dark parts of our past and we cuddled . LOL which was literally the best feeling in the world for me. speed forward from that night, next month she tells me she had a sex dream about me and that it was very detailed into the movements and sounds she says . and then she says "" so now you can never say i dont think you are pretty and beatiful""

do you think shes attracted to me or likes me???",lgbt
Very confused.,"25/m straight or at least I think I am.. I’ve recently developed this attraction towards trans women and I’m not sure how to feel about it. I don’t know if this makes me gay or bi or what, I’m very confused. ",lgbt
Mark My Words: Pride Will Unite Us or Divide Us-#Boom Magazine|2018,,lgbt
"My boyfriend took this photo of me 10 minutes before we had homophobic abuse shouted at us in the street. Stay proud, folks!",,lgbt
Finally accepted I'm polysexual,"Ngl the main reason I tried to just settle for being Bi is because I didn't want people to be all ""Poly? doesnt that mean multiple people at once??"" and have to explain it but yknow screw it Im not gonna exclude people I'm attracted to from my sexuality bc of a minor inconvenience",lgbt
Watch: Billy Eichner is Over “Evil Piece of Sh*t” Trump and Needs You to Vote,,lgbt
[TW] Trying to improve myself as a person,"I had a heated argument with a person a few months ago and it's seriously affecting my mental health. I've thought about killing myself over this - among other things.

I was having a discussion about how my interactions with a specific gender have affected how I interact with others of said gender and which is why I've just started seeing everyone as People. Obviously my sexual preference means I favor one over the other. 

Well the lesbian person that was in the room didn't like what I was saying and assumed I meant females were inferior to males - not what i was saying at all! She demanded that I describe her in line with what I had just said. I called her a person. When she pressed I added a butch person. She went off on me saying that I was essentially saying she wasn't a woman and that using the word ""butch"" had been extremely insulting.

I do admit to calling her a racist when I tried to compare her previously [months ago] saying ""I don't trust white people; I don't trust them as far as I can through them"" jet still having white friends [which I KNOW she said because after that she walked off to her car leaving the other 3 of is in awkward silence]. Of course I misquoted her in the argument in question as having said ""f- white people"" ... the night ended with her asking me either I was wrong or she was racist to which I answered ""both"" because I realized I misquoted her but still considered the actual quote racist. 

I've lost my boyfriend and he's lost his friends when he initially sided with me when she talked to them about this - among other things. I don't know what she said and I never got a chance to tell my side.

TL:DR Was I wrong for having called a lesbian woman a person? Is ""butch"" that bad a thing to say? I never said she wasn't a woman but I also refused to tell her she WAS because that wasn't what the conversation was supposed to be about and as bad as I feel that she went through something like that, it wasn't my fault someone else told her she wasn't a woman. I know I should give up on those friends I lost but it really hurts to be outcast over this. I guess all I can really do is learn from it.",lgbt
Trans friends and family. What can I do to help?,"I just heard that Trump administration is attempting to redefine gender to remove federal recognition of trans men and women’s appropriate genders. 

I wanted to see if there are any resources out there that I can use, spread around, donate to, etc. to help out. I am pretty unfamiliar with these protections (as I personally would not be affected), but I would like to educate myself and make sure I do what I can to help out. ",lgbt
What made you realize you were a part of the LGBTQ+ community?,"There are some people who claim they've always known. For me, I didn't even consider it as a possibility until I was twelve. And I didn't completely realize until I was 15, just earlier this year actually. And I remember the exact moment it hit me:

I was sat on my old leather couch, laptop balanced on my knees, listening to Girl in Red - a queer singer. I was listening specifically to her song 'I wanna be your girlfriend'. I was just grinning as I listened, headphones on and swaying from side to side. And then I remember just thinking to my self: 'Listen bitch, there's no way you're not queer.'

The next day I was being driven somewhere, and I just *gawked* out the window. Because how on earth had I not noticed before how amazing girls are? Just everything about them was new to me - their style, faces, laughs, hair, etc. It was just insane. And amazing. That's the moment when I was sure.",lgbt
"Free, confidential and discreet STD testing for anyone living in Maryland or Alaska!","Go to www.iwantthekit.org and use the code HCPSS for free shipping. I just put in the order for mine today, I saw a flyer for it on the bus. Be safe!",lgbt
Calculating America’s most LGBTQ+ friendly cities,,lgbt
LGBT song,,lgbt
"I see a woman in this picture, and damn if she isn't happier than ever",,lgbt
PSA: Generic Atripla may have serious mood-altering side effects including suicidal thoughts.,"I just want to share this story in the hopes that no one else has to experience it first-hand. TLDR at the bottom.

My partner is HIV positive and has been taking Atripla for a number of years. His Doctor recently switched him over to the generic version of the drug with no warning of the switch and no warning of any potential side effects. Unbeknownst to him, the change started causing a serious deep depression that greatly affected his personal and professional life. He became distant, quiet, and lethargic, and revealed to me that he was experiencing moments where he very seriously considered suicide, as it was the only way he could think of ""ending his suffering."" He had thought about which way he would do it, and even had a dream where he sat in the closed garage and left the car running.

Fortunately he had a close friend ask him if he had any recent prescription changes that may be causing his depression, and he went back to his doctor and was put back on his old prescription. We noticed a drastic change back to normal within days.

I am posting this here in case anyone else is put in the same situation and doesn't have the resources to figure it out before it's too late. He was give no warning whatsoever, he was just given different drugs when he picked up his pills.


TL;DR: Partner was put on generic Atripla without warning, and it caused serious depression that nearly convinced him to commit suicide. ",lgbt
"This stupid crap in my neighborhood, ugh.",,lgbt
How can I help as a minor,"     My name is Jacob, and i am a 17 year old cis male identifying as pansexual. I am the leader of the LGBT+ club at my high school and an active member in supporting LGBT+ rights. I want to help out, i want to try and make a difference but i feel like my voice can not be herd until i old enough to vote. There are so many people who want to support the LGBT+ community  but they are either not of age to vote, and or their community does not have enough people to back up this giant family.
     I have tried to help out by doing activities online, such as petitions, writing about my perspective, or contacting my local government. I feel like i am not able to help out enough. 
     TL;DR How can i help the LGBT+ community as a minor and when there aren’t enough followers locally. ",lgbt
Is any here a professor at an American community college that identifies as GSRM/LGBTQ?,"I am looking for a professor that identifies as a GSRM/LGBTQ individual that I can interview for my class. Please PM if you would be interested in being interviewed. My questions will be about your experience as someone who identifies as GSRM/LGBTQ individual in the community college you work at as well as how you perceive the GSRM/LGBTQ student community at your community college.

Thank you!",lgbt
Denial smile to first day out. (MTF),,lgbt
"Lol this is what I was talking about 😂 Few messages later ""Oh what's that, I've only heard of Polyamorous""",,lgbt
Queer folk band out of New Orleans...,,lgbt
I have existential issues that I need to tell strangers on the internet about and hope to get some advice. Thanks.,"Okay so, hi. I’m 21, female and pansexual, I guess. I always knew I’m attracted to women too, but recently I discovered that I absolutely don’t care what’s going on between the legs of a person that I think is attractive. So, that’s cool and I’m happy about it. But there’s something going on in my head for quite a while that makes me feel uncomfortable and like there’s something wrong with me. Me and my boyfriend are together for almost two years now and I absolutely LOVE him, like I want to grow old with him and just spent the rest of my life with that wonderful person and I can say he loves me as much. Well I guess that’s the jackpot right? But somehow my brain does crazy things. Like I mentioned before I’m also attracted to women but I never made experience with that besides from making out with a few females. And I can’t stop thinking about it. Like I have that strange desire to have a romantic relationship with another woman. I want more than a friendship, but like less than the relationship I have with my boyfriend? I don’t know how to describe that feeling. I also experienced having crushes on other people and wanting to go deeper than a “regular” friendship but still having a stronger bond with my boyfriend. Whenever that happened I tried to suppress these feelings and told nobody about it. I would never ever cheat on my boyfriend but I honestly don’t think there’s a way of exploring those fantasies. My boyfriend is very „jealousy“. He’s not putting me in a cage or something, I can do(almost) whatever I want and he trusts me but because of his insecurities he’s constantly worried too. I thought about telling him, asking him if a polyamorous relationship is possible but I’m way too scared because I don’t want to hurt his feelings and it definitely will. So here I am, telling strangers on the internet what’s going on in my head and hoping, that anybody will respond to my way too long post. Does anybody experience the same feelings/the same situation or just have some advice? Please be kind. Have a nice day. Thank you.",lgbt
Society and Gender,,lgbt
The Trump administration reportedly wants the government to revoke civil rights protections from transgender people,,lgbt
Time to kms,,lgbt
Seriously. Fuck Trump.,,lgbt
Iowa City high school celebrates gender-neutral homecoming court,,lgbt
First time dressing up!,,lgbt
Yall I aint trynna make fun of anyone for not knowing of polysexuality just laughin that what I thought was gonna happen happened so soon,,lgbt
Falling more in love everyday,,lgbt
After almost a year on HRT I came out as trans to everyone on Facebook. It's funny watching the friends number drop.,,lgbt
To my fellow trans family in America,"You exist, you always will exist, and no group of rich, white, stupid and sexully repressed morons are ever going to change that, trump wanted a war, he got one, he just didn't expect to be on the losing side, the world outside stands with you, and your allies within shall Support you, never stop fighting, take all the hate and rage and anger and use it.

",lgbt
On The Guardian's Transphobic Centrism,,lgbt
Trump Administration Eyes Defining Transgender Out of Existence,,lgbt
How to even begin with electrolysis?,"So I'm interested in exploring electrolysis as I've already sampled Laser removal...

I have less than no idea where to start for what to look for etc.
I'm in DC, so if anyone happens to specifically have a recommendation locally, I'd be thrilled!

I have especially dark, course hair and fairly light south Euro skin.
Targeting face and neck.",lgbt
"Hi friends, I am hoping to get the perspectives of as many LGBTQ people as I can","Hello reddit,

Long story short, I am a straight, cis-gender female and I try as hard as I can to be a good ally to the LGBTQ+ communities. I was talking to a friend of mine about how we wish there were more young adult literature for LGBTQ+ youth (similar to books like Simon vs. the Homosapien's Agenda), and my friend suggested I write one, as I write all the time for fun. I thought this was a great idea, but I wanted to make sure I got as many opinions as possible from LGBTQ+ individuals to ensure that I am not overstepping anything, speaking over people, etc. 

In that light, my friend and I created a survey that I am using to attempt to make sure my information is correct. I have posted the link [here](https://docs.google.com/forms/d/e/1FAIpQLSfN1RqKXQR1vJ5zbBpVUFXki87gg7T-o71ip5yFUlFraz9daQ/viewform?usp=sf_link) \- I am really sorry if this kind of post is not welcome here, but I love reddit and have been able to get a wide range of viewpoints from people on here for my work before, and so I was hoping that some of you would be interested in taking this survey. 

Thank you so much for your time!",lgbt
♥️🧡💛💚💙💜,,lgbt
Trump Trying To Define Transgender Americans Out Of Existence,,lgbt
Trump Administration Eyes Defining Transgender Out of Existence,,lgbt
Trans Man! 1 year and still looking for my beard. :) Life is getting to be so much better. Looking to meet a special girl to share this journey called life with.,,lgbt
"It's Sunday, nobody's home, time for a full face of make-up (mtf trans girl)",,lgbt
"For all of us living in the US, we need to come together to fight this. This adminstration is openly attacking our community.",,lgbt
"Chipman, NB, Canada is flying a straight pride flag.....",,lgbt
Spread love!!!,,lgbt
How to meet other LGBT people my age?,Any advice for me on how to meet other gay people my age and how to ask them out? ,lgbt
Your Complacency Will Kill Trans People,,lgbt
coming out as bi after coming out as a lesbian,i need advice on re coming out as bi after already coming out as a lesbian.. have any of you guys had to do this ? and if so can you just give me advice and insight on how you felt and your experience. I have came out as a lesbian a few years ago but for the past year or so i’m not so sure if that label suits me anymore and i’ve never been with a man before i’ve only ever been with women but i feel like if i were to come out as bi my family would try to erase my feelings towards woman because there are some people in my family who already try to do that and i’m just confused on my feelings and really need some advice ,lgbt
Wha'ts the difference between being transexual and being transgender?,"I'm not transphobic in anyway, I'm just trying to be educated.

&amp;#x200B;

Thanks!",lgbt
Laverne Cox Responds To Possible Trump Anti-Transgender Move: 'I Choose Love Not Fear',,lgbt
I am tired,"It's been a while since i actually talked to anyone about this. 
I am a transgender mtf girl from the middle east
I am in the closet,  very deep in the closet
No one knows about my story except my wife, and 2 friends,  knowing that one of them has cut ties with me. 
I live in fear,  and i am very paranoid. 
There is a war inside me,  between the dire need to express myself,  and the extreme panic i get whenever someone suspect who i really am. 
I am saving up to leave my country ASAP. 
I even applied for the DIV program (the american citizenship lottery). 
Sadly i know how hard could it be to actually win the lottery,  and i am not making enough many to travel any soon. 
The fear of losing everything and get killed is really ugly,  as i know no one could actually mourn me!  They will just say a sinner has passed away after receiving his deserved punishment. 
I hate the suit i have to wear everyday to work, and having to wear heavy clothes even in summer just to hide that i am shaving, 
And being teased just for acting a little girly or being a bit shy. 
Lately i became very alcoholic person!  Luckily alcohol is legal to buy where i live,  eventhough it's illegal to drink publicly. 
My greatest wish,  is just to feel like myself,  is that very huge to have?!. 
I just want tp scream heeeeey!!  I am a girl!!!!  Get me out!!. 
But those bastard with their fairy tails wont let me survive afterwards. 
I wish lgbt communities will give more attention to gays and transgender in muslim countries,  they suffer daily,  with every breath coming out. 
I dont mind dying,  i am exhausted already,  i just wanna be remembered as a good person earning his living and would never harm anyone!  Not as a devil and criminal. 
I just love everybody,  why cant everybody loves me back?! ",lgbt
Joseph S Johnson,,lgbt
On today's news: We are forever stronger together,"Many of you probably saw this article today: [https://www.nytimes.com/2018/10/21/us/politics/transgender-trump-administration-sex-definition.html](https://www.nytimes.com/2018/10/21/us/politics/transgender-trump-administration-sex-definition.html) . It's scary to think about, but I want y'all to remember the love represented by this sub. These actions by few do not speak for the all the amazing positivity, tenacity and representation out there. Seeing the outpour of support and resistance shows how strong our community is. We will continue to fight for our rights and to be seen, heard, respected as we want and need to be seen, heard and respected. We will not be erased.❤️",lgbt
So my mom sent me this today help,,lgbt
Celebrating 7 months on hormones today! Slowly building self confidence.,,lgbt
"Bought a new dress today 😊 (22, 11 months HRT)",,lgbt
20/10 is my country's women's day. I crossdressed out and enjoyed myself. Even got a cotton candy as gift as well,,lgbt
We took my stepson to the library to get a new bedtime book and look what we found! He loved it!,,lgbt
Getting to try a crop top on for the first time in my life was an unforgettably amazing feeling 🌸,,lgbt
"NYT: Draft Trump Admin Memo Narrowly Defines Gender, Uses Genetic Testing",,lgbt
Trump Administration Eyes Defining Transgender Out of Existence,,lgbt
Have never dated anyone before. Sort of like three different guys. Nervous and confused... what do I do?,"Hey all, high school guy here. In a bit of a pickle and want to vent a bit. Is it normal to have a crush on more than one guy, and how do I deal with it? 

I sort of like a few different people right now, but I’m not sure who to focus on because they’re most likely straight statistically speaking. In addition to that, I feel like they’re all kinda out of my league because I’m a huge band nerd. I sort of like this lacrosse player, we were at a party together for my other friend’s birthday, and my friend was like “hey (name) can you carry up the snacks? And (name) can you carry the blankets up? And (me) can you carry my laptop up?” And I was like jokingly like “haha guys someone needs to carry me up too haha” and this guy just swoops in like “I’ve got you” and carries me up the stairs and is like “all those deadlifts from training really came in handy”

Like
Why would this guy I’ve only known for a couple hours before this just do that 

Sometimes in school I say hi to him and he says sup back, but maybe he forgot my name or something...? Sometimes I’ve noticed he’ll steal a glance but I’m pretty sure it’s just coincidental. I’ve got him on Snapchat now, but I’m not sure how to hang out with him again because we don’t have any classes and only have a mutual friend. 

Then, a friend of mine in band I kind of like too. I accidentally came out to him when we all went bowling one night, so at least he knows, and he was like “hey want to see a cool Snapchat hack lol” and took my phone and added himself and was like “WOAH HAHA COOL HUH” and asked me last night if I was going to homecoming today. He invited me to come but didn’t specify who else he invited. He just went, “I’m sure there will be other band kids there”, so...? He’s been friendly, but I never really notice any signs from him and don’t know what to do. 

Finally, there’s this one guy that I think might be showing some signs to me. He’s really chatty to everyone else, but whenever I would try talking to him about whatever, he’d give short two word answers or whatever. Lately he’s been kinda touching me lately, not in a weird way, but like a “hey man” and a touch on the shoulder or whatever. On the band field during practice I notice him looking sometimes and he always seems to laugh at jokes I’ll tell someone next to me as if he was listening for it. Before our football game last night, I was setting up the drum line stands in the bleachers, and I notice him, for some reason, on his phone at the wall near the door kinda looking my way, and when I came over he asked if he could help in anyway. He’s been trying to talk to me more lately, but idk.

Problem is, I kind of like all three of these guys, but not completely yet. I want to just be friends with them first and try to get to know them better, but what should I do? What does anything mean? Help. Thanks!",lgbt
Loosing hope,"Hey y'all,

Im really starting to loose hope. I lost my new job, my plans to move fell apart, I got cheated on, I learned of my parents homophobia and that it's only getting worse. I went on a date with the most promising guy I meet in a while, and things arent going well. 

As I type this, tears rush down my face and a lump in my throat only gets bigger. I'm really losing hope, and  Im loosing sight of the light at the end of the tunnel.

I dont know what to do. I dont know where to go. Im really really just unable to cope anymore. My freinds live so far away, and they just dont understand and really fail to understand. ",lgbt
Can the Trump Administration Retroactively Reverse Birth Certificate Changes?,"This is a real question, can the Trump administratively retroactively revoke gender changes that have already occurred under previous administrations? When the explicit guidelines of the federal government said that the changes could be made once specific criteria (that have varied over time) were met. I want to know whether Ex Post De Facto law would prevent such a radical shift. As what I have read to believe, seems to indicate that Congress would likely have to approve such a change too. It could not just be the work of the administration as well.

P.S. I realize I should have wrote document changes not ""birth certificate"". Since only states can issue such documents. But still, the question stands for passports and social security cards

&amp;#x200B;

[https://www.nytimes.com/2018/10/21/us/politics/transgender-trump-administration-sex-definition.html](https://www.nytimes.com/2018/10/21/us/politics/transgender-trump-administration-sex-definition.html)",lgbt
A reason to vote | Religious Extremists Got Their Justice. Now They're Going To Strip LGBTQ Rights.,,lgbt
Trump Administration Eyes Defining Transgender Out of Existence,,lgbt
Religious Extremists Got Their Supreme Court Justice. Now They're Going To Strip LGBTQ Rights.,,lgbt
"Building a Lifeline — For queer and trans prisoners who have lost familial safety nets due to abuse, neglect, or rejection, the alternative support networks created by other queer people can be life-saving.",,lgbt
oct. 27th is the day - 17 ftm bi,"Edit: I decided to give myself until February to get better. I want to try again. Thanks for the messages. &lt;3

i was already suicidal. have been for a really long time...
but looks like trump is making life even worse. i never get a break, right?
i have it planned. i know what's going to happen. i'll be gone finally.
and i guess his entire administration will be even happier. 
i don't care anymore. this was just another sign that i'm making the right choice.

i mean...my life was going to go to shit in a few months anyway. my life as i know it would just disappear  because i just had to be different in a way that everyone decided isn't okay. at least my parents won't have to tell anyone that they had a freak as a child.
i fucking hate myself. 
",lgbt
Trump administration trying to define transgender out of existence,,lgbt
"22, 5 months HRT. I feel like I'm doing pretty good for 5 months in",,lgbt
"I made a subreddit for my favorite podcast. it's r/GenderRebels, to talk about and discuss The Gender Rebels, a podcast by a trans woman and cis female partner. Come join us!",,lgbt
We've all been Smithers at one point or another.,,lgbt
Uruguayan Congress Approves Comprehensive Law For Trans People,,lgbt
Are straight cis people allowed at pride?,I’m straight and my queer friends invited my to pride with them. Is it offensive for me to attend? I may be straight but I support this community 100%.,lgbt
Feeling free as myself finally. Believe in yourself,,lgbt
LGBTQ groups to rally in response to NYT report on Trump's gender policy proposal,,lgbt
"they're coming for our rights again, and im terrified. older queers, how did you get through this?","I'm sure a lot of you have seen the news about the Trump administration rolling back a load of protections for trans people. I stand to potentially lose access to HRT, as my insurance is federal. I feel utterly helpless and like this is totally out of my control. obviously, I don't want that to be the case so what the hell can we do? how do we emotionally deal with this? ",lgbt
"Guys I’m super excited, I’m going on my first date which is also my first same sex date!!!",,lgbt
How'd you realise you were gay or bi?,"Personally, I met someone in the military who kind of always looked at me in a special way. And after two months not meeting or having no contact at all, it happened waaay too fast for me to comprehend; we first started texted for a little while, met two or three times and BOOM we were together. I was so confused afterwards that I questioned myself a lot like ""what the fuck just happened? Am I actually bi?"" I guess if you meet that really special guy, it all just falls into place doesn't it? Well, what about yourself?   ",lgbt
Your daily dose of ignorance,[https://imgur.com/a/9o7qpaz](https://imgur.com/a/9o7qpaz),lgbt
"Another day, another transphobic post on the front page of Reddit. The top comments are all attacking transgender rights.",,lgbt
How can I come out to my parents?,"Hey yall,
I'm a 17-year-old gray-pansexual and I kind of really want to come out to my parents.
I don't want to make a big deal out of it, though. 'Cause I think no one should really care about my sexuality and I just hate being in the middle of all the attention.
So I am like, how do I come out?
I once told my parents at a restaurant that I don't care what people are as long as their personality as a way to come out 'cause we were talking about me and boyfriends but they didn't got the hint that I maybe am not as straight as they think.
I also don't try to hide it. I never even told my parents I was straight. I talk about relationships as ""partner"" or they/them.
So what do I do?

Most of my friends know, though. My parents just don't. ",lgbt
Texas - early voting begins tomorrow 10/22 and runs through 11/2! Helpful links within,"Hopefully you are registered to vote (deadline was October 9th)

Check your voter registration: https://www.vote.org/am-i-registered-to-vote/

Polling place locator: https://www.vote.org/polling-place-locator/

This page has a list of candidates (scroll down): https://apps.texastribune.org/features/2018/texas-midterm-election-ballot-tool/

To generate your personalized ballot, take this quiz: http://www.isidewith.com",lgbt
"Nearly 2 years ago she confessed her feelings for me, not knowing I felt the same. Today marks 1 year of us living together. The love of my life was In front of me the whole time 🏳️‍🌈❤️",,lgbt
"My dad knows I'm gay, but still tells me homophobic stuff he said. Why?","I'm pretty close to my dad, but sometimes he'll just cheerfully tell me the homophobic stuff he said to other people. This time he was talking about a passenger that he picked up and how he told the passenger that being gay is a mental illness. I really don't understand why he brings this up when he knows that I'm gay, or at least that I am very anti-homophobia. Is he trying to convince me not to be gay? Is he trying to start a discussion about lgbt issues? If you've any experiences similar to this, please help me out. ",lgbt
I ran out of birth control and my cramps and pmdd are making me miserable,"I'm FtM trans; on top of that, I have PMDD and extreme cramps when my period finally hits. Which it did yesterday.     

(Which also explains my ""random"" depression last week.) 

I moved state a couple months ago and it's taking longer than expected to get my Social Security Disability shit sorted out, so I technically don't have insurance since that aspect of disability is a state by state basis.   

:)))    

Fuck. Being. Female. ",lgbt
Walked in on my younger bro and his friend kissing,"Hi, I'm 15M and my younger brother is 11.

Really sorry if this is the wrong place to post.

Just to clear things up I'm in no way against being gay etc. Me and my brother are very close he still sleeps in my bed when he's scared n' stuff and he is my little brother so of course I'm supportive of him.
I'm mainly making this post because I don't know what I should do...
So first let me say that our parents are extremely homophobic (like the majority of parents are) they always have to voice their disgust with a 20 minute lecture on how ""gross and ""wrong"" it is anytime we're watching a show and there's a gay kiss scene or something. me and my brother have always just ignored it (I just see it as it's none of my business) 

A few days ago bro brought his friend over ( he's 12, and they've been friends since 2nd-3rd grade. Me and him are also really close he's kind of like a 2nd little brother to me he's a great kid, I also happen to know that his parents share the same views toward being gay as mine. I'm Just gonna call him Pikachu to make it easier lol) 

They went up to bro's room which was perfectly normal. A few hours later mom asked me to ask them what they wanted for dinner (ordering Chinese) so I went up stairs to ask and anyway when I went in to bro's room Pikachu and bro were sitting on his bed holding hands and kissing. I did scream a little (well not really scream but I can't think of a better word) because it came as a shock, which startled them I think. Immediately bro started crying and pikachu was clearly a nervous wreck and also looked as if he was going to cry, so I just went in and closed the door. I was trying to calm down bro by hugging him and telling him it's ok but he was terrified that they'd find out. Pikachu grabbed his stuff and was out the door despite me asking him to please wait because I was afraid mom and dad who were down stairs and would notice him bolting down the stairs and out the door would figure out something was up. I was trying my best to calm bro down who was clinging on to me and shaking like crazy he kept saying ""that mom was gonna kick him out"" and then to make things worse dad came into the room which made bro cry even more. Dad started asking questions what was going on and if Pikachu did something, I just told him that they got into a fight which he didn't seem to buy at first but I think he definitely thinks that now (overheard mom and dad gossiping) so that was the end of that for now, Later on me and bro talked and of course I told him it was fine to be gay and that I wouldn't let mom kick him out (I don't think she'd actually do that, at least I'd like to hope so) he was still really upset and cried a few times mainly because Pikachu wouldn't text him back, I tried calling him once to make sure he was ok and got home safe but he didn't answer.

Fast forward to today, Pikachu won't talk to bro and bro's a mess, he's really upset and he's been crying on and off because he's extreamly shy and gets really nervous around people, and pikachu is the only friend he's ever had not to mention they're best friends, they do everything together, they play games together, sleepovers all that stuff and I feel like absolute trash because I feel like i destroyed their relationship. I tried texting him a few times telling him that it was ok and I'm not gonna tell anyone but he won't respond at all.
I really don't want bro to lose him as a friend, He was really good for bro he was a great friend so once again I feel miserable having ruined it all and I can't seem to do anything to fix it and it's driving me crazy. So does anyone have any advice on how to fix this? Literally anything would be great.",lgbt
DON'T TALK TO ME - PETEY PLASTIC Lgbt rap,,lgbt
Debating on coming out,"I’m a bisexual freshman in high school. As of now, three people know about this: my brother, my ex, and a friend I don’t talk to anymore. My parents are accepting, but they don’t want it in their family. As of now, I just kind of tell people who I trust significantly, but that just feels wrong. Should I make it public?",lgbt
New program aims to welcome LGBT travelers to New Orleans,,lgbt
Needs more gay,,lgbt
So I have a predicament,"I think I'm bi, though I'm not in any way sure. My friends are great, but they've noticed how stereotypically gay/feminine I act, and I keep getting asked about my sexuality. I've told them that I'm straight. The problem is that I'm not sure about my sexuality, so if I were to tell them that I'm bi and decide I'm not later, that might be strange. That coupled with the fact that they think I'm straight. Can I get some help?",lgbt
Am I too picky and how do I start to find a boyfriend?,"I really wanna get a boyfriend, but I can’t use dating apps because I’m not 18 yet and I only know like 3 openly gay people. At this point I have no idea how to start looking for a boyfriend, and I’m starting to think that my dating preferences are making it more difficult.

My preferences are
• 14-16 year olds
•Chubby 
•Taller than me (at least 5’9)
•Lives in the DMV
•Shares similar hobbies as me (Drawing,Cooking,Playing games, stuff like that)

Would these preferences make it harder for me to find a date or are they okay, and how do I start looking for other gay guys near me?",lgbt
Help with a friend?,"Hey, everybody.

A long term friend of mine came out as a MTF transwoman a year or so ago. They don't present as a woman 24/7, but that is the eventual goal. 

I'm wondering what books, videos, or articles I can read in order to be a more helpful and loving friend. I have no local resources or groups to work with or contact as I'm from a very deeply red rural area.

Any suggestions help. Thank you!",lgbt
leaked photo of me trying to show my crushes i’m a talented bottom but they even notice me,,lgbt
The First Kiss....,"It was the second day back from winter break at my school and I was sitting on the bus with my girlfriend. “I brought your last present” she said I nervously opened the paper it read “Kiss me if you want to, because I will kiss you back” my heart stop. will I finally stop getting teased about not kissing her yet. I said “Madison” she looked at me I stared into her brown eyes and leaned in. Next thing I felt her warm lips her cherry lipstick. This is pretty much the normal teenage love story but from here it takes a turn for the worse. It was after lunch and we were heading back to class. Right before I headed out the door Madison handed me a note and ran out of the class room.”I am sorry and I love you but I am dealing with stuff and don’t want a boyfriend right now” that was the biggest lie of my life I did some digging and after a month I realized what happened. She was getting bullied for dating me and I’m not the cutest person but still. We have just started talking again as friends and are breakup happened 9 months ago....",lgbt
Religious Extremists Got Their Justice. Now They're Going To Strip LGBTQ Rights,,lgbt
Truvada and the truth: is HIV prevention propelling the STI epidemic?,,lgbt
Honolulu Pride 2018,,lgbt
Looking for friends,"If I shouldn’t post this here I’m so sorry, I’m a bisexual girl (17 years old) I would like to make some new friends, lately I have been feeling a little bit lonely that’s why I decided to post here ",lgbt
Bought a new shirt &amp; moto leggings. Anxious waiting for my gf to arrive 🙂,,lgbt
What's the motivation behind identifying as queer? What's the political endgame?,"Hi, I'm curious about the whole queer thing, what it means and whether I should support it or not. In a way I could see identifying as queer (as a gay guy) as partially going back into the closet. Queer doesn't give people the information they'd like to know, that I'm a man attracted to other men. On the other hand, what do I really have in common with other sections of the gay community apart from being grouped together for oppression? I mean, as a masculine acting guy attracted only to typical 'twinks' I often feel alienated from other gay men when discussing attraction. Men who don't match the narrow segment of people I'm attracted to may as well be women to me, so being grouped with other men just because I'm attracted to 'men' is in a sense extremely arbitrary.

This is all very confusing, so I'd appreciate if someone could explain 'queer' to me. Thanks",lgbt
These pictures are taken four years apart. This is what happiness looks like. 💘✨,,lgbt
Figured y’all would love my rainbow flannel as much as r/actuallesbians,,lgbt
I can’t see my neighbour the same way since he kicked out his son for being gay,"It happened a while ago and I never even met his son, but since I found out he did this it’s hard for me to have any respect for him.
I’m all for LGBT, and I am bisexual myself, so it’s really hard to be in the same room as him",lgbt
If this ain't accurate,,lgbt
I’m so fucking tired of defending my identity,"I didn’t ask for my identity to be politicized. I didn’t ask to be assigned the wrong gender. I didn’t ask to know, in my heart of hearts, that I was meant to be a woman. I didn’t ask for any of this fucking shit. I didn’t ask for dysphoria, or the depression that comes with it, or the fucking way just looking in the mirror can make me want to hurt myself. 

I just. I am *so tired* of people concern trolling about trans people.

“I only *care* about trans people. You transgenders commit so much more suicide than the average population; you’re clearly just in need of help, and you need to not be encouraged to be transgender!”

That’s the argument that kills me the most. Not the people who just admit they hate me, or openly deny that I am who I say I am. No, it’s people who pretend to care to mask their transphobia. 

And it’s horse shit. 

I can provide all the research, all the studies. Every piece we’ve got. The consensus of every medical association, the WHO, the APA — does it matter?

Of course it doesn’t. 

I tire myself trying to defend my identity. 

Trying to prove I am who I say am. That who I am is real. 

I am *so fucking tired*. 

I just want to be me. I have enough to worry about and I don’t understand why I have to deal with these people on top of my own personal journey. 

I just want this shit to end. ",lgbt
"In your opinion, what are the worst crimes done against lgbt people?","I'm doing a school project about violence and discrimination against lgbt people throughout history, and i would appreciate some help. Stuff like that are not that easy to dig out sometimes especially when it comes to violence against trans people or lesbians. 

Thanks in advance!

",lgbt
Soooooo.....HELP,"I, soo, I have been going by the name James for awhile and it's not my original name and there is this guy and we have been dating for a while now and I don't know how to tell him.
I am ""female"" sadly, but I don't know what to do.

 ",lgbt
"I'm (15f) in love with lesbian best friend (14f), but I dont think she intrested","For some context, I'm a bi (mostly towards women thou) and also recently came out to my family. So this girl I've been friends with since 6th grade, and let's call her Q for simplicity's sake. Back in 7th grade I realized I liked women and in early 8th grade Q realized she was a lesbian. We are now both in 9th grade and I realized I developed feeling for her. I then told our mutual friend, let's call her W, about this, I then asked her if she could find out if there was ever a chance of Q liking me back.

 Yesterday at a carnival, P asked Q if she ever thought of dating me and P responded saying she didn't think our personalities would work out if we were dating. She's pretty calm and collective, ie the mom friend, while I'm a lot more spontaneous and excitable. Although, I'm very shy around everyone else. What do I do in this situation, as I'm agarid even if I did tell her it might make things too weird for us.

Tl;dr: I'm in love with my friend but I think she doesn't like me back.",lgbt
My girlfriend (bi) and I (pan) had this wonderful moment last night.,,lgbt
What song do to connect with?,"Hi everyone!

I'm just curious, but what song is your favorite relating to your experience? 

Be it coming out, non-binary life, your favorite alt-gender cover, your favorite main stream, your most relatable gay anthem, the song that you think is important to lgbtqia++ culture, the song that helps you cope in the closet?

Single answers or a list! Feed me songs! I'm very curious to hear them all!

",lgbt
Came out as a lesbian today.,"I am an 18 year old that came out as a lesbian with open and loving arms from my friends and family. Today is the first day to the rest of my new life of finally getting to feel like myself.

https://i.redd.it/vo01831u7gt11.jpg",lgbt
Last night my girlfriend did my makeup and I felt better about my appearance than I ever have before!,,lgbt
(UPDATE) Transphobic friend's response to finding out i'm trans,"[(Update to this thread)](https://www.reddit.com/r/lgbt/comments/9p3jv1/transphobic_friends_response_to_finding_out_im/)

I finally got to come out to my friend properly, I went to his place yesterday to talk. He was very accepting, he asked me what I wanted and what I am, I told him my whole story, how i'm FTM etc. He asked about my sexuality, I explained that I still like guys. 

He put it together in his head and said ""Oh so you're a guy and you like guys? So you'd date gay guys? Gay guys seem nice, i've never met a gay guy before but they seem.....nice"". It seems like he was just trying to be positive about my dating life. And so I said ""Hi, nice to meet you. Now you *have* met a gay guy."" And he laughed. 

He fist bumped me and told me that's what guys do, I asked him to teach me the ""guy handshake"" because I never knew how to do it. He taught me and we practiced a few times till I perfected it. I honestly wanted to cry after that.

The message here is, if you're worried about coming out to someone who you think won't be accepting, you would be surprised! The people I most feared coming out to were the easiest and most accepting. The ones I thought would understand it best are the ones who outed me to multiple people and that's not supportive, as much as they say they're supportive. ",lgbt
Can a lesbian be attracted to a non-binary femme ?,"I identify as a lesbian, as I usually only feel attraction towards people identifying as women, yet lately I found myself having a kinda strong crush on someone identifying as non-binary, can I still really use the label of lesbian ? Because I feel as lesbianism really is a pat of my identity, but I can't ignoree those feelings towards them",lgbt
Atlanta Teachers!,"Hey everyone! My girlfriend is a teacher and we’re moving to Atlanta. I know the state of Georgia doesn’t protect lgbt employees from discrimination, but I know Atlanta is much more progressive. Will she be okay teaching there?  ",lgbt
Uruguay approved a law for transgender people.,,lgbt
HOW GAY AM I? (ft LAUREN JAUREGUI &amp; ALLY HILLS),,lgbt
STORY TIME | I RAN INTO MY EX GIRLFRIEND!?!? (LGBTQ EDITION),,lgbt
"Queer people, talk to us in a common language",,lgbt
Now people are complaining that straight actors can't play lgbt roles...they are ACTORS for a reason and il take any lgbt representation in Hollywood that I can get! grr,,lgbt
Can i be you? Thanks,,lgbt
Best friend did my make up and I felt amazing about myself for once 😍 (Trans MtF pre-everything),,lgbt
"I [FtM 25] am applying to professional jobs. I don't pass, but I have been trying. I haven't got a job offer, and I feel it's because of my appearance. What do I do?","Over the past two years I \[FtM 25\] have been applying to professional jobs in administration, content writing, and business fields. I have not received a job offer, and I feel like my attempt at passing in interviews is affecting my ability to secure a long-term job.

I have feminine business professional clothing, and plenty of experience to secure a job in these fields, especially after two years of constantly applying for jobs. I have a great resume. I have long, but relatively well-kept hair, and excellent hygiene. I have not started HRT, and have not had any surgery, and I don't plan to for awhile.

I feel like my gender identity is getting in the way of my employment opportunities. What can I do to mitigate that effect? When I asked my father (who doesn't understand or acknowledge my gender identity) for advice, he told me that it has no place in the business world. It hurt to hear that, but after so few call-backs, over two years of constantly applying for jobs, I get the sinking feeling that he isn't wrong.

My view is that it's not going to get better, and that the best course of action would be to stop trying to pass and go back into the closet for my professional life. Cut my hair short. Wear masculine clothing. Present as a straight-white-male, and utilize that privilege to secure a long-term position where I could become successful.

I have a job interview on Wednesday, for a job that I think could kick-start my career.  I don't want to go back into the closet, but if it means securing a position that will let me put away money to support a family, I will.

I am thankful for any thoughts this community could provide. I don't know what to do.",lgbt
lived my best gay life last night 💞💓,,lgbt
"Saw this tweet, and I'm still looking for something more relatable 🌈",,lgbt
“Gender Reveal” parties need to stop,"I’m referring to expecting parents throwing parties where they assign a gender to their unborn kid based on genitalia.

I think it further pushes gender expectations and trans erasure. If it’s a “boy” the family talks about how they’re going to teach the kid this sport or that sport, or how they’ll be strong like their father 🙄. 

I know people don’t mean bad by it but even if it were a “sex” reveal people would prepare gender-based expectations on the baby.",lgbt
I’m pansexual and I don’t care who cares anymore,"I posted in r/pansexual but I wanted to post here because it just feels too good to say and I thought at least a few of you might appreciate it. I’m done hiding my sexuality from people. I’m 23M almost going on 24 and I’ve been in the closet to just about everyone since I was roughly 14. It’s taken it’s toll on me and definitely fed into my depression. After talking with my mom, I’ve realized it’s time to stop hiding who I am. Either people will accept me or they won’t. I’ve already told my two closest friends here at vet school and they immediately responded with love and support for me. It was such a boost and I’m really feeling confident about finally putting myself out there.",lgbt
Transphobia on the front page with over 2k upvotes. I am shocked. How did we allow this to happen?,,lgbt
Help me. I don't know what to say,"First of all, english is my second language so it is gonna be a bit rough. If there is something wrong with my english, help me with it pls &lt;3

&amp;#x200B;

I have a friend who just sent a message to a group we have (4 people) at 8:30 AM saying something like this

&amp;#x200B;

""I have something to say""

&amp;#x200B;

""(name here) you already know this""

&amp;#x200B;

And then he sent a picture of a girl coming out of a boy costume. It's clearly his own way of saying ""I'm trans"", I have no problem with that, my problem comes just here. I already knew, the friend that knew, told me like one week ago, and I already had deep suspicions that something was going on. The thing is I don't know what to say to him at all, I as a person always stay away from the ""default reply"" to things, and as he knows me, he WILL notice if I say something that's out of my ""character"", and he would probably get sad if he noticed.

&amp;#x200B;

I feel like it would be insensitive to just send a ""I can help with whatever you want!"" reply, there would be no ""me"" in that reply, it would be just a reply, it would be empty(?

&amp;#x200B;

With the way he said it I don't know if he's expecting a reaction, or if he just said it and that's it.

&amp;#x200B;

He's super depressive, and I don't want him to get sad because of me, he took a gigantic amount of courage to tell me this, so I want to say something, but I don't know what to say while staying away from the responses like ""Yeah! You go!"" ""Don't worry we are here"". I want to convey that feeling, but not with those typical words as he will notice I hesitated when writing the response.

&amp;#x200B;

I haven't sleeped at all the last two days, so my ability to create witty-half-serious-half-joking-full-honest responses is totally fucked, all I need is inspiration.

&amp;#x200B;

I'm just a socially awkward teen who didn't have any friends until 8 months ago, this is just too much for me to handle alone :(

&amp;#x200B;

What would you say to him?

&amp;#x200B;

Should I go with the default reply and pray to god he doesn't notice?

&amp;#x200B;

If something isn't clear just ask me, I have no problem

&amp;#x200B;",lgbt
Dating apps,Any good LGBT friendly dating app recommendations??,lgbt
Gender Identity and being a Lesbian,"Hi all. I'm a 18 year old gay girl and I've been having a little bit of a problem with how I view myself lately. I don't really like being a girl. I'm very sure I'm not trans, though. I thought I might be when I was 13, and ultimately I realized I'm not. I'm very comfortable with my body, no dysphoria whatsoever. While physically I have no problem, I don't really 100% identify with being a girl. I'm not super masculine, but I'm far from traditionally feminine. I don't wear makeup. I don't care about fashion. I'm pretty straightforward. I'm not an extremely emotionally driven person. More of my friends are guys. I speak from my chest which gives me a lower voice than other girls. I absolutely hate dresses. They can all burn in a great big fire. At the same time I don't like traditionally masculine clothing much. I feel like a lot of what I just listed are stereotypes or shallow in general. Idk, I just don't feel right. My name is feminine, and it's pretty, but I much rather go by my last name. I love being at work because my nickname there is a play on my last name. 

Despite what seems to be a common disregard of labels, I find labels to be comforting in a way. I have a strict label for every part of my identity. They can change, but I don't like not knowing what to call a feeling or situation at any given moment. I've struggled trying to pin down how I feel for months, and nothing has felt right.

Anybody's input is appreciated, and thank you for reading my ramblings. :)",lgbt
Welsh Police Pride Car,,lgbt
I think my best friend is in love with me,"So my best friend identifies as straight (I’m bi)  but, I swear to you he flirts with me;
He buys me things, I am the only one who he is even remotely polite and nice too, he is very physically affectionate, he asks me hang out like he’s nervous to ask (“Do you maybe wanna go to fright night this year”), his ex-girlfriend looks like me and when he broke up with her he wanted to know if I had broken up with my girlfriend, and he never likes my significant others. 
Last year literally everyone thought we were dating
How do I show him that I’d be okay with it, like without saying it. 
I just want him to know taht I love him regardless (whether that be platonic or romantic) ",lgbt
"Former archbishop &amp; Vatican big shot has a new theory about the root cause of sex abuse in the church: the gays made us do it. Excuse me, you fucking idiot, gay folks aren't storming parishes worldwide, holding guns to priests head &amp; forcing them to rape children. Fuck off with your goddamned lies.",,lgbt
Help?,"Hey everyone I’m a bit confused. I’m a 17 year old male that so far has only liked girls and only had crushes and sorta relationships with girls. So far I’ve only been straight but lately this year, I just have had anxiety that I’m gay. And I know there isn’t a problem with it but I’ll catch myself saying stuff like “oh that guy is attractive” yet I don’t seem to want to do anything with him. However, reading gay erotica seems to turn me on, but gay porn does not. Am I just a normal teenager that gets turned on by anything? I should also add, I always desire to flirt with or do things with girls that I don’t desire with men.",lgbt
Resources for older (55+) queer folk?,"Here's my quandry. I see a lot of resources targeted to teens.  I see a lot of resources targeted to young adults (especially living in a college town). But I haven't found anything targeted to us older folks.  It's only been a few years since I realized that being queer was an option, and a very short time since I decided I really needed to be ""out"" and open.  But where do I go?  

&amp;#x200B;",lgbt
Please help me with this.,I am a cis boy and I have no idea what the fuck I am. I am sexually attracted to females and probably will be forever. But I am not sexually attracted to boys. But if a boy said he wanted to date me and I liked him enough I would. But I wouldn't have sex. I also find cute boys attractive. (Like in a lil' sweater all bundled up),lgbt
"Feeling weird, lost and empty. Parents disowned/disinherited me.","So my parents have never been cool with my homosexuality and it’s always been the cause of a lot of cut off conversations, begging, arguing, evangelism, conversion therapy, the whole nine yards. Eventually when I moved out, I walked away from so many conversations that my parents gave up and just stopped asking me. And I made no effort to remind them that I still hadn’t “changed”. It wasn’t something that overly upset me and it didn’t prevent me from having a relationship with my parents. 

Well, a few days ago my mom noticed a discreet pride tattoo that I’ve had for a few months now. We argued a bit about whether my homosexuality is my “choice” and then I left. The next morning I got a lengthy and nasty letter comparing me to an addict, and my severely alcoholic, cross dressing uncle. She made good on a threat that she has always hung over me, that she would disinherit me. I basically responded by saying that if they didn’t want to treat me like a daughter then they don’t get me as a daughter, and I would no longer be attending family events or speaking with them unless they had an emergency. My mom said something really hurtful to my only brother so now he’s angry at me too. I will be picking up some stuff and documents I had been storing at their house tonight after they are asleep. Then they won’t be contacting me anymore, which I know is best for me. 

I’ve always maintained a pretty brave, logical, indifferent attitude about my parents disapproval of me, but now it’s really sinking in and over the last few days I have felt really weird. Just empty, lost, tired. I know logically that I’m making a good move and that I haven’t done anything wrong, that my parents don’t deserve me if they can’t love me for who I am. I’ve told that stuff a billion times to others. 

Can I hear some stories of of people that have moved on and found happiness without their families? I kind of have the need to know that everything will be alright. ",lgbt
Janet wyd,,lgbt
"My ex-fiancé of three years and I reconnected recently and had been talking. I wanted to make sure we were on the same page if we decided to move forward and try again. His mind is so closed, I don’t think it’ll ever open.",,lgbt
RantCMV: most homophobic people should leave earth and move to the MOON and live there alone because they are just evil!!!!,"they should be lonely on the moon and never return to earth!!! most of them are evil and ruining gay youths like mine. literally, I spent my childhood crying because I got attacked by them every day at school when I was younger.

now I am 16 and I am stronger, I realize that they should fuck off this earth so this earth will be more beautiful. they can move to the moon, please move to moon homophobic motherfuckers!!!!

I really wish I had got a taser when I was younger so these kids could not have beaten me!!!! now I don't tase these bullies so people need to calm down. I have tased no one!!!
 ",lgbt
How do I put myself out there when fearing biphobia?,"I am 22 and female. I realized I was bisexual when I was 18 (at the end of high school). I have never been in a relationship and I just don't know where to start, especially with women. I have flirted with guys a little bit in the past but nothing ever came of it. I definitely don't know how to flirt with girls. 

One of my fears is being told ""I'm not going to be your lesbian experiment"" because I label myself as bi. I know I am interested in women, more so than men. I have had many many more girl crushes growing up, so many more than men that I sometimes question my attraction to men. I just fear being turned away from girls because of the label of my sexuality rather than who I am, especially since I am more interested in women.

So I guess I am just asking for advice from anyone who has some. I want to start putting myself out there and start dating. I just don't know how.",lgbt
Today is international Fisting Day! Learn about the history and get some beginner tips,,lgbt
Quick help needed on women’s vs men’s clothes sizes,"15 year old daughter is dating a trans boy. Homecoming is tonight. His parents don’t know he is trans or at least they don’t accept it. I told him he could drop his suit off at our house and I would bring it to the venue after he gets dropped off.
His suit is pretty piecemeal. Don’t think I could put a whole suit together for him but I need to at least get him a pair of slacks. He brought over a pair of black jeans he was going to wear that are a size 12. The shirt is a medium. How can I translate that into men’s sizes?",lgbt
LGBT PEOPLE,"What is it Trumps trying yo do?

Well instead of running around like a headless  chicken start campainging.  Come on you lot on America get off ya butts put down your make up and start doing something about it.

I live in UK i cant do very much but all of you can
So tell me WHAT ARE YOU GONNA DO?",lgbt
when theres no available gay people in your town,,lgbt
"Just a heads up to avoid the ""Popular"" tab on mobile","tl;dr Random Transphobia appears on popular via r/ unpopularopinion

I haven't seen anyone else mention this before, so sorry if this is a known thing and I'm just creating spam unintentionally.

As a warning this post will be discussing transphobia, if you'd rather not see that then stop here. Please look after yourself 💙.

If, like me, you spend any amount of time on the popular tab I'd start avoiding it if I were you. The subreddit r/ unpopularopinion has been growing in popularity and as a result the ""unpopular opinions"" are regularly ending up in the popular tab. 

This wouldn't be a problem were it not that recently some... less sensitive... posts have been making it to the popular tab via r/ unpopularopinion, the most recent one being outright transphobic, specifically claiming that transwomen aren't women and are, instead, just suffering from ""cognitive delusion"" (and a few other fun comments). I am not going to link to the post.

I happened to be idly browsing popular while making a cup of tea when that thread of joy popped up out of nowhere and, speaking as a transwoman, I feel absolutely awful about myself right now. Since unpopular opinion is still going strong I'm personally going to be avoiding popular for now, but weather you do or not is entirely up to you.",lgbt
I am the only one who finds most gay related media terrible?,"This may be a bit of a rant but hell, since a few days I have been feeling very frustrated.

Tv? Comics? Homosexual characters are just plain terrible, stereotypes, lack of basic knowledge... Oh and bisexuals don't exist but you already know that. I just have decided to ignore most. (And I know it is bad but before acepting myself actually had a better tim with them... Ignorance is never a bliss but...)

Advertising has started to show and it is terrible, not that I usually take notice of it but appart from being very bad quality, it is showing up, and I am not out the closet... Fuck targeted advertising.

Anyway, next complain is porn, there is just so small variety, I am struggling to find some of my... taste. At this point when I feel like seeing something focused on men I go to straight section. It just has more man on man stuff than the other.(At that point you know you are doing something wrong with your site)",lgbt
Finally get to be the goth girl I always knew I was (5 months HRT,,lgbt
I know this subreddit is for unpopular opinions but this really just gave me all the cringe and hate i can handle for one day. It’s just so... i don’t even have a word for it.,,lgbt
My message to this community. (Please hear me out),"Quick background: I am a straight, 36 yo Christian male. Ok, whatever, good, that is over with.

Today I was out on a run and my mind began to wonder (as it normally does). I was thinking about this small event in the Bible where a woman is publicly accused of adultery and she is about to be stoned. Then Jesus says (I am paraphrasing) The person that has never sinned may throw the first stone. Long-story-short, no one harms that lady.

I hope you are still with me.

I related this to the awful actions and verbal abuse that some/maybe even most Christians commit when talking at or about your LGBT community/lifestyle. How can they condemn you, when they are indeed sinful as well? I hope that last sentence wasn't taken out of context, too much, I am referring back to the event I with Jesus and the lady. No one on this planet is perfect. It amazes me that, to them, you are going to hell because of your ways, when the Bible says (again paraphrase) that even hating another person is equal to murder, because you have murdered them in your own heart. 

Look, this entire daydream played out while I was on a long run. And, I honestly felt the need to share it here. I just wish that I could have done a better job at explaining it. I have never been to this sub before, nor do I really pay attention to other people, in general. But I felt some need to type this.

So what?; Regardless of who you are, who you like, what you do (as long as you do not harm) I believe that you will all prosper one way or another. And I do hope that you still take time to follow faith, whatever faith that may be (I prefer Jesus. His teachings were awesome). I don't know you, but I respect you (everyone). I wish I could go on, but I think that is it. Best of luck and love to all of you. ",lgbt
"As a Lyft driver, I get this all the time",,lgbt
Chatting with a friend (bi) today and we talked about how the word queer has been taken back by the community. I told them I identified as queer as I’m still discovering my attractions and prefer it as a label. It’s also the first time I’ve told anyone that I’m queer other than my partner.,,lgbt
So today was an amazing day...,"Little background to start. I’ve been slowly transitioning my wardrobe to be more gender neutral/masculine to fit my androgynous style. I’ve collected shirts from my older brothers give away, I’ve shopped at thrift stores, I’ve cut my hair super short over all just doing all I can with my mother breathing down my neck. Well today I was at my cousins wedding and I looked absolutely fabulous in all black, and a zebra suit coat.  Well, one of my relatives I hadn’t met before walked up to our table, looked at me and said “who’s this handsome young gentlemen?” I smiled and was about to introduce myself as people irl know me because my mother was around, but my mother quickly said this is my daughter, blah blah blah so on an so forth. I thought it was very funny how quickly she had to make sure this woman knew I was in fact female. 
This comment still made me very happy. ",lgbt
I just signed up to do my first drag show... 22 year old trans woman and only been practicing drag makeup for like a week or so!!,,lgbt
I love Halloween!,"Just sharing for the sake of sharing, how amazinh it feels to be anonymous for Halloween! I am a (90%) straight male, but boy, does it feel good to have people not know your gender. I dressed in all black clothes, with black socks, (slightly feminine) shoes, pants, shirt, gloves, robe, and one-way black mask, and didn't speak so nobody heard my voice. (This was a Halloween event by the way) It really warmed my heart to see how many people corrected their friends when they referred to me as ""he"" or ""she"", pointing out that I might be the other one, and one person went so far as to consider the fact that I migjt be agender. This just really warmed my heart.",lgbt
I see it’s hard to be gay in Galveston 💔,,lgbt
Just realised something,There's a whole fucking subreddit called r/anti_LGBT WTF i has no idea there we're such Groups un reddit thankfully it only has 31 followers,lgbt
I'm happy,Its LGBTQ spirit day😊😊,lgbt
"If there were to be a traditional gift to people who come out, what would you want it to be??","I love the idea of celebrating coming out. Not just on the day for it but just anytime someone comes out to someone else.

I’m bi and very LGBTQA supportive. So if someone I loved came out to me I’d love to get them a present that means something.

I imagine in my head putting a flower wreath around them Hawaiian style lol! Idk, I just think there’s an opportunity for us to come up with a new, beautiful, meaningful tradition!

What would you want to be given? How would you like to celebrate?",lgbt
Not sure what I'm experiencing...[17M],"Throwaway warning:

Essentially, I have a friend who I talk to everyday and I have known him for 2 years but I feel as if we've been friends for much longer. We became friends on his first day and we have been quite close. He is genuinely the kindest, smartest and funniest guy I know.  He has the exact same interests as me and never fails to make me happier when I'm down. However,  a few weeks ago I began to have dreams of us...together I guess. Nothing sexual however we would often be smiling and holding hands. I had one dream where he died and I collapsed from sadness however I woke up quickly from that one. I've trying to ignore this for a while as I'm afraid of what this means considering I've been pretty straight for my entire life. I think I have fallen for him.",lgbt
"Hey Reddit! Im gay, ask me anything!","Bored and feelin to answer some questions! :)
",lgbt
I [mostly straight male] am falling in love with a lesbian girl. Please help! (UPDATE),"Edit: Throwaway being thrown away, thanks for the comments.",lgbt
"I (high school age, ""straight"" male) Think I am falling in love with a lesbian(?) girl. (PLEASE HELP!!!)","Edit: Throwaway being thrown away, thanks for the comments.",lgbt
Houston library sued by anti-gay activists over Drag Queen Story Hour,,lgbt
I officially lost my best friend tonight,"I don't even know where to begin with this.... I guess I just have to clear my head, and get everything out y'know....

Since I've started transitioning, most of my friends have started distancing themselves from me, starting about 6 months ago. And although it hurt, it was something I were willing to sacrifice to be myself. With one exception. A friend of mine that I'd known since kindergarten, who I'd always seen as family to me, going as far as practically being a sibling to. Him and his girlfriend where that exception, that I didn't ever want to lose. But they had started the distancing along with most of my other friends... And although I had written it off as them being busy with life, I didn't have myself entirely convinced. What generally bothered me the most about my friends distancing themselves from me, where the fact that most of them knew that I were trans wayyy before I even came out publicly, let alone started physically and socially transitioning. Yet, they hadn't started distancing themselves from me, until I were actively proceeding to chase my dream, and to live my authentic life.

Well, I guess this leads me to tonight..

Tonight when I opened Snapchat to add a girl I'd recently matched with on Tinder, I realized that his girlfriend's story had recently been updated tonight. And low and behold... They were currently throwing a Halloween themed housewarming party in their new apartment, which I'd yet to even see. And it was of course for all of the usual suspects that would be at their very frequent parties, which I'd always been invited to religiously. And as I saw this, something clicked in my mind. They hadn't been able to throw any parties over the last 6 months. Always some excuse when I asked about why, but now here they were throwing a party, that I hadn't been invited to or even heard mentions off, in our very brief and to the conversation ending point, conversations of the past months. If they threw this party, who's to say they haven't thrown others?

It was heartbreaking for me to realize, that I'd probably have to admit defeat... Not only had I lost most of my friends, but I'd also lost the two only people I saw as family, outside of my blood relatives.. And yeah, some of you may say it's coincidental at best. And you're not entirely wrong. But at some point, too many coincidences start stacking up, for it to *actually* be a coincidence.

I doubt this post will get much traction, which doesn't really matter. It was more a way for me to get my feelings and thoughts out, and send them into an ever expanding void, than it was me seeking compassion and empathy. It was just me doing that, in hopes of stopping myself from continuing to cry, which I've now done for an hour and a half straight... At some points I think there's no more tears left to cry, and then my body starts over again... I feel more isolated and alone than I've ever done before... I guess I'll end this here... I'm feeling so numb at this point, that I don't even see the point in continuing writing... ",lgbt
Looking for advice... parents iffy on my relationship,"I’m a woman (22F) with a girlfriend my age. We’ve been on and off for about 2.5 years (on for around 2.25), but I’ve been having issues with my parents taking this relationship seriously, I think.

I will be honest, when I initially told them I was bisexual and in a relationship with a girl, they did not react well and though they warmed up as time passed and they educated themselves more, they still seemed to avoid bringing her up. 

Meanwhile, during the months preceding their first meeting with her, my girlfriend was going through tough times at home with her narcissistic and abusive stepdad, so that served as a big emotional drain for her and a big source of anxiety for me.

During the following semester in college, I struggled with anxiety and was wearing my girlfriend’s emotional energy thin... she would repeatedly tell me she needed space because I was so anxious I couldn’t function well, and she was so used to a calm environment between us...this is when my parents were able to meet her, so maybe they didn’t start off on the best foot but we were at least on good terms at that point.

Eventually, she broke up with me in stages and I showed my parents my sadness on that matter, as well as told them she was with a new guy a week after we broke up... she seemed to still love me but think we were unhealthy so this hurt me, even though I thought she might have just gotten with him for comfort (this turned out to be true).

Months passed into my final year at college, she confessed she still loved me and I said the same, dude broke up with her, we slowly get back into relationship level to ensure we’re both good. My parents didn’t get this when I told them we were back together, so I had to reassure them all was good, and it’s been good ever since.

That summer, I asked my parents if I could bring her home with me when visiting them... they refused and I got upset, because she had been there before and I wanted them to get more comfortable with her again, so I stayed at my friends’ house for a while, which infuriated my parents.

Fast forward to post-graduation... I had a research job at my university and stayed there for the summer while looking for a position once that ended. I lived with my gf because she was close to my university, and became more comfortable there, as I still felt that whenever I went home, the subject of my gf was barely addressed and left me with a sense of discomfort. Of course, my parents became upset with how much time I was spending with her versus them once the research job ended and I became dedicated to job search. I am afraid to tell them how we miss each other when I’m away because I know how much time we spend together, and I feel my parents still hope this relationship is a passing phase.

It seems that any time I leave or stay with her to help her out, they also find that ridiculous and tell me how much they need and want me home. I know my relationship with my gf may have been unhealthy in the past, but I feel that I have proven to my parents that it’s fine now and that it makes me happy.

This makes me sad, because I feel that all of the anger towards me visiting her is tearing my relationship apart... I do make a concerted effort to visit them, I just don’t feel comfortable living with them anymore. I really don’t know what to do, for whenever I bring up my gf and what she is going through, they seem to change the subject, not say much, or be unsympathetic. Further, if I change plans on them and visit her or do something with her, they say they think she’s using me, but I’m sure that’s false.

Please help if you can power through all this text, I’m really at a loss for what to do. 

Note: I am also an only child, if that makes a difference ",lgbt
Just got refused service for being LGBT,"I went to Target to buy some syringes for my HRT. I asked a young lady at the desk for a few 23g 1"" needles and she went to the back to get them. She came back with an older lady who told me it was illegal to sell me any syringes. I know it's not, but I asked her if she's sure that it's illegal in our state. She said yes. I asked if I could talk to the manager, she told me she was the manager and I needed to leave. I'm pretty sure she wasn't the manager either, she was the pharmacist, but I just left like a coward. I wasn't going to be ""that tranny"" making a scene, and at the end of the day she can just claim she's Christian and do whatever she wants to LGBT people. Don't feel bad for me, feel bad for the trans, NB and even diabetic people in a town with only one pharmacy. They can't get their medication at all. Vote I guess. Idk it seems kind of hopeless right now.


Update: I've been trying to email Target and CVS, but they haven't responded yet. I've got no intrest in suing, mainly because I think this probably isn't illegal in my state, but also because I don't want any money or anything. I'm very grateful to all of your supportive comments. I was extremely depressed because nothing this bad had ever happened to me before, but knowing I have a community who feels sympathy for me has given me the closure no big company ever would. You are all angels ❤🧡💛💚💙💜",lgbt
Recommendations for Asian (especially East Asian) diaspora in America or Europe involved in the LGBT theatre or performance scene!,"I'm looking to research on and hopefully shadow someone of Asian descent living in America or Europe for a research project. Please let me know of anyone who is a director/ performer/ actor/ backstage crew/ involved in marketing etc etc involved in the local LGBTQ+ scene, or if you fit this identity and wish to find out more, please comment or shoot me a message! Thank you :)",lgbt
Im depressed about how transphobic the world is help,Talk to me pls. I dont go back to therapy again until the end of next month,lgbt
LGBT titles and associated terms.,"Hello readers, I have a question which comes from a lack of understanding of LGBT culture.  Would it be possible to have a full list of the rainbow along with descriptions?  Also could it be pinned to the front of this page so that all people coming here who aren't familiar with the terms could see it?  I recently learned about agender people and what demi is and that was eye opening.

Thanks for reading.

\*Edit I missed an s on the thanks at the end.",lgbt
I have a crush on a lesbian woman and I’m a bisexual woman but there’s one problem...,"I’m bisexual...except no one knows. I’m not out yet and I’ve only dated men but I‘ve hooked up with women. I grew up in a community where not everyone was accepting so it’s taken me a while to accept it. But I just haven’t had the courage to tell my friends and family yet. 

Last night I went to a friends bday party and I met a woman who I later found out was lesbian (she mentioned it to me). This would’ve been the perfect time to tell her I’m bisexual but that would mean everyone else would hear and like I said I’m not out yet. Then later she told me she liked my hair and kept talking to me a lot throughout the night and before I left she told me she liked my jacket. This made me like her even more. 

She’s so beautiful, kind and funny and I have a pretty big crush on her but I didn’t get her number. The bday girl is our mutual friend so I could ask the bday girl if she’s single. But...the bday girl thinks I’m straight. I just don’t know what to do. I’m nervous to come out. Most of my current friends will accept me. But my family won’t. Also I’m not even sure if this woman likes me but I really like her. But I’ve also never dated a woman so I’m nervous about that too. 

TLDR: I have a crush on a woman who’s friends with my friends...but none of my friends or family know I’m bisexual and I’ve never dated a woman yet. What do I do?",lgbt
Family Research Council chair asks for prayers for Republicans to legalize abuse of LGBTQ children,,lgbt
Interested to hear your thoughts about the choice of words when coming out.,"Hello! So, I’ve been thinking lately about coming out as gay to my mom and I feel the need to decide on what I’m going to say to her. I feel like I want her to understand that this isn’t something up for debate or something that we’re going to fight about - it’s either you come to accept it or you don’t. I’m almost 22 and I haven’t been living with her since graduating from high school, so it’s a little easier if it turns real bad. But it still feels a little... I don’t know, passive-aggressive? To say it like that. 

So, I would be interested to hear about what you think is the right way to go about it or what’s your experience. I feel like overall the word choice is not going to be that important, but it can still influence the reaction to some degree.",lgbt
Gay and disabled issues.,"I am a male, 19 and am in college. I am deaf and have a disease call Charcot Marie Tooth Disease. I just need to rant and pour my emotions out. This night is one of the worst nights of my life. I went on a date and the guy was intimidated by my disabilities even though I always have a disclaimer about it. Then a guy on tinder told me I'm not worth it to date. I met very few sweet guys and when I do, they tell me I'm not their type or they're too scared to date me. One just a few minutes ago told me he was on his way and then he was like I'm not sure anymore. Why is there LGBT community so unfriendly to the disabled. I can't even go out in public because I'm not entirely out and no guys have ever approached me. I just feel like maybe I'm gonna be unloved forever because I've never heard of a male gay disabled finding love. I need some advice on what to do....",lgbt
We rarely share our vids on Reddit - but our friend told us she was moved my the relationships we have with our parents and how nice it is to see them being so open to their gay kids.,,lgbt
HOW DO I IMPROVE MY GAYDAR?,"Does Gaydar exist? If yes, then why mine sucks. I am gay who is having trouble knowing other gay men in public.

Thanks ",lgbt
I need help.,"Ok so I'm nonbinary and bi and I need help coming out to my boyfriend.

I'm not sure if he will be accepting of me or not and I love him so much so I don't want to lose him. ",lgbt
"The mods at r/fitgirls banned me for being trans, because ""the title says fitGIRLS,"" but that doesn't change the fact that I am a woman, and I am crushing the fitness game.",,lgbt
You gays like Kevin Abstract,And or brockhampton,lgbt
Documentary about Indian trans community,"Hi everyone, I recently became a part of a team working to make a documentary spotlighting the stories and activism of the world's oldest ethnic transgender community in India, the Hijra people. Their stories are so important and we're really excited at having this chance to help spotlight them. It focuses on the amazing work being done by activist Rudrani Chettri and her work for better representation for her and those that identify as 'Hijra' in India. 

We're gearing up to raise support for the film and just went live with our social media channels. I was hoping some of you might be interested in finding out more about it and would give us a like on Facebook and follow on twitter!

[https://twitter.com/hijrafilm](https://l.facebook.com/l.php?u=https%3A%2F%2Ftwitter.com%2Fhijrafilm%3Ffbclid%3DIwAR2jjQs-9C4Tkujv_mWSPO-gHPqC1U_NFxefpkiWA4K3z6pLhtKFcLxcrRI&amp;h=AT00FGRogUEz6WCJF_ehCCi9Jjo5GPLpmyNJQjrvOX-FhGdgZmJwuwLAVILMQvU3M1de0BDSpJJh-NNbrDwIiJMyd71HEmF2u4jCXZ4_-RyiC4fhYU0BUMEVHBU0llUH6rydqYYYdD0Yc03QeHEGE_7J)

[https://www.facebook.com/hijrafilm](https://www.facebook.com/hijrafilm) ",lgbt
Korean Gay Divas,,lgbt
You just got pranked my dude,"So I'm a gay man and a crossdresser. I go out in public and crossdress regularly for fun n stuff. I went to a bar and one guy starts hitting on me. Trying to get my number and such (was in a relationship at the time) after the fifth time he gropes me and realises his mistake. He walks away in tears.


A few weeks later I was crossdress ing an chilling with my friends and one of my other friends who doesn't know I crossdress starts talking about stuff with me. He starts talking about him finding a friend of his attractive. This guy mentions by bf's name and bells start ringing in my head. I grabbed a notepad out of my pocket and wrote down my name and told him that me and my bf were in a relationship and we both outed ourselves to each other that night

I just thought that was funny",lgbt
Happy (nearly) Halloween! It brings out my inner goff.,,lgbt
I'm a trans man in the closet and my male friend said he has feelings for me,"Hey!

Soo I have never heard of anyone talking about this... I wanted to know if someone has gone through something similar... 

I am a trans man but no one else knows about it. I'm in the closet and present myself as female, and I kind of have this ""delicate"", shy, way of expressing myself. I have always felt atracted to girls, and never felt attraction for men. Some time ago, my male friend, who is straight, told me he has feelings for me. He is kind of a shy guy too, not the manly type.

It's confusing for me. I don't know what to think about this. It's so strange, because we are both man and both straight, but he likes me. This makes me even more scared of coming out. But I also felt nice to know that someone likes me. It made me wonder if I am gay, or if he is gay and doesn't know. I just really can't picture myself with a guy now. Actually not anyone who sees me as a girl. We continue to be friends, I have been ignoring what he said. He asked me if i felt something for him and I said no. He asked me if I had ever felt anything for a man, and I said no. So he thinks I'm a lesbian,and I'm like, I cannot feel anything for you... 

I just wish he could see me as myself. It annoys me to think he is atracted to things on myself that I hate, that I'm not comfortable with, that doesn't reflect me.

Thanks guys!

&amp;#x200B;",lgbt
Are there any lgtb scholarships,"I have to keep this short but it's really important to me. I have a friend who's been outed in quite an unfriendly environment and it's really taking a toll on his life. I want to help him but there's only so much I can do , this is why I'm turning to Reddit. Do you guys know of any organization or anything that offers scholarships specifically directed at lgbt people? I'm sure meeting any academic standard wouldn't be a problem to him if he's got motivation at least... Thank you in advance ",lgbt
Couldn’t have put it better,,lgbt
What do you mean you don't approve???,"I'm a straight 21 year old dude. And my coworker is something else. Yesterday he was going on a rant about gay people he saw in a restaurant. His complaint? They were acting gay. Flamboyantly, although I know his brain isn't big enough to handle that word, but that's how he described it. 

He literally gags at homosexuality. And his grandma is a lesbian! But ""I still don't approve of that"" he says. I then say to him, ""Wait a second, you go know they're born that way right? Like, it isn't a choice.



""...yeah, I know; but I still don't approve of it!"" He'll accept a basic scientific fact but he still has a problem with a process that he KNOWS YOU CAN'T CONTROLL. I always read stories on the internet of ignorance and bigotry, but I'll be damned if I thought I would ever experience it for myself. Anyways, you guys deal with a lot of shit. Have a good Friday.",lgbt
"I am doing a uni project and am looking for screenshots of TV shows and films where people say something offensive about lesbians, such as asking if they can watch them have sex or implying that lesbianism is there for the consumption of men. I attached an example.",,lgbt
this guy right here (rant),"ok so i’m sure everyone knows onision or how ever u spell it. this guy is an asshole. we all know. but [this video](https://youtu.be/l7zEhZ4zaWQ) is a bit much. this is a cis gender, straight man coming on to youtube thinking he can just, ya know, say that trans ppl getting gender conforming surgeries are mutilating themselves. his points in the video include, 
1. trans ppl hating themselves is transphobic 
    
a. he explains that when a trans person says they hate themselves they are putting themselves underneath cis ppl so that’s transphobic
    
b. he says in the video “if i woke up in a woman’s body, i would love it” thus proving his point /s

2. mutilation. 
    
a. for some reason this poor man can’t understand that for a lot of trans ppl, it would be life threatening if they didn’t get certain surgeries. 
   
b. he terribly misuses the word. a lot. 

3. no h8 plz
    
a. he says at the end of the video that if you comment anything that doesn’t align with his beliefs then he’ll send his twelve year old fans after you so don’t. 
   
b. i posted a comment explaining what he got wrong in the video and it was promptly deleted so rip i guess. 


tl;dr 
cis mans makes incorrect claims about trans ppl, trans ppl get mad. 
",lgbt
Femme Label,Just wanted your opinions on this. I've been hearing different things regarding this. Is the femme label still strictly to be used by feminine lesbians or has it branched out to any LGBT+ person who is feminine regardless of gender identity?,lgbt
"Pretty sure you all get plenty of these, just wanted to throw this in, in case you didn't...(cis straight white male) saying all of those monikers I just used are unimportant. People should have rights you guys and girls have been denied and that makes me sad....fight me, I'm drunk.",,lgbt
Recommendation,"I recommend all of you watch STRANGE ÆONS on youtube. An enlightened gay, I do say. No but really she's pretty funny and a good youtuber.

https://www.youtube.com/user/TheUglyOtaku",lgbt
I wrote a letter to the judge that banned LGBT flash fiction,,lgbt
I have always loved the analogy of the spectrum.,,lgbt
Vice - How a Former Neo-Nazi Found Her Identity as a Trans Woman,,lgbt
[Relationships] HOCO proposal,,lgbt
Navigating my first f/f dating experience,"Hey all. So since mid-September or so I've been talking to a girl who I met online. Due to our current life happenings meeting up isn't always easy, but every time we do it goes fantastic (and so far it's been much easier for me than dating men... but that's a whole other can of worms!) Anyway, she's not that great at texting sometimes... as in, replies are pretty slow, but in person we can talk for literal hours and never run out of things to say. I just don't want to not talk/see each other for too long, and it falters...

I want to invite her to my place since we've been talking about a movie night for a really long time. We're hanging out this Saturday with some of her friends as well, but I kind of want something private too since everything we've done has been in public settings and being not-straight it's awfully harder to show affection... but I don't want to give the impression it's uhh ""netflix and chill"" because neither of us are quite comfortable with that yet...

I need some advice -
1) Should I be worried about the slow texting? She is often busy and we do use a separate app for texts I don't think she uses otherwise because it's the only one I use.
2) Would inviting her over be a bad idea? I don't want to seem like a creep.

I just don't know what's ""normal"" for f/f. All the guys I've been with took it too fast and I was never comfortable. But this time I actually want it and wish we could be together more??? But I know other friends who took it slower at first / their SOs suck at texts and ended up long term and very happy, so idk if I should worry.

You got to the end! Thanks for trying to make sense of my rambling. :)",lgbt
Keep up the fight for equality everyone,,lgbt
LGBT Republican lawmaker defects to Democrats because of Donald Trump,,lgbt
Gay_irl,,lgbt
The complicated case of transgender cyclist Dr. Rachel McKinnon - velonews.com,,lgbt
This morning the first Dutch passport with a genderneutral 'x' was issued to a person.,,lgbt
Does she like me? (Bisexual),"This maybe a bit long. Female here. So basically when I was 16 I liked this girl and we knew each other and everything and talked everytime we saw each other from 15 to 16. I fancied her at one point and had guts and said to her face that ""I like you Claire (anon name)"". Then Claire didn't respond and just walked away and ignored me. After a couple of months went by we where talking generally again and I just had a mild crush back then anyways.

Skipping to when I was 19 we started messaging here and there just short messages over phone about life and what not. She said she wanted to meet up and I had no money at the time so lost contact

Skipping to now she has rang me a couple of times and I picked the phone up today she was really happy over the phone was giggling a lot (sounded kind of nervous) as previously she hasn't been nervous around me in person not much anyways nor over the phone. So she was saying ""how are you"" and saying she wanted to meet up but I was spending time with my partner (male).

She responded with ""you are always busy"" which I am its a busy term so far due to studying then she we where talking about our families briefly then out the blue she said ""I remember the time you fancied me"" and I was getting nervous cause I said I didn't want to be reminded of that and was laughing a bit. Then she came out with ""I went out with a girl and we went to New York"" so she now identifies herself as Bisexual I was shocked and said ""wow awesome"" then she was giggling and asked ""we really need to meet and she said she really wanted to meet me today I said I am free at xyz"" and claire responded ""okay cool we will sort the time nearer the time""

 then she said ""how's things with your partner is he still being a bit of a twit?"" I responded with no we have been together for 3 yrs and she responded with ""3 yrs doesnt mean anything tho and she asked 2 times if I am in love with him I said I love him and that he is right next to me so its awkward"" then she said ""oh shit sorry"" then I said goodbye because I was going into a restaurant.

The reason why I am asking this and that I think she likes me is another person who is a guy he likes me and said and asked me things similar about my partner to me.

So what do you all think does she like me? We arent random strangers and have known each other for yrs but not properly.

:)",lgbt
"Anyoen else (sep. Bi, Pan, etc) have any funny ""wait... I'm not straight"" moments?","I ask because I was thinking about my whole story of realizing I liked guys, too, and realized it was pretty funny looking back. I figure there's got to be a goldmine sitting around in here and I could use a laugh today.

My personal story:

&amp;#x200B;

So I was this pretty ""normal"" if kinda quiet kid back in 8th grade. (still mostly am, I'm not shy I just only speak when I have something to say) For my algebra class I had this amazingly attractive guy sit in front of me. every. single. day.

Now, I'm bi, so up until this point I never gave it a passing thought that I might be into guys. Was DEFINITELY into  girls so I always just assumed that my weirdness in the locker room was just typical and no one talked about it really.

So I saw this guy, and for some odd reason couldn't get my mind off him during class. (my worst year of math grades) I was being frustrated by this, trying to figure out why I was so obsessed until I came to this conclusion:

I kid you not, this is pretty much verbatim what I thought: ""He's just super hot. If I was gay, I'd totally be obsessed with this guy. No wonder I can't stop thinking about him""

LMAO

This went on for half a year before I finally realized:

""Wait... if I think this guy is super hot and i'm obsessed with him... I might be gay""

\*panics until I get home, frantically googles ""can you be a little gay"" because I somehow didn't know the word ""Bisexual""\*

Three years later I've gone through the whole ""is lgbt but raised Christian"" thing, found a wonderful GSA at my high school, (I miss those guys, had to leave for early+free college classes, but I get to see them at local pride prom!) and generally life is looking up.

EDIT: uh, ignore my spelling in the title please. (I'm on mobile and survive on auto correct forgive me)",lgbt
My 23 yo brother passed very suddenly last week. This was him 3 months ago when I told him I was dating someone. He was my best friend. He was in the USMC and was more happy for me than anyone. I wish he could have met him. RIP bro. Love you.,,lgbt
Pittsburgh officials pressure marathon organizers to drop Chick-fil-A sponsorship,,lgbt
Gay teen asks straight football captain to homecoming in epic proposal,,lgbt
Who is your favourite LGBT+ character from film and TV????,,lgbt
I started an inclusive sub for women to share their fitness journeys after being banned from other fitness subs for being trans,"Feel free to post, regardless of your experience or the state of your body. The only requirement is that you are putting in the work. Get it 💪🏼❤️✌🏼

r/fitwomen",lgbt
Bind safe siblings :),,lgbt
How do I know if this girl likes me?,"This maybe a bit long, female here. So basically when I was 16 I liked this girl and we knew each other and everything and talked everytime we saw each other from 15 to 16. I fancied her at one point and had guts and said to her face that ""I like you Claire (anon name)"". Then Claire didn't respond and just walked away and ignored me. After a couple of months went by we where talking generally again and I just had a mild crush back then anyways.

Skipping to when I was 19 we started messaging here and there just short messages over phone about life and what not. She said she wanted to meet up and I had no money at the time so lost contact

Skipping to now she has rang me a couple of times and I picked the phone up today she was really happy over the phone was giggling a lot (sounded kind of nervous) as previously she hasn't been nervous around me in person not much anyways nor over the phone. So she was saying ""how are you"" and saying she wanted to meet up but I was spending time with my partner (male).

She responded with ""you are always busy"" which I am its a busy term so far due to studying then she we where talking about our families briefly then out the blue she said ""I remember the time you fancied me"" and I was getting nervous cause I said I didn't want to be reminded of that and was laughing a bit. Then she came out with ""I went out with a girl and we went to New York"" so she now identifies herself as Bisexual I was shocked and said ""wow awesome"" then she was giggling and asked ""we really need to meet and she said she really wanted to meet me today I said I am free at xyz"" and claire responded ""okay cool we will sort the time nearer the time""

 then she said ""how's things with your partner is he still being a bit of a twit?"" I responded with no we have been together for 3 yrs and she responded with ""3 yrs doesnt mean anything tho and she asked 2 times if I am in love with him I said I love him and that he is right next to me so its awkward"" then she said ""oh shit sorry"" then I said goodbye because I was going into a restaurant.

The reason why I am asking this and that I think she likes me is another person who is a guy he likes me and said and asked me things similar about my partner to me.

So what do you all think does she like me? We arent random strangers and have known each other for yrs but not properly.

:) ",lgbt
they thought smh,,lgbt
Got my bisexual bob today! (It looks long because i have a short neck. Im sorry.),,lgbt
"For Bi+ Folks, Therapy Can Be Radical Self-Care. But Only if Mental Health Providers Affirm Our Identities",,lgbt
LGBTQ History Month: Early pioneers of the gay rights movement,,lgbt
I DID IT (you should too),,lgbt
The irony.,"*Me and my other (closeted) bi friend)
Homophobe:Hey did you think that girl was hot?
Me: I mean I wasn't really...
Homophobe: NO NOT YOU, YOU LIKE BOYS
Homophobe: I was talking about my hetrosexual friend here *gestures to my friend*
",lgbt
LGBT Media Representation,,lgbt
Bigots being bigots,,lgbt
Advice for coming out?,"Okay, I’ve known I was gay since I was little but I’ve spent most my life trying to convince other and myself I wasn’t. I’m 28 (f) and I can’t pretend anymore. However, I’m terrified that because I’m not quite ready to come out, no woman will ever want to be with me. I’ve never felt like I belonged anywhere and now I feel even more disconnected from the world. Is this normal? Am I just overthinking because I’m scared? 😣",lgbt
What do you all think of my tattoo idea?,,lgbt
Lambda Legal Chief Strategy Officer Sharon McGowan to Receive American Bar Association Stonewall Award,,lgbt
Finally out to everyone!,,lgbt
"I really, really need some advice.","I know that this is a sub-reddit full of people who have accepted or trying to accept who they are, but I'm hoping someone can relate or know some advice so I'm going here anyway.

 I realized the other day why I'm so awkward in so many social situations,  whether it's with guys or girls that I don't know extremely well - after my girlfriend jokingly said that I might be pan-romantic (she's also LGBT btw), I kept dwelling on it and I realized that she was right - and I absolutely hate the discovery. I'm completely heterosexual, yet I have the capacity to feel romantic attraction towards everyone. I feel very uncomfortable with the mere thought of being in a relationship with someone who isn't female, so It's doing nothing more to me except making my life difficult and stressing me tf out. It's a weight.

Since I doubt this is something I can ""fix"", can someone give me some advice on how I can cope with this - if it's even possible? I don't know what to do and I'm freaking the hell out. 

(And for the love of God please don't harass me, I really can't handle that right now. I'm so far on the edge of my seat I don't know if this post makes any sense at all ;-;)",lgbt
"Addressing my crap hairline, i hate u testosterone 😞😞",,lgbt
"GAY BARS IN WINNIPEG,CANADA","Hey y'all,

I have recently moved to Winnipeg, Canada. I would like to have a list of all the Gay Bars there. 


Regards

",lgbt
Finally got a Pride day at my school! (I’m the one with the bi flag on my face),,lgbt
I live in Woolgoolga in Australia. Walked by this in the main street today ❤,,lgbt
I dont know if I have gender dysphoria.,"Hey... I'm a 15 yo m and recently.. idk what it is but I think I have gender dysphoria but I dont know.. is there a way to check, and if so what should I do?",lgbt
Pelosi to make Equality Act a 'top priority' if Dems retake House -- “The Equality Act expands ending discrimination against LGBTQ people and women and adding that to the Civil Rights Act.”,,lgbt
"Weird meme, cool article",,lgbt
Walked by this on the way to my dorm 👌,,lgbt
MTF PASSING TIPS (HAIR),,lgbt
This is a gay beat,,lgbt
"This is what you guys want, right?",,lgbt
"I showed a friend who has never seen me pre-transition the pic on the left and she couldn't believe it was me. Honestly, it's getting hard to believe myself (-3 yrs, 1st month out, 10 months out &amp; 6 on HRT)",,lgbt
Discourse Advice to an Old Gay tm,"I was at a bar while traveling and got into a conversation with an older gay man. We talked about culture differences and the AIDS crisis, etc... Once I mentioned I am trans, shit kinda hit the wall. 

In the same breath of him saying that he supports the trans community he said that I’d never be a gay man because I don’t have a penis, and that gay men aren’t interested in vaginas.


I tried explaining that sexuality, sex, and gender are different concepts- he gets that. 

That some gay men are in relationships with trans men- he doesn’t understand. 

It was incredibly frustrating, but I stayed cordial. He’s curious, but dense. 

Note: when talking about sex and stuff, he really put an emphasis on penis size and that the insult of having a tiny dick is a huge offense. He wouldn’t be interested in a dude with a less than average member, let alone a “tranny” (Personally, I revel in that. Usually the first person to make a small dick joke).

What arguments or examples would you have used in order to sway his opinion? 

I’m not looking for “fuck that guy and just leave” answers. I really wanna be able to have discourse to sway others and not be aggressive about it either. 

Prejudice and discrimination is born from ignorance. It helps no one if you choose to let them linger in the dark. 

I just wanna be ready the next time something like that happens. 

Also sorry typing from mobile ",lgbt
I'm bi but I want to be gay?,"I'll start by saying I think I'm homoromantic pansexual.  I realized and was pretty sure I was gay about a year and a half ago, but I've also been somewhat attracted to girls as well so it caused a lot of internal conflict.  I've never been in a relationship since middle school (which doesn't really count tbh), so all of this is pretty much in my head which only adds to the confusion.  Bi/pansexuality is valid and I know that's a possibility but internalized biphobia makes me think maybe I'm not actually gay since I still kinda like girls and I'm making it up.  In the end, sexuality is fluid and what I am really doesn't matter and I'll figure it out once I get to it.  Until then it's all just in my head.  This whole post is kind of an incoherent mess, sorry",lgbt
"The article is in Dutch, but someone my friend and I used to know now has received the first gender neutral passport in The Netherlands today! (I'll leave a comment with more information)",,lgbt
Is their any truth to the idea that Harvey Milk had a relationship with a 16 year old?,"I was doing some reading regarding the HIV/AIDS in the late 1980s to 1990s and came across info that Harvey Milk had sexual relations with a 16 year old.

The book is by an LGBT author, Randy Stilts, called And the Band Played On. 

Personally, having lived in Europe, where the age of consent was 16 I don't think Harvey Milks relationships is a huge deal but wanted to know is the claims in the book were true.",lgbt
Transphobic friend's response to finding out i'm trans,,lgbt
THE STARS COME OUT FOR SPIRIT DAY,,lgbt
A decade later...,,lgbt
I’ve never had a problem keeping pussy out of my underwear until now,,lgbt
Originally posted this on LGBTeens. Crossposted here because it obviously also fits here,,lgbt
Adorable!😁,,lgbt
Cristo debates the 'gay' cake row with Simon from The Christian Institute.,,lgbt
This js me right now.,,lgbt
Pixelated LGBT Flag Heart Foil Art #4 - Lesbian,,lgbt
"Trump voters say men are discriminated against more than gays, minorities",,lgbt
"[TW] I bullied and made life suck for a lesbian teen in middle schools cutting off a friendship with them and called him with the wrong pronouns during his transition, it’s been 3 years since then and I’ve tried to show I’m sorry every since . How to I show that I’m sorry","I’m on mobile, so sorry for formatting 

Well to begin with let me give you a a little description of me in a 16/m POC in rich white area, when we were 13 my friend group paid me to harass this dude (now 16/ftm) who had overall unpopular opinions but never hurt anyone. I’m not saying what I did was right in any way shape or form because what I did was actually despicable, I just want to let you guys know what goes through the mind of someone who does shit. I was super immature, and I know people can’t grow that much in 3 years but I definitely have grown to know that no one is worse because of things they can’t change (race,gender, orientation). Ever since then I’ve tried to change. I don’t want to say I’m not homophobic because I have lbgtq+ friends but I don’t have a better reason. I go to my local pride, I enjoy watching the occasional drag, they are normal people who like to have fun, I’ve recently joined a 60 person academy with the dude from before and what I have done has came out and I explained my reasoning and how it was wrong and how I changed but they are now trying to kick me out for what I’ve done. So let me wrap this up before I ramble even longer. I came here to confess but I really came here to ask R/lgbt how do I show I’m apologetic and how I want to change. Because I truly think I have and I want to show it. ",lgbt
A Lost Bi Who Needs Advice,"Hello, Im a 19 year old, recently out ( to some) bisexual woman. I never dated before but recently develop a crush on a female classmate but Im such a mess. How do I know if she's also LGBT? How do I flirt in an obvious im gay way? How can I ask her out w/o being werid? Plz help",lgbt
Lgbt cafe,"There are studies shows that people of the lgbt community are more likely to misuse substances than heterosexuals. Lgb teens were found 90% more are reported to use substances. 

[source](https://www.drugabuse.gov/related-topics/substance-use-suds-in-lgbt-populations)

Gay or lgbt bars are usually (at least back then) the spot to meet other queer people. It’s a social environment where people could enjoy entertainment and meet like minded people. The only problem is the large amount of drug consumption and its influences on younger queer people. 

A great investment would be in lgbt cafes. Not only it’s alcohol free, people of all ages could come in and meet like minded people. Queer identifying teens will have one less influence into doing drugs. Also it creates a sense of community, teens will have a belonging in a community that’s a safe space for them. There’s a correlation between a sense of belonging in the community and doing well in school (and even life). Entertainment wise, we could have (but not limited to) lgbt artist, performers and acts come in. Support the locals while we are at it. 

In theory this sounds pretty cool, but it takes more decision making and planning to this. This is just a mere brainstorm for now. I find that our adolescents are very important to the communities of all parts of the world. We do need more spaces where lgbt people can bond that doesn’t revolves around alcohol. 

",lgbt
For anyone needing a binder - gc2b is having a sale!,,lgbt
"I feel like my label of “bisexual” doesn’t sound “queer” enough, which doesn’t even make sense it’s literally part of the acronym",,lgbt
My transgender son advocates at a Human Rights Campaign event,,lgbt
Tired of hiding but don't know what to do.,"Background: I'm 21 years old, bisexual, and definitely at least non-binary.

&amp;#x200B;

I first realized I was bi when I was 15 and earlier this year realized I was non-binary. I've been living as a queer person for over six years and have been hiding it from my family ever since then. During that time, I've been interrogated about my sexuality by my dad and sat silently as my family rattled off countless slightly homophobic and transphobic remarks about other people. They are somewhat *tolerant* at best otherwise and *do* have ""gay friends,"" some of whom even went as far as to invite them to the local Pride parade one year. My parents extended the invitation to me. I declined on the instinct that it was nothing more than a trap.

&amp;#x200B;

The past few months in particular have been amazing for me. As of two months ago today I'm dating an amazing fellow enby who makes me feel happier and more comfortable than anyone ever before. I've started going to a trans student group in college that has also been greatly helping me realize my gender. I feel so much better about myself now that I don't have to pretend to be something I'm not.

&amp;#x200B;

I was working on a writing assignment today and I realized just how sick I am of having to switch identities between college/online and family life. I really feel like I'm ready to come out and fully express who I am, but I'm just afraid of how my family will react. They're tolerant of homosexuality to a mixed degree, still confused at best about transgender people, and don't even know that non-binary people are an actual, valid thing. Plus, these are the people who pay for my car insurance, gasoline, and college tuition, not to mention let me live in their house and eat their food. I don't have enough time or experience to fit a job in my schedule, let alone one that pays well enough for me to survive on my own.

&amp;#x200B;

I just want to be free already. I'm tired of having to act ""normal"" for my own sake.",lgbt
help w/ dysphoria,yo any tips to help with ftm dysphoria would be great. it’s recently become soul-crushingly bad and i really need some help. ,lgbt
Please come support us!,"Please come support two aspiring LGBTQ People ♡ 

www.twitch.tv/rickyfromla",lgbt
My little brother told me something that really helped me out.,"Most people- specifically most cishet folks- are told what they are and they just roll with it. And that’s valid. If that’s how you do, that’s how you do. 

But queer folks? We figured out who we were for ourselves. We questioned what we were told about ourselves, and found that we were not what we were told. We discovered something in ourselves noone had thought to consider would be there. 

There’s something unbelievably beautiful about that. 

There is something resplendent about being queer. We are miraculous and incredible, because we break expectations just by existing and being happy.

So the next time you feel insecure about your identity? Remember. You are so different from what the world expected of you. And that makes your experiences all the more beautiful. ",lgbt
"AFAB. I want to be a boy so badly, please help me.","TW-dysphoria

I want to be a boy, and I think I would be more comfortable as a boy. I get voice and hip dysphoria(luckily no top or bottom, I really got lucky) and I want a penis. I also am uncomfortable being perceived as a female, and would much rather be seen as a boy. I would even say I was a boy trapped in a girl's body from ages 3 to 7. But how do I know for sure that I'm actually a male, and not a female?

No access to gender therapy.
Parents will not be supportive.",lgbt
Having some gender identity issues.,"*Trigger warning* dysphoria

 I want to be a cis boy. I'm a girl right now. I would give up my right arm for it. My dysphoria isn't very extreme though and comes in waves. Just secondary sex characteristics bother me some, and I want a penis. I also want to be perceived as a male. I want a deep voice so badly. When I pack, I feel a sense of relief. But what if I'm still a girl?",lgbt
thought y’all would like this too,,lgbt
I'm struggling and want mature people to help,"So. I recently got a significant other. And me being the 'totally mature 18 year old' we roleplay characters we made and so on and so forth. It tends to have a dirty deed scene . . 

I have been trying to start really talking with myself, and looking to explain the not trans boy me! 

In addition,  i have found something out. 

I think i may be a Pan-romantic A-sexual 《does jazz hands unenthusiasticly 》 but i have no idea how to tell my love im not looking for sex. . . We speak pf it a lot, and they will say a few suggestive things. But like. . .i seriously think im A-sexual but Pan-romantic 

Is that possible? Am i just fooling myself?  Sorry if i sound stupid and uneducated, i recently maybe 2 years ago found the lgbtq+ community, and realized everything

Dont say anything if you are just here to hate. Im seriously struggling and want a mature answer 

どうもありがとうございます ((thank you so much))",lgbt
Dealing with homophobic people in my school...,"Ok so let’s start with why they chose to target me, I am a boy but I have a high voice and I have already hit puberty. I also have a man bun and have a voice impression I do called Jessica basically me doing a girl voice and that’s how it started. It was easy at first just they occasional rude person but then it started to let’s say “heat up”. 7th grade started and I was in my last class when this guy came up to me and said ,”Hey you little fat faggot” and that night I slit my wrists.... It continued for a couple days till I finally yelled at him! Next in counter was when I was at an assembly sitting with my GIRLFRIEND and I heard someone say “did you know he’s gay?” And I turned around and said “First off all what is wrong with you why are you assuming my sexuality” and then he said “well you wear man buns and makeup” and that’s when I snapped I wasn’t about to let this guy insult me for expressing myself so I said ,”Hey listen you sexist piece of shit, I wear makeup because I want to not because I’m gay, also it’s called a MAN bun for a reason you inconsiderate bitch” and that was the very big in counters I’ve had a lot more but I don’t want to go in because I don’t want to sound like a cry baby even though I already am.",lgbt
Serious question.,"Not trying to troll or anything, but I seriously think about this from time to time.

If everybody was bisexual (since the beginning of time) do you think a lot of the world's problem would exist? What kind of problems would you think arise if everyone was bisexual?",lgbt
What LGBT+ movies do you swear by?,,lgbt
How can I be a better supporter of my friends?,"This is probably going to be the cliche hetero-cis-white-male scenario, and as such I know I’m more often than not the last guy most people want to hear sociopolitical opinions from, but I genuinely would like some advice.

A fair number of people in my life have come out as either non-binary or pan/bi/gay/other and have expressed their preferences for pronouns and such. I care about them and want to do my best to support them as best I can. The biggest “problem” is adjusting from he/she to the neutral “they” or using their name. Not difficult, just takes some adjusting.

I am completely in support of people living their lives and identifying themselves as they feel comfortable. That’s how you feel, that’s how you identify, I will do my best to respect and acknowledge that.

However, here’s where my questioning comes in. Some of my friends have identified as pan, bi, and gay, and sometimes a combination thereof, or sometimes just “queer”.  I just don’t know enough about the terminology and identification to know how best to understand their situations. In my mind, again due to lack of experience and understanding, I would have thought one would be generally one of the above rather than multiple. To me that seems a bit contradictory, but that’s just due to my lack of knowledge.

As dumb as this may sound, I am genuinely curious if there’s like a terminology primer or “cliffs notes” I could consult? Growing up in a relatively conservative household, the first openly gay person I met outside of my family (my mom’s brother was gay, one of dad’s best friends is gay, and one of mom’s best friends is lesbian) was my freshman year roommate. Great dude, lots of fun. I just want to be as supportive as I can without seeming like the “token cis ally” or anything. I want to know how best I can be supportive and be a better friend.",lgbt
"I was interviewed about my music on a super queer web series called, The Beat! Would you watch and upvote?",,lgbt
Idk how much longer I can hide.,"So... Being a transwoman in hiding has made me a very uhealthy person... Mentally, and now physically. I've been depressed for many years, even at one point have had dangerous thoughts. But I fought through it... And now it seems if my depression and anxiety can't take me out one way, it fully intends to another.

Now I'm almost always feeling tired/getting little sleep, bloated when I've barely eaten, hungry after I've already eaten too much... I'm constantly getting side pains and being short of breath, been far more forgetful... I'm shaking more than I used to... I'm not even that good at hiding I'm depressed anymore, I think my mom is really starting to notice, and it's scary.

I need to get help, but I realize deep down, once I do, I can't hide this anymore... I have to come out and face shit that I've been avoiding for almost 5 or 6 years. Idk if I'm entirely ready for that. I know I'm never gonna have that ""perfect moment"", but it can't be now... My parents are going through some shit, I still rely on them (even at 21) and my very Christian, right wing grandparents are gonna be staying here... I feel like I'm gonna snap in two, but I gotta try and keep it together for awhile longer. I know it isn't healthy, but idk what else to do.",lgbt
"I’m Amber Wavves! I’ve been traveling through the National Parks of the Southwest and helping people look fabulous, while also thriving in the wild. Let’s bring drag to the Great Outdoors!",,lgbt
Not on my good Christian reddit,,lgbt
Am I dumb for being scared to come out to my lesbian mother?,All my friends tease me for it and it doesn’t hurt or anything but it does make me think whether or not my fear is rational or not. ,lgbt
And some more writing too,,lgbt
Isn't that cute?,,lgbt
Such a good film | The leave | LGBT Short film,,lgbt
New Zealand to remove cap on gender confirmation surgeries,,lgbt
What it feels like to be transgender on Tinder.,,lgbt
MADE IT,,lgbt
"So I just recently got married and was gonna put my wife on my insurance at work, but I found out that our health plan does not recognize my marriage!! Do I have any recourse here or am I SOL! ☹️",I live in Nevada,lgbt
(Serious) I am a bisexual female. I have a crush on a female coworker.,"I think she might be bi as well, based on certain cues and things I have noticed. The problem is that I am not out at work. I’m nervous to tell her. What if I am misreading things? We are both in our twenties and I don’t want to ruin our friendship. 

However, I really like her. She’s smart, funny, and so, so kind. What do you guys suggest I do?",lgbt
Rise in reported LGBT+ hate crime in UK a 'wake-up call',,lgbt
I never thought I would enjoy looking this femme. Absolute glowup,,lgbt
Best way to shut down a transphobe,,lgbt
"Just read ""The private Report on My Lesbian Experience with Loneliness"" of Kabi Nagata","Beautiful and extremelly painful and sad. Don't judge for the beginning as is far from porn.

&amp;#x200B;

It was triggering so be careful. (Depresion, eating disorder, social anxiety, self-harm... you get the drift)

&amp;#x200B;

She has another work ""My solo exchange diary"" I am gonna start once I recover.

&amp;#x200B;

Edit: I lied I started reading it right away and I can't stop crying",lgbt
How I came out to my friends...,"So it was 7:30 and I got a text from my friend, her name is Mollie. She said, “Where something LGBTQ tomorrow, K” of course being the little gay boi I am I like agree and get a shirt ready. It was the next morning, I got my clothes on and ran out the door. While on my way to school I realized. I FORGOT MY FREAKING SHIRT, so I texted Mollie “ I FORGOT MY SHIRT” and she told me it’s ok and she said she brought markers and bracelets. I was at school and I asked Mollie why we were wearing this stuff, she told me that a douche named Josh was spreading rumors about her that she was lesbian. First of all she is non-binary, so being pansexual she drew the pansexual flag and my friends were asking why I didn’t have all the colors of the flag and I told my friends that I was pansexual, they excepted me, and I didn’t even know but most of my friends are pan and bi and I was so happy! Also my best friend’s boyfriend has a brother and he is pansexual and he has a crush on me but won’t tell me☺️.",lgbt
Big age difference relationship - I'm scared of the future.,"I'm 29M, he is 68M. We are in a relationship since couple of years, and it's so great. I learned with him how love feels, we laugh a lot, travel a little, ride bikes, eat nice, watch movies, all the simple awesome things! With him for the first time I felt happy and safe. 

In the back of my head I know it will end somehow. We will not grow old as a couple, and have 30-40 beautiful years together. It breaks my heart to think I could be left alone without him. It doesn't bother me very often, most of the time I feel really good. Only sometimes when I'm alone I realize that one day I might have to deal with a lot of pain and huge changes in my life. It's just very scary. ",lgbt
"Anti-gay teachings 'mainstream' in Australian churches, report finds",,lgbt
If I made a group on groupme for lgbt people who may need someone to talk to would anyone be interested in joining?,,lgbt
I’ve been writing more,,lgbt
Does social or self gender definition means it's not acceptable anymore to use scientific gender definition in a public space to define people ?,"I'm not trying to be rude, just asking a question. Since people now identify themselves as they want ( I'm a woman or a man or something else). Does it mean you can't define people following scientific definition ( a female has an uterus, a male hasn't got one , etc ) when in a public debate or public medium like reddit ? What's the moment/situation where you can and can't use the scientific definition ? I'm very interested to know LGBT people view on this :). Thanks",lgbt
Trump is planning to allow more discrimination against LGBTQ people,,lgbt
Which one is better?,Is it better to be openly bixexual or closeted. I love both men and women but in my case I don't know what to do to get both. Should I be open about it or stay in the closet?,lgbt
9 Movies to Watch on Netflix for LGBTQ History Month,,lgbt
"First time wearing fem clothing, - mums dress, I felt amazing!",,lgbt
I did Ace Pride themed makeup to wear with the rest of my pride stuff this past weekend! I got a lot of compliments on it.,,lgbt
First Ever Gay Wedding in Lebanon Captured on Video,,lgbt
I feel stupid...,"I just made a video which if I decide, I will use to come out to my parents. I said all of this stuff that I've kept from them for so long. It felt bad. And kind of stupid. I'm just really not happy with myself right now.",lgbt
Finding My Orientation,"I've never really written about this except for quick blunt explanations to my Discord friends, so I guess here we go.

*Releasing a quick internal scream.*

Aight NOW HERE WE GO.

I suppose I'll start with a simple introduction. My name's Garrett. I'm currently 20 years old living outside of Cleveland, OH. I've always been sexually attracted to women, and only women, and that's still the case today... but Chris Pratt on the other hand. At first I thought it was *normal* for even a straight white male to say ""Dude, Chris Pratt, actually kinda hot"". Unfortunately, a lot of my cousins I was hanging out with around this time asked if I was gay, and I simply said no. I don't *like* men, not like that.
Weeks later, I was getting my daily dosage of Thomas Sanders (as any good ol' queer does), and it struck me subconsciously: Thomas is actually kind of hot. Wait, Chris Pratt is Hot, Thomas is hot... am I gay? No, no, they're just attractive is all, that's normal. I'm straight, I like women...
But Joan looks kinda hot too- WAIT JOAN ISN'T EVEN BIANARY.
And then, after a glorious day of reading up on different sexualities, because the idea of me being attracted to men, women, and NB seemed absolutely abstract, I found something interesting. It wasn't sexuality, but *romanticism*. As soon as I found out Panromantic was a thing, it suddenly clicked. I told myself ""Y'know what? Yeah, dudes are hot, chicks are hot, in between is hot too. Would I sleep with a dude or an NB? Nah probably not, but I have no problem holding hands and cuddling and shit. That just sounds like a nice time.""
Granted, explaining being panromantic and heterosexual is still difficult with those I'm open to, because it feels like I'm explaining something really different from someone saying they're gay, lesbian, etc. Nevertheless, many of my friends have been cool with it, and *my closest friends and I all came out to each other at the same time*, so that was fun as hell.

Coming from a very Christian family, none of them know about this, only a select few of my IRL friends, friends on Discord, and now, you guys. Thank you for having this community, for having an escape. I appreciate all of you.",lgbt
QLRadio Halloween,,lgbt
Question on coming out,"Hey everyone!

So I was planning to come out on Bisexual Awareness Day, but wanted to check with my partner first because I was talking about them. Then National Coming Out Day hit me and I was feeling depressed and unable to deal. And then I'm having some doubts, partially against being heavily in the questioning category and worrying about being uncertain (feeling pansexual, attracted to but limited experience with cis women, in serious relationship with trans woman), and partially about the fear of people being weird and judgy.  And by people, I'm really thinking family and my elementary school classmates who bullied me a lot at that time and then for some reason all wanted to be my fb friend.

Thoughts, tips, inspiration?

&amp;#x200B;

&lt;3",lgbt
As I am finally changing my name I thought would post how far I have come (taken 3 years apart),,lgbt
"ftm, feeling cute today",,lgbt
Ammar Campa-Najjar cover story Interview with LGBT newspaper Los Angeles Blade.,,lgbt
"""YOU LOOK LIKE SISTERS!!!!""","Every. fucking. day. 

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;

https://i.redd.it/awvv8uaqgus11.png",lgbt
Coming out stories?!,"I’m straight, y’all, and I don’t know what it’s like to be put down based on who I choose to love, but that is wrong and LOVE IS LOVE and I want to hear all about it ♥️💚💜💙💛",lgbt
“Fuck trump”,,lgbt
"TW? Have to go see homophobic relatives, advice needed!","Hi there! I'm sorry about this, I don't want to bring a lot of negativity to this sub, but I'm kind of in need of some advice.

Tomorrow my family and I have to go visit my dad's relatives, who are all blatantly homophobic. The last time we saw them, it seemed like all they talked about was trashing minorities and worshipping Frump. The things they said were disgusting, I honestly felt sick and I couldn't think of these people as my parents for a while. (If this information is needed, I'm pretty much everything they despise \^\^ Panromantic ace, an atheist, and a Democrat \*gasp\*)

I don't know how to deal with having to hear all of this again. They're all going to be at my grandma's house for dinner, where we're staying. I can't leave the room because my parents say I have to socialize with these people, and I don't know if I can put my headphones on or anything. Is there anything I can do to help get through the weekend?

Any tips or advice would be greatly appreciated. Thank you so much!",lgbt
Mike Pence red alert: Trump administration is planning a new rule to let federal contractors fire employees for religious reasons,,lgbt
Am I crazy or is there an increase in the usage of homophobic slurs in posts on the top page?,"It’s ridiculous that I even feel the need to get this off my chest, but over the past few days I have seen multiple posts on the front page containing the words “soyboy,” “f*ggot,” and “gay lord” employed in a hateful manner. Why is this hate speech tolerated by mods?  

Use of the “hard R” in racial epithets seems to be unacceptable, as it should be. So why are homophobic slurs seen as par for the course?  Why do people upvote these posts that contain such hurtful words? When I confront whoever employs these words, I’m downvoted like crazy. I would understand this if I were on some super conservative, hateful sub, but this is popping up everywhere. 

I’m so sick and tired of being told to “get a sense of humor” or “learn what sarcasm means.”  I’m not ignorant of real world issues, and I personally encounter these words on a weekly basis in real life, but this has not always been such an evident problem to me on popular Reddit subs. 

I wasn’t sure where else to post this, and I questioned even vocalizing it, because I don’t like to admit to being bothered by idiots using hateful words. I’m really just dumbfounded that mods would tolerate it. ",lgbt
PRETTY PRIVILEGE? Michael Henry,,lgbt
Need some feedback to see if my points made sense or if I was in the wrong here:,"[https://www.np.reddit.com/r/sadcringe/comments/9pbsgi/hits\_like\_a\_truck/e815tvs](https://www.reddit.com/r/sadcringe/comments/9pbsgi/hits_like_a_truck/e815tvs)

Do you all see the point I was trying to make? Was my point unclear or wrong?

Clearly /r/sadcringe didn't agree but from all the ""sjw !11!"" comments I don't really think they're the best judges",lgbt
"Canada knocking it out of the park today! Pride Toronto lifts ban on uniformed cops, says officers welcome to apply to march in parade",,lgbt
‘I am a boy’: The simple button that was Honolulu’s scarlet letter. Some people wore them inside their dresses — displaying them when stopped by police.,,lgbt
Would you say that this is homophobic harassment?,"I've just been wasting some time on Omegle, and came across a catfish supposedly trying to catch out predators. He pretends to be 13, and accuses me of being a predator for simply not disconnecting when he said his age. Based on what this guy said, he seems to lurk on Omegle quite a lot pretending to be a kid. The chat logs for our conversation can be read [here](http://logs.omegle.com/e7a12f5382cd400a). Do you guys think i'm right to be pissed that he's catfishing? The fact that he is pairing with people who put 'gay' as an interest on Omegle makes me feel like it's possibly motivated by homophobia. ",lgbt
I'm scared to come out as trans and get surgery,"I am debating on whether I am trans or bisexual or both. I wear dresses and skirts and prosthetic breasts in private all the time. I sometime sneak out and go in public to places where i don't know people wearing them. It feels so natural and exhilarating when i do. However, I feel somewhat ok when dressing as a guy but better as a woman. I am content somewhat as a guy but I want to be a guy but I'm not sure how my friends and people will take it. What do i do? Do I try and go for it or do i try to live as a guy and crossdress sometimes in secret?",lgbt
"Arkansas—Yes, Arkansas—Quietly Begins Issuing Gender-Neutral IDs to Non-Binary People",,lgbt
Gay non-dating social app?,Is there an app to meet gay people locally that aren’t trying to get laid?,lgbt
Queer is 1/2 a letter away from queen.,*hair flips &amp; snaps*,lgbt
FYI- You can also text the crisis hotline.,,lgbt
Came out as transgender at pride after many many years of hiding it,,lgbt
can you be transgender without believing in gender binaries?,"first of all, i assure you this is an honest question. not trying to stir up any drama. idk if anybody cares or not but im a cis white hetero male, just trying to learn lol.

anyway, this question was inspired by this post: https://www.reddit.com/r/TumblrInAction/comments/9p9llc/a_boy_who_doesnt_believe_in_gender_and_being_gay/

and it got me thinking, if a person is transgender does that also (typically?) mean they believe in gender binaries? from my understanding it seems like you must, because you transitioned from one defined thing to another distinct thing. if a person didnt accept gender binaries wouldnt they be more likely to just identify as ""X""  rather than as trans?

im sure theres a lot of person difference in opinion out there which is what id love to hear!",lgbt
Do closeted people subconsciously group together?,"So about a year ago I came out to my friend group, about 2 months ago someone else in my friend group came out, then another... 
I’ve noticed this trend many times in other friend groups. So do closeted people tend to make closeted friends by accident?",lgbt
Monomi (from Danganronpa) supports all types of LGBT,,lgbt
Funny story: Being misinterpreted as transphobic,"Me and a couple friends were talking today about how I used to be a part of the Mormon church. I no longer am. I was joking around and said ""Mormonism is a cult!"" when one of my friends(a trans woman) went silent. She slowly replied ""No, it's not."" I thought maybe she didn't understand  it was joke(but she's not dense, I was fairly sure she understood), so I thought maybe she didn't know what it was like to grow up in a Mormon household, so I said ""Well you never knew what it was like to be Mormon, and you never will."" 

She was shocked, almost offended. I then proceeded to ask her if she was Mormon, which I was 95% sure she wasn't. More silence. I repeated myself, because maybe she didn't hear me. ""Mormonism. Mormonism is a cult!"" She tilted her head and said ""Did you say... Mormonism?"" 

""Yeah."" 

""Oh. I thought you said womanism."" Womanism is a cult. You never knew what is was like to be a woman, and you never will. Are you a woman?

I'm glad she didn't punch me right there.",lgbt
Trump nominates openly gay conservative to federal appeals court,,lgbt
"Maybe if enough people tell me, I will believe it.","I'm almost 40, recently divorced, have kids and have always been attracted to guys. I did what I was raised to do. I married young, I had kids and I'm a provider. I had the opportunity after my divorce to experiment with guys to try to clear up my sexuality preferences but instead I chose to engage in meaningless oral sex (giving) with a hand full of guys and then jump back into dating a great girl. The problem is, I don't know who I am and now I've gotten into a relationship with a great girl who doesn't deserve to have her heart broken. I have been told that I need to break it off and through time and experience, I will figure this stuff out. I have been told that I will resent her and possibly one day cheat if I don't and that I should not make a decision based on fear. I have been told these things several times but yet I still don't know what to do. I honestly believe I will destroy this girl for something i may end up not being into. Im so scared of causing suffering to myself and those I love, being alone, ruining a good relationship, and laying on my death bed never knowing what could have been in either case. I'm so scared I can't move forward either way so I stay in the now and I'm miserable. I don't see a happy ever after for me.",lgbt
"3 years ago, I came out as bi. Now I make gay shit on YouTube.","Almost 3 years ago to the day I came out as bisexual to everyone close to me. I have slowly become more and more of myself, until the 12-18 months where I've really loosened up and become me.

I've recently gotten back into creating as I always have been, and now I make videos I am proud of on YouTube. Right now I've got 2 out of 3 parts of a drag mini series uploaded on my channel, and that's something I wouldn't have imagined myself doing even a year ago.

I'm not a drag queen, but it's still so great to be able to do something like this and go somewhere as busy as London and enjoy myself and have fun.

If you wanna check out the videos, [here is the link to my channel.](https://www.youtube.com/channel/UCxBL_4AVE-ILGzxzWmiX15Q) If not, then that's fine too. I'm just happy I'm comfortable with myself.",lgbt
[TW] Bigots be like...,,lgbt
I'm so lost.,I'm a woman. I've met a man who I really really care about but sexually it's just not the same as when I fantasize about women. I've never dated a woman or really had sex with one. When I expressed this too him he freaked out. I feel like I have no idea who I am am I gay or straight or something in between? I'm so hurt and confused and scared. If I can talk to someone about this I'd be really grateful.  ,lgbt
Been homeless for a little over two months due to parents kicking me out after I came out as lesbian.,"Some backstory: I come from a pretty conservative Christian family, and at a young age started feeling romantically for girls, but realized that no other girls were having those feelings and always talked about their crushes on girls. This led to me feeling alienated in middle school due to all the boy talk in my friend group and the constant questions about which boy Im crushing on etc etc. 


In high school I entered a new friend group full of really great people that I eventually came out to. They comforted me and were really amazing and supportive. Needless to say, this amazing support had sort of put the idea into my head that coming out to my parents wouldn’t be such a bad thing, you know, it’s 2018 right? I’d never really heard my parents trash on LGBTQ before so I assumed the worst that could happen is they’d assume it was a phase and kind of just brush it off and just pretend like it never happened. 


If you’ve read the title, you probably know that I was very wrong. I sat my parents down and told them and they were LIVID. My father yelled at me and told me that if I wanted to be a “dyke” then I had to go be a “dyke” somewhere else, my father started smashing things and I ran upstairs to my room to cry. I heard my dad yelling and heard something that really hit me hard, it was something along the lines of “she’s not my daughter etc etc.” I come from a very traditional Asian family and hadn’t realized that in traditional Asian culture, homophobia is frowned upon greatly. 

Thanks to my amazing friend group I had places to stay for the first few weeks, but eventually my luck ran out. I’m not sure what to do now and it’s been a struggle trying to eat daily and find somewhere to sleep. It’s gotten to the point where I’ve had to miss school because I couldn’t find a place to shower etc. 

My parents won’t talk to me and I don’t have any other family in the city, my bank account has dropped to 0 as I’ve used my savings to buy food and other necessities. 

I apologize for the super long post but I had to get this off my chest 

TL;DR: Parents kicked me out for being a lesbian, feel like my life is ruined, don’t know what to do. ",lgbt
How do I let people know I’m queer without explicitly telling everyone ?,"Hello everyone ! I am an 18 yr old male, who has recently integrated into a new school just last year and have had trouble finding friends apart of an LGBTQ community. The school I go to isn’t particularly accepting of people that identify with this community and I don’t really want everyone to know that I’m apart of it in fear of being bullied, etc. I do however want to be in a relationship with someone that would like to be in a gay relationship. So here’s my problem, how do I let people know I am willing to be apart of a gay relationship without my entire school knowing?

Unfortunately there is no LGBTQ club at my school and I just do not have the time outside of school and work to join a club. My uncle works with an AIDS foundation which hosts social events for LGBTQ teens but he lives a fair drive away and i unfortunately cannot drive out everyday time they have an event. I also don’t have any friends because I joined the school year late, but am apart of a small group, who I really enjoy spending time with. I know everything I listed above really restricts my possibilities to meet new people but I’m just too busy/embarrassed to put myself out there and search for this relationship. 

I’m sorry if this post is kinda confusing, I was just hoping that maybe someone has experienced something similar. Any of your personal experiences would be greatly appreciated and thank you for taking the time to read my post ! ",lgbt
Came out in person for the first time!,"So I've been """"""""""""out"""""""""""" as Bi for about 4-5 months, but only on my private social media account, so like 2-3 dozen or so people know (The most random people too, so congrats Mary, even though I haven't spoken to you in like 2 years, since you follow me you get to know before many closer friends). Even then, I always had a real problem coming out to new people, but I recently transferred schools so I thought ""Hey, why not start fresh?"".

   

Today I spaced out on my phone while hanging out with my friends (Only one of which knew) and when I came back a couple seconds later, they were talking about how to stand in a certain way, and when I asked about what they were doing, one replied ""Trying to stand like a gay guy"" (Sidebar, the friend who responded is very much ""I sexually identify as a mailbox"" but he's my friends roommate so he is usually with us)

 

I respond ""Oh sweet so I'm already halfway there cuz I'm Bi"" which is a huge step from ""Actively Ignoring commenting on my sexuality"", so you know, progress! Anyways it's a really liberating thing cuz I still have a lot of progress to make but at least some people outside that small circle of social media people know!

&amp;#x200B;",lgbt
Drugs for a homosexual to enhance performance and excite from an intercourse with a woman,"I'm most probably a homosexual who feels uncomfortable in his own skin, mostly because romantically I attach myself exclusively to women. It's only natural for a woman to want to have an intercourse with his man, and that's where I would underperform. Notice the ""would"" part, as I have never had an intercourse in my life. WRT porn, I'm never fully excited with heterosexual porn, my erection is strong but is unstable, meaning I can go soft at any moment. I probably could name only a handful of female pornstars who get me going at a reasonable level. My position as a homosexual heteroromantic is very difficult and futile, that's why I need some coping mechanisms, and meds are just a way to do that. I'm inexperienced in this aspect, so I ask you, forum, to help me on this journey.

Please don't post with ""You should accept yourself for who you are"", as I'm honestly fed up with this.",lgbt
INTEREST FUNCTION IN FACEBOOK,"Hey y'all,

Does the interest function in facebook mean that someone is sexually interested?
For instance, Profile X is interested in men and women does that mean he is bi or it is used to show that you are ready to be friends with men and women?

Thanks
-L S",lgbt
How do pronouns work in Germany?,"Hi just for some background I am straight and don't really know all that much about all the lgbt stuff, but I noticed that the most often used preferred pronouns I heard about for trans people are ""they"", ""them"". What are they in Germany? Because we have ""er""as the male pronoun,""sie"" as female pronoun but ""they"" and ""them"" both also translate to ""sie"" just in plural. ",lgbt
I got Sir'd again this morning. I know one day I won't. If you ever find yourself going through Hell - keep going,,lgbt
i don't think i can do this much longer,"""She."" ""It?"" ""Lady."" ""Him?"" 
a l l wrong.
I CAN'T FUCKING BEAR THIS. I--
I can't transition how I want to, and i feel so trapped.
""You don't need to be called They/Them pronouns. You won't die.""
OH I'M NOT SO SURE
""I'm not ready to call you They/Them pronouns.""
ARE YOU READY FOR ME TO KILL MYSELF
I'm sorry- I just hate myself so much and feel like by the constant amount of hate, I either have to be a girl or a guy, and I'M NOT! I feel so fucking trapped. Constantly getting called she, even by people I know, it's becoming too much.
I have dysphoria about my lips, they are so feminine, I hate my chest, I hate my part, IT WOULDN'T FEEL RIGHT WITH THE OPPOSITE THOUGH, so i can't ever transition there..
I'm dysphoric about my fucking voice.. I hate it. I sound feminine, and I need it to stop.
I can't take school, substitutes, are such a pain, I have panic attacks every day,
constantly being told, I'm not valid, and I DIDN'T ASK FOR THIS. I'd give a lot to be cis, it'd be so much easier. I want to cut my hair, but I can't. I want to buy a binder, I can't.
I...need to look like this, because I'm wanting to rip off my skin, and I break down crying a lot, by looking in the mirror. Small good things, have happened. In the school synergy or whatever, the school database, it says Preferred name: V, and gender nonbinary, but that's about it. Ontop of this, I have school stress, severe anxiety, depression. What now? It keeps piling up and I feel i'm going to get crushed. I cry when I have to shower, once glance, at myself, and I'm slouching down against the wall, tears forming in my eyes.
I don't know what to do at this point. Help.

I'm considering suicide.",lgbt
"Hostility Toward LGBTQ Students May Be Rising in Schools, Survey Finds - Rules for Engagement",,lgbt
Clothes for closet MTF?,So I’ve resently found out that I’m trans and I was wondering what clothes would be good to ware to make you feel comfortable but not reveal that your a trans female. I was thinking of panties and knee high socks (I already ware knee high socks at home) but I don’t know what kind of undies will fit ... everything. I was thinking of hipster style but not sure if there is any other styles that work well to.... I just want to ware clothes that fir my gender without coming out 😔,lgbt
Laverne Cox On Survivor’s Guilt As A Black Trans Woman,,lgbt
Came out as gay,,lgbt
"This is the door in a local geeky pub/bar, over here we don't do genderstereotypes.",,lgbt
plz idk if i fucked up...,"Ok ok... so Im gay, had a crush on this guy, that I was so sure was gay (so was the rest of my group but no one really cared enough coz theyre straight)... i recently gave him the confirmation that I was gay. so ive been flirting with him and idk he seemed to rly respond: he slowly started trying to see more, more messages, we would always stare at each other for quite a while,m... idk I was so sure hes gay, until I asked him about his sexuality today, and he told me hes straight, two possible outcomes:

&amp;#x200B;

1- hes still in the closet (or am i just being rly stubborn/selfish/pos about it and not accepting otherwise), then what can I do coz I hate to judge someones sexuality without actually asking him, but Idk he really reallly caught my eye... how can I get him to come out to me... (i feel like a really shit human for saying that but Idk im rly high rn...plz dnt hate me) 

&amp;#x200B;

2-hes not gay and I just made things so fucking awkward coz its a bit obvious that im flirting...

&amp;#x200B;

Idk guys i made the mistake of taking the edible before asking them so I guess im badtrip fml plz someone tell me what to do in each case, and im so fucking sure hes gay...",lgbt
Increase in panphobia?,"So I'm pan (panromantic to be specific, as I'm also asexual) and lately I have been getting a ton of harassment about it. Apparently pan doesn't exist and is just a term bi people use ""to feel special"" and is transphobic (what?) and apparently doesn't count as ""queer"" or whatever. There has jus been a ton of other junk as of late, including being called homophobic for being pan when... I'm literally not straight? 

Why has this suddenly popped up, and why is it so vitriolic? I've literally received death threats for talking about being pan and why I identify as queer and it just seems to be getting worse. It just seems like a sudden influx of this ""pan isn't real and is bad"" rhetoric and a frightening number of people within our community parroting it. It's also just incredibly upsetting to be harassed for my identity, especially by other members of my community.",lgbt
Help me understand non binary and agender,"Edit: I am asking two separate things, agender and non binary, sorry if it wasn't clear and seemed I was mixing them.

Never met neither a non binary nor an agender so I think even if I am supportative of everyone expressing their gender or lack of it I think I won't be able to reduce the alienation they feel.

A few days ago asked something similar about trans people and it really helped and make me realize how far I was from understanding.

So any resources to get started?",lgbt
‘An artistic expression of gender’: He’s an office worker by day and mustachioed ‘Tita’ by night - ‘It is a little bit out of the norm and unexpected.’,,lgbt
Hugh just had a conversation with my father and he kept misgendering people,"I listened to one anecdote of my father work, pretty common ocurrence but this time there were some trans people.

&amp;#x200B;

I have to say he tried his best but it felt ankward. Still way better than a few years ago so it seems he is improving.",lgbt
A young lady needin' a tip,"So... If milkshakes bring all the boys to the yard, what would bring all the girls to my yard instead? I need to know the secret!!",lgbt
[Self] Am I a Diglett or a Dicklett ?,,lgbt
I just told my parents that im gay.," So basically as the title says i just told my parents im gay and im really proud of getting the courage to do so. They accepted it and everything and im just happy.
And i just wanted to tell someone and i dont really have anyone i could tell so yeah.",lgbt
When is the right time to come out to family?,"I am a first year student at uni, and I have known I am gay since freshman year of high school. My current boyfriend and I have also been dating since freshman year of high school, and everyone at school knew and accepted it, but I never told my family (except my sister). 

I know for a fact my grandmother, uncles/aunts, and cousins would not be okay with me being gay at all, as they see it as one of the worst sins you can commit. However, I do not know how my parents would react—they’ve made ignorant comments about LGBT people before, but I haven’t heard anything truly homophobic from them, yet at the same time, I haven’t heard anything supportive from them. They either keep their thoughts on lgbt people to themselves or they are neutral on the topic. 


I am tired of hiding being gay though. It takes a lot of effort and energy hiding it from them, especially since I’ve been dating my boyfriend for 4 years (parents think he is my best friend) and he goes to uni less than an hour away from me. 

Does it ever feel like the right time to come out?",lgbt
made an art piece of Matthew Shepard for an article in my school's magazine. never been so excited to do a commission before!,,lgbt
I'm trying to educate my BF,"We are both cis, and even though we are Christians we are constantly trying to educate ourselves and defend minorities rights in any way we can, we are from Argentina and as a country there's a lot of us trying to change the society intolerant and ignorant views we were raised by. Fortunately we've been able to grow a lot and open our minds a lot too through documentaries and the internet in general, I've learned SO much about a lot of things by just hearing you guys brave stories! But here's the thing, I don't have any close friends that are from the lgbt community so there are questions that I can't answer for him with actual evidence, he believes that the vast majority of the lgbt people have gone through sexual assault or rape and their change of sexuality is because of that and I'm telling him over and over that I don't think that's it at all and people can born this way even if they have the most """"normal"""" and traditional childhood. But I would like to have actual proof of what I'm saying and I've been googling but it seems I just don't know how.
I would be very thankful if you guys could help us get more educated and I would really really love to hear your stories of how did you and your family knew that there was something different about yourselves (different of what society forces) at what age did you or your parents knew and how it went? 
Thank you so so much for even taking your time for reading me!

Edit: Thank you SO much for the kindness and information I received today, thank you all for taking your time to tell me a little bit about your journeys! I was able to have a nice and rich conversation with my bf when he came to work so hopefully I can make him rethink more stuff that people told him there were in a certain way. Again thank you, cheers to all of you for living your best selves! ",lgbt
Is this a bottom or a top HELP!!!,,lgbt
"They were a gay, interracial couple in an age of relentless bigotry. The two Harolds didn’t flinch.",,lgbt
Not sure if Bi or Gay. (18M),"About two years ago, I realized I wasn't straight. I don't know to this day what triggered it, but my mind realized I was attracted to guys as well as girls. At first I thought I was okay with either a girlfriend or a boyfriend, then I realized I preferred a boyfriend no doubt. Now for months now, I've come to the observation that the female genitalia is honestly disgusting to me, if i think about it too much i start to gag. Now I no longer know If i'm bisexual or just plain gay. Any advice?",lgbt
"Writing poetry for a class, this is about our community, please give me advice, if it's bad, needs something more or etc just say so","&lt;LGBTQ+. Lesbian gay bisexual trans queer or even more to see

&lt;I hear these words I feel free, men that courageously go by he

&lt;My friends and me, we are more than just what we are supposed to be

&lt;Previously rejected by where we were raised in childhood, our society

&lt;Just cause we, fish that won’t climb the metaphorical tree at least not directly.

&lt;We have formed our own expanded webbed family,once there was just a me

&lt;I have found my friends, who would help me, I will help them, us we

&lt;My friend who cautiously talks to me about anxiety, perpetually losing sleep

&lt;My allies who have been repulsed by these familial hateful decrees 

&lt;Love from hearts spread lovingly from people who deal with the same anxiety

&lt;Crucified eternally, not in a religious way, no relation to any deity






",lgbt
how can i stop begin trans/pan for my parents?,"you see, my parents are christtian and think begin pan/trans is a sin, but i dont wanna make them sad/dissapointed by telling them, so what can i do to stop begin trans or pan? please i need an answer",lgbt
"Even with health insurance, lesbian, gay and bisexual adults are more likely to delay medical care",,lgbt
Gay Wedding Planning,"I would like to ask the LGBT community a question that has me torn and confused.  If you are planning your wedding, what generic titles would you like to see on a questionnaire?  ie, like Bride and Groom.

Bride and Groom, although the norm is obviously not inclusive but I struggle to see an alternative.

Please help.",lgbt
"Pt 2, I translated her response and this is what she said, I absolutely balled my eyes out. Words can’t express how happy I am... ((Sorry for my bad handwriting))",,lgbt
[Rant] Fuck the world,"You are going to have to excuse my redundancy but fuck this world.

&amp;#x200B;

Fuck the education, fuck the religious education, fuck the teachers that let kids be hurt just to get a paycheck. Fuck the administrators that feel one broken is better than kicking out five. Fuck indoctrination, fuck telling the kids something is bad just because you don't like it.

&amp;#x200B;

Fuck covering the eyes of a kid from something that is just as natural as anything else, fuck hidding ""anormal"", fuck denying existences at the same time you teach its gross. Fuck telling ""is wrong"".

&amp;#x200B;

Fuck enforcing stupid stereotypes. So I can't cry? So I can't learn to stich? Why? Why the hell? Fuck hidding what I like just because it doesn't fit a gender, fuck throwing anything you don't like to the trash.

&amp;#x200B;

Fuck assholes repeating what they were said, fuck idiots believing lies, fuck sadists using excuses just to enjoy harming someone. Fuck that ""empathyc"" ones unable to feel even a bit of pain for us.

&amp;#x200B;

Fuck feeling sad, fuck wanting to be normal, fuck crying in silence, fuck the pain, fuck  being unable to tell. Fuck hidding what we feel, fuck telling ""is nothing"", fuck being open outwards but being unable to be yourself.

&amp;#x200B;

Fuck depression, fuck denial, fuck repression, fuck condemnation. Fuck having to fight against what we are taught, what we are forced to take inside and let it torn us appart. Fuck having our minds and souls broken. Fuck having to pick the pieces. Fuck doing all of this for years , losing those years, just to smile. Fuck remembering. Fuck having to lose that smile just because we found and asshole. Fuck fearing being ill again, being again lost.

&amp;#x200B;

Fuck the jokes, cliches, ""decisions"", stereotypes, prejudices... Fuck being treated different. Fuck the fear of that happening. Fuck the fear of being killed just because an asshole doubts themself.

&amp;#x200B;

Fuck it all.

&amp;#x200B;

I just needed to vent, this has been a been a bad day. I am sorry if I trigger someone but I just felt I had to say it.",lgbt
What has someone else done for you to help you feel loved and supported?,"I’m a bisexual woman, currently in a committed relationship with a straight man, and lately I’ve noticed due to the political climate that my friends in the LGBTQ+ community have been struggling emotionally. I have too, but certainly not to the extent that my friends are struggling right now. I try to message and reach out to my friends who are having a hard time, and I hope they know I love and support them. I grew up in a place where sexual preferences and genders aren’t really a controversial topic, at least not to the extent here in America. I want to understand more about how they’re feeling and how to better help them know that they are loved and supported. I’m tired of seeing my loved ones hurt so much. 

So what are some things people have said or done for you that helped you feel loved and cared for? I would love new ideas to help my friends and family who are feeling alone. 

Thanks for being a great and positive community here on Reddit! ♥️",lgbt
How to tell if your bi or gay,"18 M. Some back story. So I had sex for the first with my girl 2 months ago and I was nervous as fuck and couldn’t get up and she said it was fine and it’s normal. In my brain I was going bananas, I was thinking am I gay ? Or ? . Second time we tried it  it went well and it was fun. When I’m with my girl my mind is clear and I’m not going insane . When I’m alone my mind goes fucking insane and I analyze everyone and everything. It’s a different side of my brain asking me these questions about what I like or dislike or what I find attractive or not attractive. Are you bi ? Are you gay ? Are you straight ?. When I was younger around 8-9 my brother and my cousin would fool around sexually and I don’t know if that’s normal.  Like touching each others dicks and making him put on a bra.  Idk my mind would go back to that and question it. When I’m hanging with my guy friends I don’t think about making moves or anything that isn’t even on my mind. When I’m around girls I can’t stop looking at them. I don’t have a good support system right now either cuz all of my friends are gone and I don’t have anyone to talk too. Idk if I’m lacking a sense of belonging and love or just questioning my sexuality. I fantasize about girls at night, but when thoughts about dudes appear I can’t fantasize no more I get completely turned off and ask myself why did I think about that.  Saying “I’m Straight” is mad comfortable with me but saying I’m gay or bi just doesn’t fit right with me. I’m usually a really touchy person too cuz it’s how I express myself and love. Idk please. I’m going insane dawg. There’s more but this is a lot already ",lgbt
What's wrong with me? Am I asexual? I can't figure this out for the life of me and it's tearing me apart.,"I'm 22, trans female, and I can honestly say if I never have sex again I'd be fine with it. Does that make me ace in and of itself? I will have sex on occasion but it's purely to get my rocks off, nothing more, nothing less. I don't particularly enjoy having sex, other than the climax. 

Before sex if my fiancee is trying to initiate I almost always resist, not really wanting to have sex.

In the moment sex is nice and feels good and whatnot, but afterwards I just feel gross. I have to clean up immediately and still feel gross for awhile afterwards.

We're at a point where we only have sex once a month or less, but we've gone through phases of multiple times a day, and that doesn't sound very asexual to me? 

The *idea* of sex is pleasing to me, and I watch porn and masturbate on a regular basis, which also doesn't sound very asexual to me.

Maybe it's some weird form of dysphoria? IDK anymore and it's killing me. I want to be able to put a name and some concrete structure to my sexuality once and for all to be able to have some closure, especially as this is causing some tension in the relationship.

Please help, I need advice.

And please don't just say ""it won't work out, you're sexually incompatible"" because I plan on being with this woman for the rest of my life and something as superficial as sex isn't going to change that, not after what she and I have been through.

Thank you all in advance.

TL;DR -- Am I ace if I don't particularly enjoy sex but can still have and enjoy it sometimes? ",lgbt
My Trans Experience,"I started transitioning in Summer of 2012, did HRT for 3 months before becoming really sick and having to stop HRT. Since then, I've medically recovered but can't get a doc to put me back on HRT. 

Socially, I can't make friends and nobody wants to date me. As far as friendships are concerned, cis people are just flakey or just kind-of iffy about me. Trans friendships are almost impossible because I have no desire to be a raging, violent, authoritarian SJW and also would just like to not have ANYTHING to do with politics of ANY kind, period. 

Everyone either wants to treat me like I'm 

(A) Dangerous 

(B)  Their token trans friend so they can have ""good person points""

(C) Their dress-up doll

(D) A liability of some kind 

(E) Not allowed to have my own individualism, thoughts, etc. 



",lgbt
Transplant,,lgbt
So can teenage virgins be sex addicts?,"I am 17, and 60% of my thoughts are on men. I love the male anatomy, but I nvr had sex with anybody. I masturbate a lot, and sometimes I ask myself if having sex with a lot of men would be a fun part time job. I know this is crazy and unhealthy sexually but it's obsessive at this point, I can't stop thinking about men or boys my age I want to hop onto.

Is this just virgin frustrations, like how straight men get desperate and fuck the sane sex in jail? Or is this a big problem? Will my brain stop thinking about this if I actually had sex? Help LGBT adults...",lgbt
Lambda Legal Partners with State Civil Rights Organizations to Oppose Anti-LGBT Fourth Circuit Court Nominee Allison Rushing,,lgbt
Rejection,"Hey, so I am a female and my boyfriend is a trans male. My parents have completely rejected me as far as this goes. They don’t approve of it because they knew my boyfriend before he began his transition (ftm). My mother rarely speaks to me and when she does it’s only because she wants time with my kid or something. I’m struggling with the rejection and no longer feeling like a part of my family. I text my mother and get super short replies, if anything at all. She doesn’t call me to talk and if I call there’s always an excuse to not be on the phone. I don’t know how to handle it. Any advice? ",lgbt
HOW TO DATE SOMEONE ON FACEBOOK U DONT KNOW IF HE IS GAY?,"Hey yall,

I would like to know how I can approach a hot lad on facebook? I dont know his sexual orientation, he writes that he is interested in men and women on facebook, but maybe that means that he is ready to befriend men and women. I dont know him in real life. 

Any tips will be appreciated 

Thanks 
-L S ",lgbt
We stan.,,lgbt
Tan France Did Not Create The French Tuck - Women Did,,lgbt
So I (16F) like my trans friend (16M)...,"What should I do about it? I swear he’s the most gorgeous thing I’ve seen in the world, and he’s the best guy I know. 

He doesn’t feel too good about himself (he’s very dysphoric) but I let him know all the time that he’s very much masculine, and valid as ever. 

I’m questioning my sexuality at the moment, but even if I am straight, that doesn’t change how I feel about him. I still like him more than anyone I’ve ever had feelings for 

[crushes]",lgbt
The Beyonce Drag performance you always wanted🔥🔥🔥😂,,lgbt
What am I? Am I asexual? lithsexual? straight? gay?," I'm sorry if this isn't an appropriate post. English isn't my first language.

I'm a woman in my late 20s. I've struggled with dating and relationships and questioned my sexuality whole my life. I first thought I was straight who just gets no love, then maybe I'm gay, or maybe I'm bisexual, and now I'm thinking maybe I'm asexual. I took a quiz today, and it says I'm lithsexual. Is it even a thing?

I've never had sex in my life or in a relationship with anyone. I can't really say that I don't like sex or I don't want to have sex when I haven't had it, I actually don't know for sure if I don't want to have sex at all. Maybe I'm awfully afraid of it, or feel guilty about sex? Or I have very high standards? So I've tried to have sex with someone, hopefully with a boyfriend, for many years. I got more and more miserable the more I try.

Every time I meet someone interested in me, I automatically thought of the chances I would have sex with them, because I badly wanted to try to see if I really don't like it. I wouldn't want to have sex with most of them even though I think they are cute and cool. I just don't feel that. It makes me extremely uncomfortable and I can't just force myself to have sex, could I? This thought made me uncomfortable and I pushed them away. I felt extremely bad because I kept feeling like I can't give them what they want from me. Not just sex, the intimacy, the connection. Ideally, I want to be connected with them platonically first, but it's obvious they are attracted to me and I feel like I'm a bad person to take advantage of them. After telling them I might be asexual, I became friends with some of them, but I am still not very comfortable. I am still not attracted to them.

There were a few guys who I found extremely attractive and gave me butterflies. But I still don't think about ""sex"". I just get very excited and they are such cool people so I am romantically attracted to them. I wouldn't mind having sex with them if that's what they want. They are usually out of my league, though. I'm even thinking about paying a hooker to have sex with me, to take my virginity.

For some reason, I usually find kissing very gross. I like cuddling a lot, but not kiss. Only when I'm drunk I can kiss without being grossed out. But I'm not sure if that's because I haven't found the right people.

So, I got back to try being with girls again. Not with a lot of success, because where I'm from LGBT isn't as open as the western world and it's a lot harder to find lesbians. And honestly I wasn't that excited about this idea because I could see myself being romantically attracted to them and I've been attracted to women before, but I can't see me having sex with them. It's more of an idealization than actual attraction too, I think. I just want to look at them and appreciate their beauty. I just don't have a lot of fun when I'm dating a girl than I'm dating a guy period. It gets boring.

Thing is, I masturbate and watch porn regularly. Quite often, in fact. Like 3 times a week. I never think about someone and I only focus on my orgasm though. I don't like to look at vagina for some reason so I almost only watch kiss, cuddling, anal, oral, SM or other stuff. Sound and the pleasure of people is what turns me on, and pain, to be honest. But I do not want to be part of that. I just like to get pleasure from clitoral stimulation and that's it. I never think about wanting other people to give me pleasure. I am satisfied and I am happy. I can't be sure though, that if it's because I am afraid of having sex with someone of it's because I'm asexual.

But, I am really lonely because I don't think I have connection with anyone. I have friends, but it's different from a relationship. I want to be in a relationship. I want to be intimate with someone, not physically but emotionally.

I'm so frustrated and I don't know what to do anymore. I don't know if anyone will read this, but thanks a lot if you did.",lgbt
Why We Created International Pronouns Day,,lgbt
(17 year old trans male again),"So, very tight sports bras are barly working for me and my parents refuse to buy me a binder....can I have some tips on how to bind without the use of binders? Its getting so bad ive almost turned to duck tape.",lgbt
The Importance of LGBT+ Film - Iris Prize 2018 Vlog,,lgbt
Passive-aggressive ways of coming out?,Hi y’all so I plan on coming out to my dad before the end of the month and I’ll like to know in what way can I do it to make him feel like shit for all the homophobic slurs he’s said at the dinner table and whatnot. It will be greatly appreciated xD. EDIT: I’m gay btw,lgbt
Double surprise proposal: I proposed to my girlfriend and she proposed back.,,lgbt
"10% of LGBT Australians are still vulnerable to religious conversion therapy, according to a new report",,lgbt
LGBTQ+ YOUTUBERS,"Hi guys!! We're a lesbian couple from Canada who started a YouTube channel a few months back. If you could check us out it would really help us :) We post about coming out, mental health, and just shot a vlog where I destroy my girlfriend... at beer pong.

&amp;#x200B;

[https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=fCOot-566cY](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=fCOot-566cY)

https://i.redd.it/eh58satemus11.png

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;",lgbt
Looking to make some friends,Hey guys. New to Reddit. Just looking to meet some cool people and have an actual conversation. It’s really hard to make friends let alone meet other lgbt+ people. Especially where I live anyway. Alright well hope you all have a great day! ❤️🌈,lgbt
Legal Question for LGBT couple getting divorced,"(SERIOUS) One of my best friends (K) is a lesbian and legally married to her spouse (G). They are in the process of getting divorced now. They had a union ceremony 18 years ago and then legally got married 4 years ago. Her wife is the primary bread winner (very very wealthy bread winner) and my friend is the stay at home mom (SAHM). They both chose mediation instead of going to lawyers for the divorce.. However my friend K is getting bullied by G big time. G is financially doing things against the mediation agreement which is a breach of contract etc... and I think K is getting screwed out of a lot of spousal support. Their son is 6yo. Joint custody right now.

&amp;#x200B;

Does anyone here in this community know of any legal divorce precedent that can have assets legally attached to the union ceremony they had 18 years ago instead of the legal wedding 4 years ago... Because currently K's spousal support is only based on 4 years of marriage but that's just not accurate and the law is bullshit against LGBTQ community.  I am straight and don't have a lot of LGBT friends to discuss this with (who might know info or have friends who would know) and thought you guys might know?

&amp;#x200B;

My friend is such a wonderful lady and her wife is manipulating heartless person (using the kid to get back at her-BS stuff like that). I just don't want K taken advantage of or to be destitute as a result of this. With the spousal support and proceeds from the sell of the house, she's in a place to receive high 6 figures to start a new life for her and her son (she's applying for full custody as she's the one that's raised him). TIA",lgbt
"On the left is the boy who seldom thought he would ever be that pretty girl, on the right is the girl who is now ""that pretty girl.""",,lgbt
Guys I really like her and I can't believe it took me so long to ask her out!,"I first met her last fall when her roommate, a good friend of mine, invited me over to their place. She was in a bathrobe and about to take a shower and wash off a bunch of paint. Tis the life of an artist. I thought she was really cute and fun but was too shy and self-conscious to say anything so I left it at that. Plus, everyone thought she had a thing going on with someone else, and I didn't want to intrude. Not long after, I entered my first relationship and it was awful. He was disinterested, never wanted to do anything, and always made me feel extremely stressed out and confused. Friends commented that they felt as if they saw him more often than I did, which is probably very true. Turns out he wasn't actually interested and left me feeling extremely awkward for over two months rather than speaking up. After that, I was pretty dejected and my self-consciousness increased. Why would someone even do that? I never dated earlier in life because I wanted to avoid immature shit like lack of communication and look where it got me.

But one day I was walking home at night and ran into her. We talked for a long time and it turned out that she wasn't dating the person everyone thought she was. In fact, she wasn't even interested in this person and then began describing her type...which was suspiciously similar to me in appearance and personality. Of course, with me being dumb as rocks, I assume it is a coincidence. We started hanging out more often after that. I asked her out a few times, but always got cold feet and told her to invite friends. She continued to overload me with compliments I had no idea how to accept. When we weren't with each other in person, we were with each other through snapchat or texting. Finally, my best friend took notice of this and asked if I liked her romantically. I decided then and there that yes, I did, and yes, I would ask her out. This was much easier said than done. I took me weeks to work up the courage. Whenever we hung out in person we were surrounded by friends so I figured I'd text her, and this text sat unsent for two full days. Every single bad scenario ran through my mind. I didn't want to lose her presence in my life or make our mutual friends feel awkward. But not even before I put my phone back down, she responded with not only a yes but also multiple suggestions as to what we could do when we hung out.

So now we're dating and she makes me so. Damn. Happy. I cannot believe it took me a year to ask this girl out. She's cute, smart, funny, talented, and most importantly, she's kind. She's like the complete opposite of the guy I dated last year. She actually wants to be around me, and it threw me for a loop. I genuinely didn't know how to process the person I'm dating wanting to be around me as much as I want to be around them. People have told me that I look happier around her, and I really am. She spent the night at my place the other day and it was so nice to wake up with someone in my arms. She is the best distraction from the severe shittiness life has been throwing at me as of late. I spend a lot of time away from her thinking about her, and that's kind of why I'm writing this post. I've got to get this out so I can actually study for my exam tomorrow.

TL;DR: The girl I'm dating makes me so happy I can't even process it.",lgbt
Study reveals finger size may be linked to Homosexuality in Females.,"A recent study published by the BBC of Female Identical Twins, where one twin was straight while the other was a lesbian, found that the gays of the pairs had different sized ring &amp; index fingers on one hand. This is a trait normally found with males rather then females.

Posted from https://samanthasummersinstitute.org/community/general-sex-discussion/fingers-linked-to-sexuality/",lgbt
Essex Uni study suggests that women whose left index and ring fingers are different lengths are more likely to be lesbians. How does everyone here measure up?,,lgbt
https://youtu.be/bXY1jPqFA3c Gay Wizards in Space !!!!,,lgbt
What are the best YA lgbt novels that have surprised you?,"I feel like a lot of YA LGBT novels have a predictable formula that becomes stale after a while. The best one I've read recently was Undone by Cat Clarke which had a refreshing different ending (read it, really, do it). Are there any novels you've felt have surprised you in this way?",lgbt
"I asked my crush out, my best friend, finally after a year of lots of tears and laughter. And she said yes!",,lgbt
"Troye Sivan Teases Something Special, Then Takes It Back",,lgbt
"So far I identified myself as straight, but I came to a realization, and now I don't know if I'd be considered bi","I was attracted to women forever. I'm male btw. But I recently noticed that there are certain men I wouldn't mind getting down to it, lol. I don't think I could be romantically interested in them, so I noticed that it's only sexual. And like, only a certain type of men. Does this make me bi? Maybe just bi-curious? Should I explore it more?",lgbt
It Gets Better Project Launches Affiliate in India,"Just one month after India's Supreme Court struck down its ban on gay sex in a landmark ruling, the country is home to the latest international affiliate of the It Gets Better Project. It Gets Better India will work to uplift, empower and connect the LGBTQIA+ community through storytelling and community building. 

&amp;#x200B;

[https://www.vogue.in/content/keshav-suri-interview-fighting-discrimination-in-a-post-377-india/](https://www.vogue.in/content/keshav-suri-interview-fighting-discrimination-in-a-post-377-india/)",lgbt
is it gey to suck your own dick?,,lgbt
"Lgbt ""offender"" list"," I don't know if this is the right place to ask this but here goes. Almost every time I talk to a trans person online and we decide to meet they usually want me to sign up for some offender list, is this a real thing? I figure it's a scam.",lgbt
Same-sex penguin couple incubate egg at Sydney aquarium,,lgbt
Is Mai from the fighting game Blazblue Franchise trans or genderbent trope? Got a friend who's being downvoted to oblivion in a gamer sub about this so I need your opinions and help.,"title topic, can give a quick review or anything I'm just conflicted about this and the general Fighting game community's attitude towards this character can be really seen as transphobic, it's not the first time around as Poison and brigette shared this fate and the trans community gets flak for it.",lgbt
This is a silent film called “Sign”. I watched it today and I wanted to share it. I thought it was beautiful and thought maybe others would think that as well.,,lgbt
HOW GAY AM I? (ft LAUREN JAUREGUI &amp; ALLY HILLS),,lgbt
Pride flags are so beautiful!,,lgbt
The difficulties of being part of LGBT in Vietnam,"There are currently some major drawbacks being of being LGBT here.

1/ Same sex marriage are legal but the government do not and will never accept it as a legitimate marriage. Same sex couples will not receive supports from the government and the law in case of a divorce because it is still considered as a taboo by our government.

2/ There is no law against discrimination for civilians only for the government that means if you talk shits about the government, you're fucked. But if you spewed toxic shit to someone, you're not going to receive any notable punishment from the law. That means that while hate speech against LGBT is not an ethical thing to do, it isn't an illegal thing to do either

3/ Child abuse itself is already a problem, it's not uncommon for LGBT children who came out to their parents to only getting beaten up by their parents for violating their family traditions.

4/ The government could be an asshole sometimes: [Pham Le Quyen Tram, a Vietnamese transgender woman, loses government recognition](https://www.huffingtonpost.com/2013/01/28/pham-le-quynh-tram-transgender-woman-vietnam-recognition_n_2568484.html#slide=875147.%20)


",lgbt
My friend is running for local office in Illinois. Republican voters received this dog whistle mailer portraying him as a 'limp wristed' puppet,,lgbt
Proud Boys guilty of a hate crime? Experts say probably not,,lgbt
I tried coming out,"I'm a transgender male with aspergers and I've tried coming out to my father on multiple occasions. On my first attempt I had no idea how this was gonna play out, or how to even bring it up. I just said it on an impulse decision after school one day. I was 16 at the time.
He didn't accept it. He went off on a tangent, saying the transgender community was creating unnecessary problems because of the whole bathroom situation. The only message I got from that is we don't deserve equal rights, a message I promptly ignored. Then he starts to bring up points from my childhood, like how I've only been attracted to men up until this point or how I took great care in my appearance. As if my sexuality had anything to do with my gender identity or that a man can't take pride in taking care of himself and make sure he's looking his best.
I was so anxious at the time, I couldn't even look at him. I just fell mute and that was the end of it.
I'm 19 now and he still calls me his baby girl. I know that when he says that its coming from a place of love, but ever time I hint or flat out tell him I prefer being a guy he just ignores me, like it'll all just magically go away and with every passing day I become more and more resentful. Not just with him, but with myself as well. I wish I could've made a better a argument, maybe then I wouldn't hate myself as much.
I don't know how to make him understand. I already have to hide who I am at work, for once it would be nice to come home without that mask on.",lgbt
How to know if someone is gay on FACEBOOK?,"Hey y'all, 

How to know if someone is gay on facebook and want to hangout with him?

I live in a very homophobic country. 

HE says that he is interested in men AND women on facebook does that mean he is gay/bi or just mindlessly chose these options?

Thanks y'all

-L S",lgbt
"Scientists out there creating robot shit, all I ask for is a trans flag emoji.",,lgbt
